Table of Contents
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2023
or
☐TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from _______________________ to ______________________  
Commission ﬁle number 001-04534
AIR PRODUCTS AND CHEMICALS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as speciﬁed in its charter)
Delaware 23-1274455
(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identiﬁcation No.)
1940 Air Products Boulevard
Allentown, Pennsylvania 18106-5500
(Address of principal executive oﬃces) (Zip Code)
610-481-4911
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s)Name of each exchange on which
registered
Common Stock, par value $1.00 per share APD New York Stock Exchange
1.000% Euro Notes due 2025 APD25 New York Stock Exchange
0.500% Euro Notes due 2028 APD28 New York Stock Exchange
0.800% Euro Notes due 2032 APD32 New York Stock Exchange
4.000% Euro Notes due 2035 APD35 New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as deﬁned in Rule 405 of the
Securities Act.Yes☒ No☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to ﬁle reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d)
of the Act.Yes☐ No☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has ﬁled all reports required to be ﬁled by Section 13 or
15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that
the registrant was required to ﬁle such reports), and (2) has been subject to such ﬁling requirements for the
past 90 days.Yes☒ No☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File
required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the
preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such ﬁles).Yes☒ No☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated ﬁler, an accelerated ﬁler, a non-
accelerated ﬁler, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the deﬁnitions of “large
accelerated ﬁler,” “accelerated ﬁler,” “smaller reporting company,” and "emerging growth company" in Rule
12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated
ﬁler☒ Accelerated ﬁler☐Non-accelerated ﬁler☐ Smaller reporting
company☐ Emerging growth
company☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition
period for complying with any new or revised ﬁnancial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the
Exchange Act.☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has ﬁled a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of
the eﬀectiveness of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15
U.S.C.7262(b)) by the registered public accounting ﬁrm that prepared or issued its audit report.☒
If securities are registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act, indicate by check mark whether the ﬁnancial
statements of the registrant included in the ﬁling reﬂect the correction of an error to previously issued ﬁnancial
statements.☐
Indicate by check mark whether any of those error corrections are restatements that required a recovery analysis of
incentive-based compensation received by any of the registrant’s executive oﬃcers during the relevant recovery
period pursuant to §240.10D-1(b).☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as deﬁned in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes☐ No☒
The aggregate market value of the voting stock held by non-aﬃliates of the registrant on 31 March 2023 was approximately $63.6
billion. For purposes of the foregoing calculations, all directors and/or executive oﬃcers have been deemed to be aﬃliates, but the
registrant disclaims that any such director and/or executive oﬃcer is an aﬃliate.
The number of shares of common stock issued and outstanding as of 31 October 2023 was 222,207,726.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the registrant’s deﬁnitive Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 25 January 2024 are
incorporated by reference into Part III.
AIR PRODUCTS AND CHEMICALS, INC. and Subsidiaries
ANNU AL REPOR T ON FORM 10-K
For the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2023
TABLE OF CONTENTS
PART I
ITEM 1.BUSINESS 5
ITEM 1A.RISK FACTORS 11
ITEM 1B.UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS 17
ITEM 2.PROPERTIES 18
ITEM 3.LEGAL PROCEEDINGS 19
ITEM 4.MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES 19
PART II
ITEM 5.MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS,
AND ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES20
ITEM 6.RESERVED 21
ITEM 7.MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS
OF OPERATIONS22
ITEM 7A.QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK 50
ITEM 8.FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA 52
ITEM 9.CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE117
ITEM 9A.CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES 117
ITEM 9B.OTHER INFORMATION 117
ITEM 9C.DISCLOSURE REGARDING FOREIGN JURISDICTIONS THAT PREVENT INSPECTIONS 117
PART III
ITEM 10.DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE 118
ITEM 11.EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION 118
ITEM 12.SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND
RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS118
ITEM 13.CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR
INDEPENDENCE118
ITEM 14.PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES 118
PART IV
ITEM 15.EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES 119
ITEM 16.FORM 10-K SUMMARY 119
INDEX TO EXHIBITS 120
SIGNATURES 123
2
Table of Contents
FORW ARD-LOOKING ST ATEMENTS
This Annual Report on Form 10-K contains “forward-looking statements” within the safe harbor
provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements include all
statements that do not relate solely to historical or current facts and can generally be identiﬁed by
words such as “anticipate,” “believe,” “could,” “estimate,” “expect,” “forecast,” "future," “goal,”
“intend,” “may,” “outlook,” “plan,” “positioned,” “possible,” “potential,” “project,” “should,” “target,”
“will,” “would,” and similar expressions or variations thereof, or the negative thereof, but these terms
are not the exclusive means of identifying such statements. Forward-looking statements are based on
management’s expectations and assumptions as of the date of this report and are not guarantees of
future performance. You are cautioned not to place undue reliance on our forward-looking statements.
Forward-looking statements may relate to a number of matters, including expectations regarding
revenue, margins, expenses, earnings, tax provisions, cash ﬂows, pension obligations, share repurchases
or other statements regarding economic conditions or our business outlook; statements regarding
capital expenditures and plans, projects, strategies and objectives for our future operations, including
our ability to win new projects and execute the projects in our backlog; and statements regarding our
expectations with respect to pending legal claims or disputes. While forward-looking statements are
made in good faith and based on assumptions, expectations and projections that management believes
are reasonable based on currently available information, actual performance and ﬁnancial results may
diﬀer materially from projections and estimates expressed in the forward-looking statements because of
many factors, including, without limitation:
•changes in global or regional economic conditions, inﬂation, and supply and demand dynamics in
the market segments we serve, including demand for technologies and projects to limit the impact
of global climate change;
•changes in the ﬁnancial markets that may aﬀect the availability and terms on which we may
obtain ﬁnancing;
•the ability to implement price increases to oﬀset cost increases;
•disruptions to our supply chain and related distribution delays and cost increases;
•risks associated with having extensive international operations, including political risks, risks
associated with unanticipated government actions and risks of investing in developing markets;
•project delays, scope changes, cost escalations, contract terminations, customer cancellations, or
postponement of projects and sales;
•our ability to safely develop, operate, and manage costs of large-scale and technically complex
projects;
•the future ﬁnancial and operating performance of major customers, joint ventures, and equity
aﬃliates;
•our ability to develop, implement, and operate new technologies and to market products produced
utilizing new technologies;
•our ability to execute the projects in our backlog and refresh our pipeline of new projects;
•tariﬀs, economic sanctions and regulatory activities in jurisdictions in which we and our aﬃliates
and joint ventures operate;
•the impact of environmental, tax, safety, or other legislation, as well as regulations and other
public policy initiatives aﬀecting our business and the business of our aﬃliates and related
compliance requirements, including legislation, regulations, or policies intended to address global
climate change;
•changes in tax rates and other changes in tax law;
•safety incidents relating to our operations;
•the timing, impact, and other uncertainties relating to acquisitions and divestitures, including our
ability to integrate acquisitions and separate divested businesses, respectively;
•risks relating to cybersecurity incidents, including risks from the interruption, failure or
compromise of our information systems or those of our business partners or service providers;
•catastrophic events, such as natural disasters and extreme weather events, pandemics and other
public health crises, acts of war, including Russia's invasion of Ukraine and new and ongoing
conﬂicts in the Middle East, or terrorism;
•the impact on our business and customers of price ﬂuctuations in oil and natural gas and
disruptions in markets and the economy due to oil and natural gas price volatility;
3
Table of Contents
FORW ARD-LOOKING ST ATEMENTS (CONTINUED)
•costs and outcomes of legal or regulatory proceedings and investigations;
•asset impairments due to economic conditions or speciﬁc events;
•signiﬁcant ﬂuctuations in inﬂation, interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates from those
currently anticipated;
•damage to facilities, pipelines or delivery systems, including those we are constructing or that we
own or operate for third parties;
•availability and cost of electric power, natural gas, and other raw materials; and
•the success of productivity and operational improvement programs.
In addition to the foregoing factors, forward-looking statements contained herein are qualiﬁed with
respect to the risks disclosed elsewhere in this document, including in Item 1A, Risk Factors, Item 7,
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations, and Item 7A,
Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk. Any of these factors, as well as those not
currently anticipated by management, could cause our results of operations, ﬁnancial condition, or
liquidity to diﬀer materially from what is expressed or implied by any forward-looking statement. Except
as required by law, we disclaim any obligation or undertaking to update or revise any forward-looking
statements contained herein to reﬂect any change in assumptions, beliefs, or expectations or any
change in events, conditions, or circumstances upon which any such forward-looking statements are
based.
4
Table of Contents
PART I
Item 1. Business
As used in this report, unless the context indicates otherwise, the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” the
“Company,” "Air Products," or “registrant” include controlled subsidiaries and aﬃliates of Air Products.
About Air Products
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc., a Delaware corporation originally founded in 1940, is a world-leading
industrial gases company that has built a reputation for its innovative culture, operational excellence,
and commitment to safety and the environment. Focused on serving energy, environmental, and
emerging markets, we oﬀer a portfolio of products and services that enables customers to improve their
environmental performance, product quality, and productivity.
Air Products has a sustainability-driven two-pillar growth strategy consisting of the expansion and
eﬃcient operation of our core industrial gases business and the execution of projects that provide world-
scale clean hydrogen. Our industrial gases business provides essential gases, related equipment, and
applications expertise to customers in dozens of industries, including reﬁning, chemicals, metals,
electronics, manufacturing, medical, and food. We also develop, engineer, build, own, and operate some
of the world’s largest clean hydrogen projects that will support the transition to low- and zero-carbon
energy in the heavy-duty transportation and industrial sectors. Additionally, we are the world leader in
the supply of liqueﬁed natural gas ("LNG") process technology and equipment and provide
turbomachinery, membrane systems, and cryogenic containers globally.
We manage our operations, assess performance, and report earnings under ﬁve reportable
segments: Americas; Asia; Europe; Middle East and India; and Corporate and other. The discussion that
follows is based on these operations. Refer to Note 25, Business Segment and Geographic Information,
to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements for additional information.
Our Businesses
Industrial Gases Business
Our industrial gases business, which is organized and operated regionally in the Americas, Asia, Europe,
and Middle East and India segments, produces and sells atmospheric gases such as oxygen, nitrogen,
and argon; process gases such as hydrogen, helium, carbon dioxide (CO), carbon monoxide, and syngas
(a mixture of hydrogen and carbon monoxide); and specialty gases. Overall regional industrial gases
sales constituted over 90% of consolidated sales in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021, approximately
half of which were attributable to atmospheric gases.
Each of the regional industrial gases segments competes against three global industrial gas companies:
Air Liquide S.A., Linde plc, and Messer Group GmbH, as well as regional competitors. Competition in
industrial gases is based primarily on price, reliability of supply, and the development of industrial gas
applications. We derive a competitive advantage in locations where we have pipeline networks, which
enable us to provide a reliable and economic supply of products to our larger customers.
Production
Industrial gases are generally produced at or near the point of use given the complexity and ineﬃciency
of storing molecules at low temperatures. The industrial gases business develops, builds, and operates
equipment for the production or processing of gases. Atmospheric gases are produced through various
air separation processes, of which cryogenic distillation is the most prevalent, while process gases are
produced by methods other than air separation. To produce hydrogen, we purify byproduct sources
obtained from the chemical and petrochemical industries. We have historically produced hydrogen from
hydrocarbons exclusively without carbon capture (known as "gray hydrogen"); however, we are also
investing in projects that are intended to create a reliable and consistent world-scale source of low-
carbon hydrogen produced from hydrocarbons with carbon capture (known as “blue hydrogen”) as well
as carbon-free hydrogen produced from renewable energy (known as “green hydrogen”).2
5
Table of Contents
Electricity is the largest cost component in the production of atmospheric gases. To produce hydrogen,
carbon monoxide, and syngas, steam methane reformers use natural gas as the primary raw material,
while gasiﬁers use liquid and solid hydrocarbons as the primary raw material. We mitigate electricity,
natural gas, and hydrocarbon price ﬂuctuations contractually through pricing formulas, surcharges, cost
pass-through provisions, and tolling arrangements. During ﬁscal year 2023, no signiﬁcant diﬃculties
were encountered in obtaining adequate supplies of power and natural gas.
Helium is produced as a byproduct of gases extracted from underground reservoirs, primarily natural gas
as well as CO puriﬁed before resale. Because helium is generally sourced globally at long distances from
point of sale, we maintain an inventory of helium in our ﬂeet of ISO containers as well as at the U.S.
Bureau of Land Management underground storage facility in Amarillo, Texas, and our storage cavern
near Beaumont, Texas. We obtain helium from several sources globally, including crude helium for
puriﬁcation from the U.S. Bureau of Land Management's helium reserve.
Supply Modes
We distribute gases to our industrial gas customers through diﬀerent supply modes depending on
various factors including the customer's volume requirements and location. Our supply modes are as
follows:
•On-Site Gases—Supply mode associated with customers, principally in the energy production and
reﬁning, chemical, metals, and electronics industries worldwide, that require large volumes of
gases and have relatively constant demand. Gases are produced and supplied by large facilities we
construct or acquire on or near the customers’ facilities or by pipeline systems from centrally
located production facilities. These sale of gas contracts are generally governed by 15- to 20-year
contracts. We also deliver smaller quantities of product through small on-site plants (cryogenic or
non-cryogenic generators), typically via a 10- to 15-year sale of gas contract. The contracts within
this supply mode generally contain ﬁxed monthly charges and/or minimum purchase requirements
with price escalation provisions that are typically based on external indices. Our on-site supply
mode generates approximately half our total company sales.
•Merchant Gases—Supply mode for liquid bulk and packaged gas products. Liquid bulk product is
delivered in bulk in either liquid or gaseous form by tanker or tube trailer and stored, usually in its
liquid state, in equipment that we typically design and install at the customer’s site for vaporizing
into a gaseous state as needed. Liquid bulk sales are usually governed by three- to ﬁve-year
contracts. Packaged gas products are delivered in small quantities in either cylinders or dewars. We
operate packaged gas businesses in Europe, Asia, and Latin America.
We maintain inventory in locations that facilitate supply of products to customers on a reasonable
delivery schedule. Inventory consists primarily of crude helium, specialty gases, and other industrial
gases supplied via the merchant gases supply mode.
End Use
The reﬁning industry uses hydrogen to facilitate the conversion of heavy crude feedstock and lower the
sulfur content of gasoline and diesel fuels. This produces cleaner transportation fuels that can be used
with other equipment, particularly in the developing hydrogen-for-mobility markets, to signiﬁcantly
reduce emissions that contribute to climate change. Many other industries that already beneﬁt from
hydrogen’s unique properties to improve quality, optimize performance, and reduce costs are also
looking to hydrogen as a fuel that can help decarbonize their manufacturing processes. We have
hydrogen fueling stations that support commercial markets as well as demonstration projects across the
globe.
The chemicals industry uses hydrogen, oxygen, nitrogen, carbon monoxide, and syngas as feedstocks in
the production of many basic chemicals. The energy production industry uses nitrogen injection for
enhanced recovery of oil and natural gas and oxygen for gasiﬁcation. Oxygen is used in combustion and
industrial heating applications, including in the steel, certain nonferrous metals, glass, and cement
industries. Nitrogen applications are used in food processing for freezing and preserving ﬂavor, and
nitrogen is used for inerting in various ﬁelds, including the metals, chemical, and semiconductor
industries. Helium is used in laboratories and healthcare for cooling and in other industries for
pressurizing, purging, and lifting. Argon is used in the metals and other industries for its unique inerting,
thermal conductivity, and other properties. Industrial gases are also used in welding and providing
healthcare and are utilized in various manufacturing processes to make them more eﬃcient and to
optimize performance.2
6
Table of Contents
Industrial Gases Equipment
We design and manufacture equipment for air separation, hydrocarbon recovery and puriﬁcation, natural
gas liquefaction, and liquid helium and liquid hydrogen transport and storage. The Corporate and other
segment includes activity related to the sale of cryogenic and gas processing equipment for air
separation. The equipment is sold worldwide to customers in a variety of industries, including chemical
and petrochemical manufacturing, oil and gas recovery and processing, and steel and primary metals
processing. The Corporate and other segment also includes the results of our LNG equipment business,
our Gardner Cryogenics business, which fabricates helium and hydrogen transport and storage
containers, and our Rotoﬂow business, which manufactures turboexpanders and other precision rotating
equipment. Steel, aluminum, and capital equipment subcomponents such as compressors are the
principal raw materials in the manufacturing of equipment. Raw materials for individual projects typically
are acquired under ﬁrm purchase agreements. Equipment is produced at our manufacturing sites with
certain components procured from subcontractors and vendors. Competition in the equipment business
is based primarily on plant eﬃciency, service, technical know-how, and price, as well as schedule and
plant performance guarantees. Our sale of equipment supply mode constituted less than 10% of
consolidated sales in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021.
Customers
We do not have a homogeneous customer base or end market, and no single customer accounts for
more than 10% of our consolidated sales. We do have concentrations of customers in speciﬁc industries,
primarily reﬁning, chemicals, and electronics. Within each of these industries, we have several large-
volume customers with long-term contracts. A negative trend aﬀecting one of these industries, or the
loss of one of these major customers, although not material to our consolidated revenue, could have an
adverse impact on our ﬁnancial results.
Seasonality
Our businesses are not subject to seasonal ﬂuctuations to any material extent.
Governmental Contracts
Our business is not subject to a government entity’s renegotiation of proﬁts or termination of contracts
that would be material to our business as a whole.
Equity Aﬃliates
Our reporting segments include our share of the results of joint ventures accounted for under the equity
method. Our share of our investees' net earnings is primarily presented net of income taxes within
“Equity aﬃliates’ income" on our consolidated income statements. The carrying value of our equity
method investments is reﬂected as "Investment in net assets of and advances to equity aﬃliates" on our
consolidated balance sheets. Substantially all our equity method investments are in foreign industrial
gas producers, the largest of which operate in China, India, Italy, Mexico, Saudi Arabia, South Africa, and
Thailand. For additional information regarding these investments, refer to Note 9, Equity Aﬃliates, to the
consolidated ﬁnancial statements under Item 8 below.
International Operations
Through our subsidiaries, aﬃliates, and joint ventures accounted for using the equity method, we
conduct business in approximately 50 countries and regions outside the United States. Our international
businesses are subject to risks customarily encountered in foreign operations, including ﬂuctuations in
foreign currency exchange rates and controls, tariﬀs, trade sanctions, import and export controls, and
other economic, political, and regulatory policies of local governments described in Item 1A, Risk
Factors, below.
We have controlling interests in foreign subsidiaries that operate in Canada and approximately 10
countries in Latin America (primarily Chile and Brazil); approximately 10 countries and regions in Asia
(primarily China, South Korea, and Taiwan); approximately 25 countries in the Europe and Africa region
(primarily the Netherlands, the countries of the United Kingdom, and Spain); and approximately ﬁve
countries in the Middle East, primarily Saudi Arabia. As discussed under "Equity Aﬃliates" above, we also
own non-controlling interests in entities operating in Africa, Asia, Europe, Latin America, and the Middle
East.
Financial information about our foreign operations and investments is included in Note 9, Equity
Aﬃliates; Note 23, Income Taxes; and Note 25, Business Segment and Geographic Information, to the
consolidated ﬁnancial statements included under Item 8, below. Information about foreign currency
translation is included under “Foreign Currency” in Note 1, Basis of Presentation and Major Accounting
Policies, and information on our exposure to currency ﬂuctuations is included in Note 14, Financial
Instruments, to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements, included under Item 8, below, and in “Foreign
Currency Exchange Rate Risk,” included under Item 7A, below.
7
Table of Contents
Technology Development
We pursue a market-oriented approach to technology development through research and development,
engineering, and commercial development processes. We conduct research and development principally
in our laboratories located in the United States (Allentown, Pennsylvania), the United Kingdom
(Basingstoke and Carrington), Spain (Barcelona), China (Shanghai), and Saudi Arabia (Dhahran). We also
fund and cooperate in research and development programs conducted by a number of major universities
and undertake research work funded by others, including the United States government.
Development of technology for use within the Industrial Gases business focuses primarily on new and
improved processes and equipment for the production and delivery of industrial gases and new or
improved applications for industrial gas products.
During ﬁscal year 2023, we owned approximately 625 United States patents, approximately 3,300
foreign patents, and were a licensee under certain patents owned by others. While the patents and
licenses are considered important, we do not consider our business as a whole to be materially
dependent upon any particular patent, patent license, or group of patents or licenses.
Environmental Regulation
We are subject to various environmental laws, regulations, and public policies in the countries in which
we have operations. Compliance with these measures often results in higher capital expenditures and
costs. In the normal course of business, we are involved in legal proceedings under the Comprehensive
Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act ("CERCLA," the federal Superfund law);
Resource Conservation and Recovery Act ("RCRA"); and similar state and foreign environmental laws
relating to the designation of certain sites for investigation or remediation. Our accounting policy for
environmental expenditures is discussed in Note 1, Basis of Presentation and Major Accounting Policies,
and environmental loss contingencies are discussed in Note 18, Commitments and Contingencies, to the
consolidated ﬁnancial statements, included under Item 8, below.
Some of our operations are within jurisdictions that have or are developing regulatory regimes governing
emissions of greenhouse gases (“GHG”), including CO. These include existing coverage under the
European Union Emission Trading System, the California Cap-and-Trade Program, China’s Emission
Trading Scheme and its nation-wide expansion, and South Korea’s Emission Trading Scheme. In the
Netherlands, a CO emissions tax was enacted on 1 January 2021. In Canada, Alberta’s Technology
Innovation and Emission Reduction System went into eﬀect 1 January 2020. In Ontario, Environment &
Climate Change Canada’s Output Based Pricing System (“OBPS”) was replaced by the GHG Emissions
Performance Standards ("EPS") program beginning 1 January 2022. In Singapore, the Carbon Pricing Tax
Act was implemented eﬀective 1 January 2019. In Taiwan, Greenhouse Gases Emissions Registration and
Veriﬁcation Management Act will be enforced beginning in 2023. In addition, the U.S. Environmental
Protection Agency (“EPA”) requires mandatory reporting of GHG emissions and is regulating GHG
emissions for new construction and major modiﬁcations to existing facilities. The European Union has
issued the Corporate Sustainability Reporting Directive ("CSRD") and California has enacted the Climate
Corporate Data Accountability Act and the Climate Related Financial Risk Act that will require reporting
and third-party assurance of GHG emissions information for certain entities, and a similar proposal is
under consideration by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). Furthermore, some
jurisdictions have various mechanisms to target the power sector to achieve emission reductions, which
often result in higher power costs.
Increased public concern may result in more international, U.S. federal, and/or regional requirements to
reduce or mitigate the eﬀects of GHG emissions. Although uncertain, these developments could increase
our costs related to consumption of electric power, hydrogen production and application of our
gasiﬁcation technology. We believe we will be able to mitigate some of the increased costs through
contractual terms, but the lack of deﬁnitive legislation or regulatory requirements prevents an accurate
estimate of the long-term impact these measures will have on our operations. Any legislation that limits
or taxes GHG emissions could negatively impact our growth, increase our operating costs, or reduce
demand for certain of our products.
Regulation of GHG may also produce new opportunities for us. We continue to develop technologies to
help our facilities and our customers lower energy consumption, improve eﬃciency and lower emissions.
We see signiﬁcant opportunities for hydrogen for mobility and energy transition, carbon capture
technologies, and gasiﬁcation.
Expenditures for capital projects intended to control pollution from existing operating facilities as
required under current environmental regulations were not material in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and
2021. We do not expect material expenditures for these projects in ﬁscal year 2024.
For additional information regarding environmental matters, refer to Note 18, Commitments and
Contingencies, to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements.2
2
8
Table of Contents
Sustainability
Sustainability is at the core of our higher purpose to bring people together to collaborate and innovate
solutions to the world’s most signiﬁcant energy and environmental sustainability challenges. As of the
end of ﬁscal year 2023, we have committed capital of approximately $15 billion to projects intended to
accelerate the energy transition, some of which are already being executed in the United States,
Canada, and Saudi Arabia. These low- and zero-carbon hydrogen and other ﬁrst mover projects
demonstrate our commitment to making investments that will make a meaningful diﬀerence on climate
issues, allowing us to support our customers’ sustainability journeys, conserve resources, and care for
our employees and communities.
Our Sustainability Report details our growth strategy and the role our employees play in achieving our
goals. Our latest Sustainability Report is available at
www.airproducts.com/company/sustainability/sustainability-report. The information posted on our
website, including our Sustainability Report, is not incorporated by reference into, and does not form
part of, this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Human Capital Management
As of 30 September 2023, we had approximately 23,000 employees, of which over 90% were working
full-time and 74% were located outside the United States. We have collective bargaining agreements
with unions and works councils at certain locations that expire on various dates over the next four years.
Over 20% of our total workforce is covered by such agreements. Overall, we have a corporate strategy
supported by our leaders and enabled by a positive organizational culture.
We believe our employees are our most valuable asset and are critical to our success as an organization.
Our goal is to be the safest, most diverse, and most proﬁtable industrial gas company in the world,
providing excellent service to our customers. Integral to our success is the continued development of our
4S culture (Safety, Speed, Simplicity and Self-Conﬁdence) and creating a work environment where our
employees feel that they belong and matter. Our talent-related initiatives, including employee
recruitment and development, diversity and inclusion, and compensation and beneﬁt programs, focus on
building and retaining the world-class talent needed to execute our two-pillar growth strategy and fulﬁll
Air Products' higher purpose.
Safety
Safety is fundamental to who we are as a company. Safety is a shared value, and our employees’
commitment to safety is demonstrated in many ways every day. Safety is a critical component of
everything we do, everywhere in the world. Our goal is to be the safest industrial gas company in the
world.
Diversity, Inclusion, and Belonging
Our 2023 Sustainability Report sets forth our announced goals to further increase the percentage of
women and U.S. minorities in professional and managerial roles and the recruitment and talent
development strategies we have in place to ensure we meet these ambitions. By 2025, Air Products aims
to achieve at least 28 percent female representation in the professional and managerial population
globally, and at least 30 percent minority representation in that same population in the United States.
We established these goals following analysis of our global employee representation metrics and future
talent needs, as well as assessing industry benchmarks and peer companies. For more information on
these initiatives and to access our most recently published Equal Employment Opportunity EEO-1
Report, please refer to our Diversity, Inclusion and Belonging website at
www.airproducts.com/company/diversity. The information posted on our website is not incorporated by
reference into, and does not form part of, this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Compensation
As detailed in our 2023 Sustainability Report, in order to create an engaged workforce, individuals must
be compensated fairly and equitably. A work environment where employees know they belong and
matter includes fair and equitable pay. Our pay practices apply equally to all employees irrespective of
gender, race, religion, disability, age, or any other form of personal diﬀerence. We pay competitively in
local markets where we do business and compete for talent. We benchmark our compensation to ensure
we are keeping pace with the market to provide competitive pay and beneﬁts. Our compensation
programs are generally comprised of base pay, annual variable pay (bonus), and for eligible employees,
long-term incentives (stock awards under the Air Products Long-Term Incentive Plan).
9
Table of Contents
Available Information
All periodic and current reports, registration statements, proxy statements, and other ﬁlings that we are
required to ﬁle with the SEC, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q,
Current Reports on Form 8-K, and amendments to those reports ﬁled or furnished pursuant to
Section 13(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), are available free of charge
through our website at www.airproducts.com. Such documents are available as soon as reasonably
practicable after electronic ﬁling of the material with the SEC. All such reports ﬁled during the period
covered by this report were available on our website on the same day as ﬁling. In addition, our ﬁlings
with the SEC are available free of charge on the SEC's website, www.sec.gov.
Our Executive Oﬃcers
Our executive oﬃcers and their respective positions and ages on 16 November 2023 follow. Information
with respect to oﬃces held is stated in ﬁscal years.
Name Age Oﬃce
Seiﬁ Ghasemi 79Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Oﬃcer (became Chairman,
President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer in 2014 and previously served as
Chairman and Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Rockwood Holdings, Inc. from 2001
to 2014). Mr. Ghasemi is a member and Chairman of the Board of Directors
and the Chairman of the Executive Committee of the Board of Directors.
Sean D. Major 59Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary since 2017.
Previously, Mr. Major served as Executive Vice President, General Counsel
and Secretary for Joy Global Inc. from 2007 to 2017.
Melissa N. Schaeﬀer44Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer (became Senior Vice
President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer in August 2021). Ms. Schaeﬀer joined
the Company in 2016 and most recently served as Vice President, Finance –
GEMTE, Americas, Middle East, and India from 2020 to 2021 and previously
served as Vice President, Chief Audit Executive from 2016 to 2020.
Dr. Samir J. Serhan 62Chief Operating Oﬃcer (Executive Vice President since December 2016 and
Chief Operating Oﬃcer since May 2020). Dr. Serhan served as President,
Global HyCO, from 2014 to 2016 for Praxair Inc. From 2000-2014, he worked
in leadership positions in the U.S. and Germany for The Linde Group,
including as Managing Director of Linde Engineering from 2008-2014.
10
Table of Contents
Item 1A . Risk F actors
Our operations are aﬀected by various risks, many of which are beyond our control. In evaluating
investment in the Company and the forward-looking information contained in this Annual Report on
Form 10-K or presented elsewhere from time to time, you should carefully consider the risk factors
discussed below. Any of these risks could have a material adverse eﬀect on our business, operating
results, ﬁnancial condition, and the actual outcome of matters as to which forward-looking statements
are made and could adversely aﬀect the value of an investment in our securities. The risks described
below are not all inclusive but are designed to highlight what we believe are important factors to
consider when evaluating our expectations. In addition to such risks, there may be additional risks and
uncertainties that adversely aﬀect our business, performance, or ﬁnancial condition in the future that
are not presently known, are not currently believed to be signiﬁcant, or are not identiﬁed below because
they are common to all businesses.
Risks Related to Economic Conditions
Changes in global and regional economic conditions, the markets we serve, or the ﬁnancial markets may
adversely aﬀect our results of operations and cash ﬂows.
Unfavorable conditions in the global economy or regional economies, the markets we serve or ﬁnancial
markets may decrease the demand for our goods and services and adversely impact our revenues,
operating results, and cash ﬂows.
Demand for our products and services depends in part on the general economic conditions aﬀecting the
countries and markets in which we do business. Weak economic conditions in certain geographies and
changing supply and demand balances in the markets we serve have negatively impacted demand for
our products and services in the past and may do so in the future. In addition, our growth strategy is
largely based on demand for technologies and projects that limit the impact of global climate change.
Demand for our solutions could be negatively impacted if public and private actors reduce their focus on
reducing carbon emissions. Reduced demand for our products and services would have a negative
impact on our revenues and earnings. In addition, reduced demand could depress sales, decrease our
margins, constrain our operating ﬂexibility or reduce eﬃcient utilization of our manufacturing capacity,
or result in charges which are unusual or nonrecurring. Excess capacity in our manufacturing facilities or
those of our competitors could decrease our ability to maintain pricing and generate proﬁts.
In addition, our operating results in one or more segments may be aﬀected by uncertain or deteriorating
economic conditions for particular customer markets within a segment. A decline in the industries served
by our customers or adverse events or circumstances aﬀecting individual customers can reduce demand
for our products and services and impair the ability of such customers to satisfy their obligations to us,
resulting in uncollected receivables, unanticipated contract terminations, project delays or the inability
to recover plant investments, any of which may negatively impact our ﬁnancial results.
Weak overall demand or speciﬁc customer conditions may also cause customer shutdowns or defaults or
otherwise make us unable to operate facilities proﬁtably and may force sale or abandonment of facilities
and equipment or prevent projects from coming on-stream when expected. These or other events
associated with weak economic conditions or speciﬁc market, product, or customer events may require
us to record an impairment on tangible assets, such as facilities and equipment, or intangible assets,
such as intellectual property or goodwill, which would have a negative impact on our ﬁnancial results.
Our extensive international operations can be adversely impacted by operational, economic, political,
security, legal, and currency translation risks that could decrease proﬁtability.
In ﬁscal year 2023, approximately 60% of our sales were derived from customers outside the United
States and many of our operations, suppliers, and employees are located outside the United States. Our
operations in foreign jurisdictions may be subject to risks including exchange control regulations, import
and trade restrictions, trade policy and other potentially detrimental domestic and foreign governmental
practices or policies aﬀecting U.S. companies doing business abroad. Changing economic and political
conditions within foreign jurisdictions, strained relations between countries, or the imposition of tariﬀs or
international sanctions can cause ﬂuctuations in demand, price volatility, supply disruptions, or loss of
property. The occurrence of any of these risks could have a material adverse impact on our ﬁnancial
condition, results of operation, and cash ﬂows.
11
Table of Contents
Our growth strategies depend in part on our ability to further penetrate markets outside the United
States, such as China, India, and the Middle East, and involve signiﬁcantly larger and more complex
projects, including gasiﬁcation and large-scale hydrogen projects, some in regions where there is the
potential for signiﬁcant economic and political disruptions. We are actively investing large amounts of
capital and other resources, in some cases through joint ventures, in developing markets, which we
believe to have high growth potential. Our operations in these markets may be subject to greater risks
than those faced by our operations in mature economies, including political and economic instability,
project delay or abandonment due to unanticipated government actions, inadequate investment in
infrastructure, undeveloped property rights and legal systems, unfamiliar regulatory environments,
relationships with local partners, language and cultural diﬀerences and increased diﬃculty recruiting,
training and retaining qualiﬁed employees. In addition, our properties and contracts in these locations
may be subject to seizure and cancellation, respectively, without full compensation for loss. Successful
operation of particular facilities or execution of projects may be disrupted by civil unrest, acts of war,
sabotage or terrorism, and other local security concerns. Such concerns may require us to incur greater
costs for security or require us to shut down operations for a period of time.
Furthermore, because the majority of our revenue is generated from sales outside the United States, we
are exposed to ﬂuctuations in foreign currency exchange rates. Our business is primarily exposed to
translational currency risk as the results of our foreign operations are translated into U.S. dollars at
current exchange rates throughout the ﬁscal period. Our policy is to minimize cash ﬂow volatility from
changes in currency exchange rates. We choose not to hedge the translation of our foreign subsidiaries’
earnings into dollars. Accordingly, reported sales, net earnings, cash ﬂows, and fair values have been,
and in the future will be, aﬀected by changes in foreign exchange rates. For a more detailed discussion
of currency exposure, see Item 7A, Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk, below.
Risks Related to Our Business
Risks related to the approval, execution, and operation of our projects, particularly with respect to our
largest projects, may adversely aﬀect our operations or ﬁnancial results.
A signiﬁcant and growing portion of our business involves clean hydrogen, carbon capture, gasiﬁcation,
and other large-scale projects that involve challenging engineering, procurement and construction
phases that may last several years and involve the investment of billions of dollars. These projects are
technically complex, often reliant on signiﬁcant interaction with government authorities, and face
signiﬁcant ﬁnancing, development, operational, and reputational risks. These projects may also be
subject to complex government approvals, as well as legal or regulatory challenges by government
authorities or third parties. Delays in receiving required approvals or related to litigation could require us
to delay or abandon certain projects, which may result in the incurrence of additional expense, the loss
of invested proceeds and reputational damage.
We have in the past and may in the future encounter diﬃculties related to the development of projects
that may result in delays, scope changes and additional costs. Such diﬃculties may relate to
engineering, delays in designs or materials provided by the customer or a third party, equipment and
materials delivery delays, schedule changes, customer scope changes, delays related to obtaining
regulatory permits and rights-of-way, inability to ﬁnd adequate sources of labor in the locations where
we are building new plants, weather-related delays, delays by customers' contractors in completing their
portion of a project, technical or transportation diﬃculties, cost overruns, supply diﬃculties, geopolitical
risks and other factors, many of which are beyond our control, that may impact our ability to complete a
project within the original delivery schedule. In some cases, delays and additional costs may be
substantial and could have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations.
We also may be required to cancel a project and/or compensate the customer for the delay, which may
also cause us to incur material costs that we may be unable to recover. In addition, in some cases we
seek ﬁnancing for large projects and face market risk associated with the availability and terms of such
ﬁnancing. These ﬁnancing arrangements may require that we comply with certain performance
requirements which, if not met, could result in default and restructuring costs or other losses. All of these
factors could also negatively impact our reputation or relationships with our customers, suppliers and
other third parties, any of which could adversely aﬀect our ability to secure new projects in the future.
In addition, several of our large-scale projects are being built before ﬁnalization of oﬀtake agreements,
which may create uncertainty regarding future pricing and other commercial terms. If we are unable to
enter into favorable commercial agreements with prospective customers, our projected returns could be
adversely impacted, which may harm our business and ﬁnancial performance.
12
Table of Contents
The operation of our facilities, pipelines, and delivery systems inherently entails hazards that require
continuous oversight and control, such as pipeline leaks and ruptures, ﬁre, explosions, toxic releases,
mechanical failures, vehicle accidents, or cyber incidents. If operational risks materialize, they could
result in loss of life, damage to the environment, or loss of production, all of which could negatively
impact our ongoing operations, reputation, ﬁnancial results, and cash ﬂows. In addition, our operating
results are dependent on the continued operation of our production facilities and our ability to meet
customer requirements, which depend, in part, on our ability to properly maintain and replace aging
assets.
We are subject to extensive government regulation in the jurisdictions in which we do business.
Regulations addressing, among other things, import/export restrictions, anti-bribery and corruption, and
taxes, can negatively impact our ﬁnancial condition, results of operation, and cash ﬂows.
We are subject to government regulation in the United States and in the foreign jurisdictions where we
conduct business. The application of laws and regulations to our business is sometimes unclear.
Compliance with laws and regulations may involve signiﬁcant costs or require changes in business
practices that could result in reduced proﬁtability. If there is a determination that we have failed to
comply with applicable laws or regulations, we may be subject to penalties or sanctions that could
adversely impact our reputation and ﬁnancial results. Compliance with changes in laws or regulations
can result in increased operating costs and require additional, unplanned capital expenditures. Export
controls or other regulatory restrictions could prevent us from shipping our products to and from some
markets or increase the cost of doing so. Changes in tax laws and regulations and international tax
treaties could aﬀect the ﬁnancial results of our businesses. Increasingly aggressive enforcement of anti-
bribery and anti-corruption requirements, including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the United
Kingdom Bribery Act and the China Anti-Unfair Competition Law, could subject us to criminal or civil
sanctions if a violation is deemed to have occurred. In addition, we are subject to laws and sanctions
imposed by the U.S. and other jurisdictions where we do business that may prohibit us, or certain of our
aﬃliates, from doing business in certain countries, or restricting the kind of business that we may
conduct. Such restrictions may provide a competitive advantage to competitors who are not subject to
comparable restrictions or prevent us from taking advantage of growth opportunities.
Further, we cannot guarantee that our internal controls and compliance systems will always protect us
from acts committed by employees, agents, business partners or that businesses that we acquire would
not violate U.S. and/or non-U.S. laws, including the laws governing payments to government oﬃcials,
bribery, fraud, kickbacks and false claims, pricing, sales and marketing practices, conﬂicts of interest,
competition, export and import compliance, money laundering, and data privacy. Any such improper
actions or allegations of such acts could damage our reputation and subject us to civil or criminal
investigations in the U.S. and in other jurisdictions and related shareholder lawsuits, could lead to
substantial civil and criminal, monetary and non-monetary penalties, and could cause us to incur
signiﬁcant legal and investigatory fees. In addition, the government may seek to hold us liable as a
successor for violations committed by companies in which we invest or that we acquire.
We may be unable to successfully identify, execute or eﬀectively integrate acquisitions, manage our
joint ventures, or eﬀectively disentangle divested businesses.
Our ability to grow revenue, earnings, and cash ﬂow at anticipated rates depends in part on our ability to
identify, successfully acquire and integrate businesses and assets at appropriate prices, and realize
expected growth, synergies, and operating eﬃciencies. We may not be able to complete transactions on
favorable terms, on a timely basis or at all. In addition, our results of operations and cash ﬂows may be
adversely impacted by the failure of acquired businesses or assets to meet expected returns, the failure
to integrate acquired businesses, the inability to dispose of non-core assets and businesses on
satisfactory terms and conditions, and the discovery of unanticipated liabilities or other problems in
acquired businesses or assets for which we lack adequate contractual protections or insurance. In
addition, we may incur asset impairment charges related to acquisitions that do not meet expectations.
In addition, some of our largest projects involve joint ventures. These arrangements may involve
signiﬁcant risks and uncertainties, including our ability to cooperate with our strategic partners, our
strategic partners having interests or goals that are inconsistent with ours, and the potential that our
strategic partners may be unable to meet their economic or other obligations to the joint venture, which
may negatively impact the expected beneﬁts of the joint venture and cause us to incur additional
expense or suﬀer reputational damage. In addition, due to the nature of these arrangements, we may
have limited ability to direct or inﬂuence the management of the joint venture, which may limit our
ability to assist and oversee the design and implementation of the joint venture’s business as well as its
accounting, legal, governance, human resources, information technology, and other administrative
systems. This may expose us to additional risks and uncertainties because we may be dependent upon
and subject to liability, losses, or reputational damage relating to systems, controls, and personnel that
are not under our control. These risks may be augmented when the joint venture is operating outside the
United States due to diﬀerences in language, culture, and regulation, as well as the factors listed above
that are relevant to our international operations.
13
Table of Contents
We continually assess the strategic ﬁt of our existing businesses and may divest businesses that are
deemed not to ﬁt with our strategic plan or are not achieving the desired return on investment. These
transactions pose risks and challenges that could negatively impact our business and ﬁnancial
statements. For example, when we decide to sell or otherwise dispose of a business or assets, we may
be unable to do so on satisfactory terms within our anticipated time frame or at all. In addition,
divestitures or other dispositions may dilute our earnings per share, have other adverse ﬁnancial and
accounting impacts, distract management, and give rise to disputes with buyers. In addition, we have
agreed, and may in the future agree, to indemnify buyers against known and unknown contingent
liabilities. Our ﬁnancial results could be impacted adversely by claims under these indemniﬁcation
provisions.
The security of our information technology systems could be compromised, which could adversely aﬀect
our ability to operate.
We depend on information technology to enable us to operate safely and eﬃciently and interface with
our customers as well as to maintain our internal control environment and ﬁnancial reporting accuracy
and eﬃciency. Our information technology capabilities are delivered through a combination of internal
and external services and service providers. If we do not allocate and eﬀectively manage the resources
necessary to build and sustain the proper technology infrastructure, we could be subject to transaction
errors, processing ineﬃciencies, the loss of customers, business disruptions, property damage, or the
loss of or damage to our conﬁdential business information due to a security breach. In addition, our
information technology systems may be damaged, disrupted or shut down due to attacks by computer
hackers, computer viruses, employee error or malfeasance, power outages, hardware failures,
telecommunication or utility failures, catastrophes or other unforeseen events, and in any such
circumstances our system redundancy and other disaster recovery planning may be ineﬀective or
inadequate. Security breaches of our systems (or the systems of our customers, suppliers or other
business partners) could result in the misappropriation, destruction or unauthorized access or disclosure
of conﬁdential information or personal data belonging to us or to our employees, partners, customers or
suppliers, and may subject us to legal liability.
As with most large systems, our information technology systems have in the past been, and in the future
likely will be subject to computer viruses, malicious codes, unauthorized access and other cyber-attacks,
and we expect the sophistication and frequency of such attacks to continue to increase. To date, we are
not aware of any signiﬁcant impact on our operations or ﬁnancial results from such attempts; however,
unauthorized access could disrupt our business operations, result in the loss of assets, and have a
material adverse eﬀect on our business, ﬁnancial condition, or results of operations. Any of the attacks,
breaches or other disruptions or damage described above could: interrupt our operations at one or more
sites; delay production and shipments; result in the theft of our and our customers’ intellectual property
and trade secrets; damage customer and business partner relationships and our reputation; result in
defective products or services, physical damage to facilities, pipelines or delivery systems, including
those we own or operate for third parties, legal claims and proceedings, liability and penalties under
privacy laws, or increased costs for security and remediation; or raise concerns regarding our internal
control environment and internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. Each of these consequences could
adversely aﬀect our business, reputation and our ﬁnancial statements.
Our business involves the use, storage, and transmission of information about our employees, vendors,
and customers. The protection of such information, as well as our proprietary information, is critical to
us. The regulatory environment surrounding information security and privacy is increasingly demanding,
with the frequent imposition of new and constantly changing requirements. We have established policies
and procedures to help protect the security and privacy of this information. We also, from time to time,
export sensitive customer data and technical information to recipients outside the United States.
Breaches of our security measures or the accidental loss, inadvertent disclosure, or unapproved
dissemination of proprietary information or sensitive or conﬁdential data about us or our customers,
including the potential loss or disclosure of such information or data as a result of fraud, trickery, or
other forms of deception, could expose us, our customers, or the individuals aﬀected to a risk of loss or
misuse of this information, which could ultimately result in litigation and potential legal and ﬁnancial
liability. These events could also damage our reputation or otherwise harm our business.
Interruption in ordinary sources of raw material or energy supply or an inability to recover increases in
energy and raw material costs from customers could result in lost sales or reduced proﬁtability.
Hydrocarbons, including natural gas, are the primary feedstock for the production of hydrogen, carbon
monoxide, and syngas. Energy, including electricity, natural gas, and diesel fuel for delivery trucks, is
the largest cost component of our business. Because our industrial gas facilities use substantial amounts
of electricity, inﬂation and energy price ﬂuctuations have impacted our revenues and earnings and may
continue to do so in the future. A disruption in the supply of energy, components, or raw materials,
whether due to market conditions, legislative or regulatory actions, natural disasters, public health crises
and pandemics, or other disruption, could prevent us from meeting our contractual commitments and
harm our business and ﬁnancial results.
14
Table of Contents
Our supply of crude helium for puriﬁcation and resale is largely dependent upon natural gas production
by crude helium suppliers. Lower natural gas production resulting from natural gas pricing dynamics,
supplier operating or transportation issues, or other interruptions in sales from crude helium suppliers,
can reduce our supplies of crude helium available for processing and resale to customers.
We typically contract to pass-through cost increases in energy and raw materials to customers, but such
cost pass-through results in declining margins, and cost variability can negatively impact our other
operating results. For example, we may be unable to raise prices as quickly as costs rise, or competitive
pressures may prevent full recovery of such costs. In addition, increases in energy or raw material costs
that cannot be passed on to customers for competitive or other reasons may negatively impact our
revenues and earnings. Even where costs are passed through, price increases can cause lower sales
volume.
New technologies create performance risks that could impact our ﬁnancial results or reputation.
We are continually developing and implementing new technologies and product oﬀerings. Existing
technologies are being implemented in products and designs or at scales beyond our experience base.
These technological expansions can create nontraditional performance risks to our operations. Failure of
the technologies to work as predicted, or unintended consequences of new designs or uses, could lead
to cost overruns, project delays, ﬁnancial penalties, or damage to our reputation. We may face
diﬃculties marketing products produced using new technologies including, but not limited to, green
hydrogen, which may adversely impact our sales and ﬁnancial results. In addition, certain large-scale
projects may contain processes or technologies that we have not operated at the same scale or in the
same combination, and although such projects generally include technologies and processes that have
been demonstrated previously by others, such technologies or processes may be new to us and may
introduce new risks to our operations. Additionally, there is also a risk that our new technologies may
become obsolete and be replaced by other market alternatives. Performance diﬃculties on these larger
projects may have a material adverse eﬀect on our operations and ﬁnancial results. In addition,
performance challenges may adversely aﬀect our reputation and our ability to obtain future contracts.
Protecting our intellectual property is critical to our technological development, and we may suﬀer
competitive harm from infringement on such rights.
As we develop new technologies, it is critical that we protect our intellectual property assets against
third-party infringement. We own a number of patents and other forms of intellectual property related to
our products and services. As we develop new technologies there is a risk that our patent applications
may not be granted, or we may not receive suﬃcient protection of our proprietary interests. We may
also expend considerable resources in defending our patents against third-party infringement. It is
critical that we protect our proprietary interests to prevent competitive harm.
Legal and Regulatory Risks
Legislative, regulatory, societal, and market eﬀorts to address global climate change may impact our
business and create ﬁnancial risk.
We are the world’s leading supplier of hydrogen, the primary use of which is the production of ultra-low
sulfur transportation fuels that have signiﬁcantly reduced transportation emissions and helped improve
human health. To make the high volumes of hydrogen needed by our customers, we have historically
used steam methane reforming to produce hydrogen without carbon capture (i.e., "gray hydrogen"),
which results in the emission of carbon dioxide. In addition, gasiﬁcation enables the conversion of lower
value feedstocks into cleaner energy and value-added products; however, our gasiﬁcation projects also
produce carbon dioxide. Some of our operations are within jurisdictions that have or are developing
regulatory regimes governing disclosure of GHG emissions, including CO, such as the European Union's
CSRD, California’s Climate Corporate Data Accountability Act and Climate Related Financial Risk Act, and
similar regulations under consideration by the SEC, which may lead to direct and indirect costs on our
operations. We could also face scrutiny from stakeholders regarding our reporting under various
frameworks for disclosing GHG emissions-related data, including those we use currently in our
sustainability reporting. If our GHG emissions-related data, processes, and reporting are incomplete or
inaccurate, or if we fail to comply with relevant reporting frameworks from newly emerging regulations,
we may incur monetary penalties and reputational harm, and we could become subject to litigation or
government investigations, which may also adversely aﬀect our reputation and business.2
15
Table of Contents
Increased public concern and governmental action may result in more international, U.S. federal and/or
regional requirements to reduce or mitigate the eﬀects of GHG emissions or increased demand for
technologies and projects to limit the impact of global climate change. Although uncertain, these
developments could increase our costs related to consumption of electric power, hydrogen production,
and application of our gasiﬁcation technology, although these developments may be mitigated by our
growth strategy focused on world-scale clean hydrogen projects. We believe we will be able to mitigate
some of the increased costs through contractual terms, but the lack of deﬁnitive legislation or regulatory
requirements prevents an accurate estimate of the long-term impact these measures will have on our
operations. Any legislation or governmental action that limits or taxes GHG emissions could negatively
impact our growth, increase our operating costs, or reduce demand for certain of our products,
particularly for our core industrial gases business.
In addition, our growth strategy is partially dependent on a regulatory environment that favors
technologies focused on limiting the impact of climate change, in particular toward the production and
distribution of clean hydrogen. For example, we anticipate beneﬁts from tax incentives created by the
U.S. Inﬂation Reduction Act of 2022 for carbon sequestration and clean hydrogen production in future
years once our projects in these areas come on-stream in the U.S. If there is a reversal in the regulatory
environment or a discontinuation or reduction of incentives or beneﬁts for the development of
technologies limiting the impact of climate change, particularly those focused on low- and zero-carbon
hydrogen production, demand for our products may be less than we anticipate and certain projects and
our long-term growth strategy could be adversely aﬀected, which could adversely aﬀect our business
and ﬁnancial performance.
Our operations may present a safety risk to our employees.
Notwithstanding our emphasis on the safety of our employees and contractors and the precautions we
take related to health and safety, we may be unable to avoid safety incidents relating to our operations
that result in injuries or deaths. Certain safety incidents may result in legal or regulatory action that
could result in increased expenses or reputational damage. We maintain workers' compensation
insurance to address the risk of incurring material liabilities for injuries or deaths, but there can be no
assurance that the insurance coverage will be adequate or will continue to be available on terms
acceptable to us, or at all, which could result in material liabilities to us for any injuries or deaths.
Changes to federal, state, and local employee health and safety regulations, and legislative, regulatory,
or societal responses to safety incidents may result in heightened regulations or public scrutiny that may
increase our compliance costs or result in reputational damage.
Our business depends on our ability to attract, develop, engage, and retain qualiﬁed employees.
Our success depends on our ability to attract, develop, engage, and retain employees with the skills
necessary to our business. Competitive labor market conditions have resulted in increased demand for
qualiﬁed personnel, which makes it diﬃcult to attract, hire, and retain employees with specialized
technical experience. In addition, the increasing number of experienced employees becoming
retirement-eligible and our company headcount growth further amplify this challenge. The number of our
employees has grown both internationally and in the United States, with our total headcount increasing
from approximately 16,300 at the end of ﬁscal 2018 to approximately 23,000 at the end of ﬁscal 2023.
Our results of operations have been and in the future could be adversely aﬀected by increased costs due
to increased competition for skilled talent in the market. In addition, increased turnover and decreased
tenure of employees may impact productivity, costs, and organizational culture. We undertake
signiﬁcant eﬀorts to hire, engage, and retain our employees and to eﬀectively manage workforce costs,
even with rapid political, social, and economic shifts in our markets. If these eﬀorts are unsuccessful, our
growth may be limited and we may suﬀer ﬁnancial or reputational harm that could have a material
adverse eﬀect on our business, ﬁnancial condition, or results of operations.
Our ﬁnancial results may be aﬀected by various legal and regulatory proceedings, including antitrust,
tax, environmental, or other matters.
We are subject to litigation and regulatory investigations and proceedings in the normal course of
business and could become subject to additional claims in the future, some of which could be material.
While we seek to limit our liability in our commercial contractual arrangements, there are no guarantees
that each contract will contain suitable limitations of liability or that limitations of liability will be
enforceable. Also, the outcome of existing legal proceedings may diﬀer from our expectations because
the outcomes of litigation, including regulatory matters, are often diﬃcult to predict reliably. Various
factors or developments can lead us to change current estimates of liabilities and related insurance
receivables, where applicable, or make such estimates for matters previously not susceptible to
reasonable estimates, such as a signiﬁcant judicial ruling or judgment, a signiﬁcant settlement,
signiﬁcant regulatory developments, or changes in applicable law. A future adverse ruling, settlement, or
unfavorable development could result in charges that could have a material adverse eﬀect on our
ﬁnancial condition, results of operations, and cash ﬂows in any particular period.
16
Table of Contents
Costs and expenses resulting from compliance with environmental regulations may negatively impact
our operations and ﬁnancial results.
We are subject to extensive federal, state, local, and foreign environmental and safety laws and
regulations concerning, among other things, emissions in the air; discharges to land and water; and the
generation, handling, treatment, and disposal of hazardous waste and other materials. We take our
environmental responsibilities very seriously, but there is a risk of adverse environmental impact
inherent in our manufacturing operations and in the transportation of our products. Future developments
and more stringent environmental regulations may require us to make additional unforeseen
environmental expenditures. In addition, laws and regulations may require signiﬁcant expenditures for
environmental protection equipment, compliance, and remediation. These additional costs may
adversely aﬀect our ﬁnancial results. For a more detailed description of these matters, see Item 1,
Business–Environmental Regulation, above.
A change of tax law in key jurisdictions could result in a material increase in our tax expense.
The multinational nature of our business subjects us to taxation in the United States and numerous
foreign jurisdictions. Due to economic and political conditions, tax rates in various jurisdictions may be
subject to signiﬁcant change. Our future eﬀective tax rates could be aﬀected by changes in the mix of
earnings in countries with diﬀering statutory tax rates, changes in the valuation of deferred tax assets
and liabilities, or changes in tax laws or their interpretation.
Changes to income tax laws and regulations in any of the jurisdictions in which we operate, or in the
interpretation of such laws, could signiﬁcantly increase our eﬀective tax rate and adversely impact our
ﬁnancial condition, results of operations, or cash ﬂows. Various levels of government, including the U.S.
federal government, are increasingly focused on tax reform and other legislative action to increase tax
revenue. Further changes in tax laws in the U.S. or foreign jurisdictions where we operate could have a
material adverse eﬀect on our business, results of operations, or ﬁnancial condition.
General Risk Factors
Catastrophic events could disrupt our operations or the operations of our suppliers or customers, having
a negative impact on our business, ﬁnancial results, and cash ﬂows.
Our operations could be impacted by catastrophic events outside our control, including severe weather
conditions such as hurricanes, ﬂoods, earthquakes, storms, epidemics, pandemics, acts of war, and
terrorism. Any such event could cause a serious business disruption that could aﬀect our ability to
produce and distribute products and possibly expose us to third-party liability claims. Additionally, such
events could impact our suppliers, customers, and partners, which could cause energy and raw
materials to be unavailable to us, or our customers to be unable to purchase or accept our products and
services. Any such occurrence could have a negative impact on our operations and ﬁnancial results.
Inability to compete eﬀectively in a segment could adversely impact sales and ﬁnancial performance.
We face strong competition from large global competitors and many smaller regional competitors in
many of our business segments. Introduction by competitors of new technologies, competing products,
or additional capacity could weaken demand for, or impact pricing of our products, negatively impacting
ﬁnancial results. In addition, competitors’ pricing policies could aﬀect our proﬁtability or market share.
Item 1B. Unresolved Staﬀ Comments
We have not received any written comments from the Commission staﬀ that remain unresolved.
17
Table of Contents
Item 2. Properties
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. owns its principal administrative oﬃces located at the Company's new
global headquarters and co-located research and development facility in Allentown, Pennsylvania, as
well as regional oﬃces in Hersham, England; Medellin, Colombia; and Santiago, Chile. We lease the
principal administrative oﬃces in Shanghai, China; Pune, India; Vadodara, India; and Dhahran, Saudi
Arabia. We lease administrative oﬃces in the United States, Canada, Spain, Malaysia, and China,
primarily for our Finance and Business Services organization.
Descriptions of the properties used by our ﬁve business segments are provided below. We believe that
our facilities are suitable and adequate for our current and anticipated future levels of operation.
Americas
Our Americas segment operates from approximately 450 production and distribution facilities in North
and South America. Of these facilities, approximately 25% are located on owned property. We have
suﬃcient property rights and permits for the ongoing operation of our pipeline systems in the Gulf Coast,
California, and Arizona in the United States and Alberta and Ontario in Canada. Management and sales
support is based in our Allentown, Medellin, and Santiago oﬃces referred to above, and at approximately
20 leased properties located throughout North and South America.
Asia
Our Asia segment operates from approximately 300 production and distribution facilities within the
region, of which approximately 35% are on owned property or long-duration term grants. We have
suﬃcient property rights and permits for the ongoing operation of our pipeline systems in China, South
Korea, Taiwan, Malaysia, Singapore, and Indonesia. Management and sales support for this business
segment is based in Shanghai, China, and Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia, and in approximately 35 leased oﬃce
locations throughout the region.
Europe
Our Europe segment operates from approximately 210 production and distribution facilities in Europe, of
which approximately 35% are on owned property. We have suﬃcient property rights and permits for the
ongoing operation of our pipeline systems in the Netherlands, the United Kingdom, Belgium, France, and
Germany. Management and sales support for this business segment is based in Hersham, England;
Barcelona, Spain; and at 15 leased regional oﬃce sites and 10 leased local oﬃce sites throughout the
region.
Middle East and India
Our Middle East and India segment operates from approximately 15 production and distribution facilities
throughout the region, all of which are leasehold properties. Management and sales support for this
business segment are based in Dharan, Saudi Arabia; Dubai, United Arab Emirates; and Pune, India; as
well as approximately 10 leased local oﬃce sites throughout the region.
Corporate and other
This business segment includes our sale of equipment businesses for which equipment is manufactured
in Missouri in the United States and Shanghai, China. The LNG business operates a manufacturing facility
in Florida in the United States with management, engineering, and sales support based in the Allentown
oﬃces referred to above. The Gardner Cryogenic business operates at facilities in Pennsylvania and
Kansas in the United States. The Rotoﬂow business operates manufacturing and service facilities in
Texas and Pennsylvania in the United States with management, engineering, and sales support based in
the Allentown oﬃces referred to above and a nearby leased oﬃce.
Research and development activities are primarily conducted at owned locations in the United States,
the United Kingdom, and Saudi Arabia.
Helium is processed at multiple sites in the United States and then distributed to and from transﬁll sites
globally.
Our Corporate and other segment also has management, sales, engineering support, and corporate
administrative functions that are based in our administrative oﬃces referred to above.
18
Table of Contents
Item 3. Legal Proceedings
In the normal course of business, we and our subsidiaries are involved in various legal proceedings,
including commercial, competition, environmental, intellectual property, regulatory, product liability, and
insurance matters. Although litigation with respect to these matters is routine and incidental to the
conduct of our business, such litigation could result in large monetary awards, especially if
compensatory and/or punitive damages are awarded. However, we believe that litigation currently
pending to which we are a party will be resolved without any material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial
position, earnings, or cash ﬂows.
From time to time, we are also involved in proceedings, investigations, and audits involving
governmental authorities in connection with environmental, health, safety, competition, and tax matters.
We are a party to proceedings under CERCLA, RCRA, and similar state and foreign environmental laws
relating to the designation of certain sites for investigation or remediation. Presently there are 27 sites
on which a ﬁnal settlement has not been reached where we, usually along with others, have been
designated a potentially responsible party by the Environmental Protection Agency or are otherwise
engaged in investigation or remediation, including cleanup activity at certain of our current and former
manufacturing sites. We do not expect that any sums we may have to pay in connection with these
environmental matters would have a material adverse impact on our consolidated ﬁnancial position.
Additional information on our environmental exposure is included under Item 1, Business–Environmental
Regulation, and Note 18, Commitments and Contingencies, to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements.
In September 2010, the Brazilian Administrative Council for Economic Defense ("CADE") issued a
decision against our Brazilian subsidiary, Air Products Brasil Ltda., and several other Brazilian industrial
gas companies for alleged anticompetitive activities. CADE imposed a civil ﬁne of R$179.2 million
(approximately $36 million at 30 September 2023) on Air Products Brasil Ltda. This ﬁne was based on a
recommendation by a unit of the Brazilian Ministry of Justice, following an investigation beginning in
2003, which alleged violation of competition laws with respect to the sale of industrial and medical
gases. The ﬁnes are based on a percentage of our total revenue in Brazil in 2003.
We have denied the allegations made by the authorities and ﬁled an appeal in October 2010 with the
Brazilian courts. On 6 May 2014, our appeal was granted and the ﬁne against Air Products Brasil Ltda.
was dismissed. CADE has appealed that ruling and the matter remains pending. We, with advice of our
outside legal counsel, have assessed the status of this matter and have concluded that, although an
adverse ﬁnal judgment after exhausting all appeals is possible, such a judgment is not probable. As a
result, no provision has been made in the consolidated ﬁnancial statements. In the event of an adverse
ﬁnal judgment, we estimate the maximum possible loss to be the full amount of the ﬁne of R$179.2
million (approximately $36 million at 30 September 2023) plus interest accrued thereon until ﬁnal
disposition of the proceedings.
In April 2023, we received a favorable ruling from a Texas state court in litigation involving disputed
energy management charges related to Winter Storm Uri, a severe winter weather storm that impacted
the U.S. Gulf Coast in February 2021. The ruling is subject to appeal and had no impact on our
consolidated ﬁnancial statements for the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2023.
Other than the matters discussed above, we do not currently believe there are any legal proceedings,
individually or in the aggregate, that are reasonably possible to have a material impact on our ﬁnancial
condition, results of operations, or cash ﬂows. However, a future charge for regulatory ﬁnes or damage
awards could have a signiﬁcant impact on our net income in the period in which it is recorded.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable.
19
Table of Contents
PART II
Item 5. Mark et for Registrant's Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters,
and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Our common stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol "APD." As of 31 October
2023, there were 4,425 record holders of our common stock.
Cash dividends on our common stock are paid quarterly. We expect to continue increasing our quarterly
dividend as we have done for the last 41 consecutive years. The Board of Directors determines whether
to declare dividends and the timing and amount based on ﬁnancial condition and other factors it deems
relevant. Dividend information for each quarter of ﬁscal years 2023 and 2022 is summarized below:
2023 2022
Fourth quarter $1.75  $1.62 
Third quarter 1.75  1.62 
Second quarter 1.75  1.62 
First quarter 1.62  1.50 
Total $6.87  $6.36 
Purchases of Equity Securities by the Issuer
On 15 September 2011, the Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to $1.0 billion of our
outstanding common stock. This program does not have a stated expiration date. If we repurchase
shares pursuant to this authorization, we may do so under Rules 10b5-1 and 10b-18 under the Exchange
Act through repurchase agreements established with one or more brokers. We did not purchase any of
our outstanding shares during ﬁscal year 2023. As of 30 September 2023, $485.3 million in share
repurchase authorization remained. Any future purchases will be completed at our discretion while
maintaining suﬃcient funds for investing in our business and pursuing growth opportunities.
20
Table of Contents
Performance Graph
The performance graph below compares the ﬁve-year cumulative returns of our common stock with
those of the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index ("S&P 500 Index") and the Standard & Poor’s 500 Materials
Index ("S&P 500 Materials Index"). The ﬁgures assume an initial investment of $100 and the
reinvestment of all dividends.
Sept
2018Sept
2019Sept
2020Sept
2021Sept
2022Sept
2023
Air Products & Chemicals, Inc. 100 136 186 164 153 198
S&P 500 Index 100 104 120 156 132 160
S&P 500 Materials Index 100 103 115 146 128 151
Item 6. [Reserved]
Not applicable.
21
Table of Contents
Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations
Business Overview 23
2023 in Summary 23
Outlook 26
Results of Operations 26
Reconciliations of Non-GAAP Financial Measures 33
Liquidity and Capital Resources 39
Pension Beneﬁts 43
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates 44
This Management’s Discussion and Analysis contains “forward-looking statements” within the safe
harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about
business outlook. These forward-looking statements are based on management’s expectations and
assumptions as of the date of this Annual Report on Form 10-K and are not guarantees of future
performance. Actual performance and ﬁnancial results may diﬀer materially from projections and
estimates expressed in the forward-looking statements because of many factors not anticipated by
management, including, without limitation, those described in "Forward-Looking Statements" and Item
1A, Risk Factors, of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
This discussion should be read in conjunction with the consolidated ﬁnancial statements and the
accompanying notes contained in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Unless otherwise stated, ﬁnancial
information is presented in millions of U.S. Dollars, except for per share data. Except for net income,
which includes the results of discontinued operations, ﬁnancial information is presented on a continuing
operations basis.
The ﬁnancial measures discussed below are presented in accordance with U.S. generally accepted
accounting principles ("GAAP"), except as noted. We present certain ﬁnancial measures on an
"adjusted," or "non-GAAP," basis because we believe such measures, when viewed together with
ﬁnancial results computed in accordance with GAAP, provide a more complete understanding of the
factors and trends aﬀecting our historical ﬁnancial performance. For each non-GAAP ﬁnancial measure,
including adjusted diluted earnings per share ("EPS"), adjusted EBITDA, adjusted EBITDA margin,
adjusted eﬀective tax rate, and capital expenditures, we present a reconciliation to the most directly
comparable ﬁnancial measure calculated in accordance with GAAP. These reconciliations and
explanations regarding the use of non-GAAP measures are presented under the “Reconciliations of Non-
GAAP Financial Measures” section beginning on page 33.
Comparisons included in the discussion that follows are for ﬁscal year 2023 versus ("vs.") ﬁscal year
2022. A discussion of changes from ﬁscal year 2021 to ﬁscal year 2022 and other ﬁnancial information
related to ﬁscal year 2021 is available in Part II, Item 7, Management’s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations, of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the ﬁscal year
ended 30 September 2022, which was ﬁled with the SEC on 22 November 2022.
For information concerning activity with our related parties, refer to Note 24, Supplemental Information,
to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements.
22
Table of Contents
BUSINES S OVERVIEW
Founded in 1940, Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. is a world-leading industrial gases company that has
built a reputation for its innovative culture, operational excellence, and commitment to safety and the
environment. Approximately 23,000 passionate, talented, and committed employees from diverse
backgrounds together are driven by Air Products’ higher purpose to create innovative solutions that
beneﬁt the environment, enhance sustainability, and reimagine what is possible to address the
challenges facing customers, communities, and the world.
Our products and services enable our customers to improve their environmental performance, product
quality, and productivity. Our core business provides essential gases, related equipment, and
applications expertise to customers in dozens of industries, including reﬁning, chemicals, metals,
electronics, manufacturing, medical, and food. We also develop, engineer, build, own, and operate some
of the world’s largest clean hydrogen projects that will support the transition to low- and zero-carbon
energy in the heavy-duty transportation and industrial sectors. Additionally, we are the world leader in
the supply of LNG process technology and equipment and provide turbomachinery, membrane systems,
and cryogenic containers globally. For additional information on our product and service oﬀerings,
including production, distribution, and end use, refer to Item 1, Business, of this Annual Report on Form
10-K.
Air Products conducts business in approximately 50 countries and regions throughout the world. Our
industrial gases business is organized and operated regionally in the Americas, Asia, Europe, and Middle
East and India segments and generates the majority of our sales via our on-site and merchant supply
modes. Approximately half our total revenue is generated through the on-site supply mode, which is
governed by contracts that are generally long-term in nature with provisions that allow us to pass
through changes in energy costs to our customers. Our Corporate and other segment includes the
results of our sale of equipment businesses, costs for corporate support functions and global
management activities, and other income and expenses not directly associated with the regional
segments, such as foreign exchange gains and losses. For additional information regarding our supply
modes and business segments, refer to Note 6, Revenue Recognition, and Note 25, Business Segment
and Geographic Information, to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements.
2023 IN SUMMAR Y
In ﬁscal year 2023, we achieved earnings growth through pricing discipline in our merchant business as
well as improved on-site volumes, including higher demand for hydrogen, despite inﬂation, higher
maintenance activities, and higher costs to support our long-term strategy. Due to the structure of our
contracts, which generally contain ﬁxed monthly charges and/or minimum purchase requirements, our
on-site business generates stable cash ﬂow and consistently contributes about half our total sales,
regardless of the economic environment. We also recognized higher income from our equity aﬃliates
due to the contribution of the second phase of the Jazan gasiﬁcation and power project and positive
results from other unconsolidated joint ventures across the regions.
Additionally, we successfully secured capital to fund low- and zero-carbon hydrogen growth projects. In
March, we issued our inaugural green bonds in concurrent $600 and €700 million debt oﬀerings, making
Air Products the ﬁrst U.S. chemical company to qualify green and blue hydrogen projects as an eligible
expenditure category. Additionally, in May, our NEOM Green Hydrogen Company joint venture completed
ﬁnancial close on the world’s largest green hydrogen-based ammonia production facility, securing $6.1
billion of non-recourse ﬁnancing from local, regional, and international banks and ﬁnancial institutions.
This funding is an important strategic milestone that will allow us to continue executing projects that will
accelerate the energy transition while creating long-term value for our shareholders.
In addition to investing in high return projects, we believe creating shareholder value includes paying
quarterly cash dividends on our common stock, which we have increased for 41 consecutive years. In
ﬁscal year 2023, we increased our dividend to $1.75 per share, representing an 8% increase, or $0.13
per share, from the previous dividend of $1.62 per share.
23
Table of Contents
Fiscal Year 2023 Highlights
•Sales of $12.6 billion decreased 1%, or $98.6, as lower energy cost pass-through to customers of
6% and unfavorable currency of 3% were mostly oﬀset by higher pricing of 5% and higher volumes
of 3%.
•Operating income of $2.5 billion increased 7%, or $155.8, as our pricing actions and higher
volumes were partially oﬀset by higher costs and unfavorable currency. Additionally, we recorded
higher charges for business and asset actions in ﬁscal year 2023 compared to ﬁscal year 2022.
Operating margin of 19.8% increased 140 basis points ("bp") from 18.4% in the prior year, which
included a positive impact from lower energy cost pass-through to customers in 2023.
•Equity aﬃliates' income of $604.3 increased 26%, or $122.8, primarily due to a higher contribution
from the Jazan Integrated Gasiﬁcation and Power Company ("JIGPC") joint venture, which
completed the second phase of the asset purchase associated with the Jazan gasiﬁcation and
power project in January 2023, as well as higher income from our aﬃliates in Italy and Mexico. The
prior year included recognition of the remaining deferred proﬁt associated with air separation units
previously sold to Jazan Gas Project Company, which was partially oﬀset by an impairment charge
related to two small aﬃliates in our Asia segment.
•Net income of $2.3 billion increased 3%, or $72.1, primarily due to favorable pricing, net of power
and fuel costs, partially oﬀset by a charge for business and asset actions, higher non-service
pension costs, and higher other costs. Net income margin of 18.6% increased 80 bp from 17.8% in
the prior year, which included a positive impact from lower energy cost pass-through.
•Adjusted EBITDA of $4.7 billion increased 11%, or $454.8, and adjusted EBITDA margin of 37.3%
increased 390 bp from 33.4% in the prior year.
•Diluted EPS of $10.30 increased 2%, or $0.22 per share, and adjusted diluted EPS of $11.51
increased 12%, or $1.26 per share. A summary table of changes in diluted EPS is presented below.
24
Table of Contents
Changes in Diluted EPS Attributable to Air Products
The per share impacts presented in the table below were calculated independently and may not sum to
the total change in diluted EPS due to rounding.
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022Increase
(Decrease)
Total Diluted EPS $10.33  $10.14  $0.19 
Less: Diluted EPS from income from discontinued operations 0.03  0.06  (0.03)
Diluted EPS From Continuing Operations $10.30  $10.08  $0.22 
% Change from prior year 2 %
Operating Impacts
Underlying business
Volume $0.22 
Price, net of variable costs 2.39 
Other costs (1.11)
Currency (0.29)
Business and asset actions (0.65)
Total Operating Impacts $0.56 
Other Impacts
Equity aﬃliates' income $0.40 
Equity method investment impairment charge 0.05 
Interest expense (0.18)
Other non-operating income/expense, net, excluding discrete item below 0.11 
Non-service pension cost/beneﬁt, net (0.44)
Change in eﬀective tax rate (0.12)
Noncontrolling interests (0.15)
Weighted average diluted shares (0.01)
Total Other Impacts ($0.34)
Total Change in Diluted EPS From Continuing
Operations $0.22 
% Change from prior year 2 %
The table below summarizes the diluted per share impact of our non-GAAP adjustments in ﬁscal years
2023 and 2022:
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022Increase
(Decrease)
Diluted EPS From Continuing Operations $10.30  $10.08  $0.22 
Business and asset actions 0.92  0.27  0.65 
Equity method investment impairment charge —  0.05  (0.05)
Non-service pension cost (beneﬁt), net 0.29  (0.15) 0.44 
Adjusted Diluted EPS From Continuing Operations $11.51  $10.25  $1.26 
% Change from prior year 12 %
25
Table of Contents
OUTL OOK
The guidance below should be read in conjunction with the Forward-Looking Statements of this Annual
Report on Form 10-K.
The ﬁrst pillar of our two-pillar growth strategy is our core industrial gas business, which is supported by
a consistent stream of revenue due to the structure of our on-site contracts. We expect new on-site
projects, including the natural gas-to-syngas processing facility in Uzbekistan, as well as several new
LNG sale of equipment projects to contribute to our results in 2024. To mitigate the impact of ongoing
inﬂationary pressures, we are focused on actions we can control, such as maintaining pricing discipline
in our merchant business. Additionally, we expect to see cost improvement in certain areas of our
organization as a result of strategic business actions taken earlier in 2023.
The second pillar of our strategy is our blue and green hydrogen projects, many of which are already
under execution. We anticipate beneﬁts from tax incentives created by the U.S. Inﬂation Reduction Act of
2022 for carbon sequestration and clean hydrogen production in future years once our projects in these
areas come on-stream, such as our blue hydrogen and blue ammonia clean energy complex in Louisiana.
We are also gaining support from foreign regulators for our projects outside the U.S., including the
recently announced blue hydrogen project in the Netherlands. We believe the infrastructure readiness
we are preparing now will continue to be a competitive advantage for Air Products, allowing us to create
sustainable growth opportunities that deliver value to our shareholders, customers, employees, and
communities around the world.
RESUL TS OF OPERA TIONS
DISCUSSION OF CONSOLIDATED RESULTS
Change vs. Prior Year
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %/bp
GAAP Measures
Sales $12,600.0 $12,698.6 ($98.6) (1 %)
Operating income 2,494.6 2,338.8 155.8  7 %
Operating margin 19.8 % 18.4 % 140 bp
Equity aﬃliates’ income $604.3 $481.5 $122.8  26 %
Net income 2,338.6 2,266.5 72.1  3 %
Net income margin 18.6 % 17.8 % 80 bp
Non-GAAP Measures
Adjusted EBITDA $4,701.8 $4,247.0 $454.8  11 %
Adjusted EBITDA margin 37.3 % 33.4 % 390 bp
Sales
The table below summarizes the major factors that impacted consolidated sales for the periods
presented:
Volume 3 %
Price 5 %
Energy cost pass-through to customers (6 %)
Currency (3 %)
Total Consolidated Sales Change (1 %)
Sales of $12.6 billion decreased 1%, or $98.6, as lower energy cost pass-through to customers of 6% and
unfavorable currency of 3% were mostly oﬀset by higher pricing of 5% and higher volumes of 3%. Lower
natural gas prices in the Americas and Europe segments drove the lower energy cost pass-through to
our on-site customers. Unfavorable currency was primarily attributable to strengthening of the U.S.
Dollar against the Chinese Renminbi. Pricing actions in our merchant business improved sales across
each of our regional segments, while the volume improvement was primarily attributable to our on-site
business in the Americas and Asia segments.
26
Table of Contents
Cost of Sales and Gross Margin
Cost of sales of $8.8 billion decreased 5%, or $505.5, due to lower energy cost pass-through to
customers of $791 and a favorable impact from currency of $213, partially oﬀset by higher costs
associated with sales volumes of $311 and unfavorable other costs of $188. The unfavorable costs were
driven by inﬂation, project development activities, and planned maintenance. Gross margin of 29.9%
increased 340 bp from 26.5% in the prior year primarily due to favorable pricing and lower energy cost
pass-through to customers, partially oﬀset by the impact of higher costs. The favorable impact from
lower energy cost pass-through to customers was about 200 bp.
Selling and Administrative Expense
Selling and administrative expense of $957.0 increased 6%, or $56.4, primarily due to higher employee
compensation, inﬂation, and additional costs to support growth, partially oﬀset by a favorable impact
from currency. Selling and administrative expense as a percentage of sales increased to 7.6% from 7.1%
in the prior year.
Research and Development Expense
Research and development expense of $105.6 increased 3%, or $2.7. Research and development
expense as a percentage of sales of 0.8% was ﬂat versus the prior year.
Business and Asset Actions
In ﬁscal year 2023, we recorded a charge of $244.6 ($204.9 attributable to Air Products after tax, or
$0.92 per share) for strategic actions intended to optimize costs and focus resources on our growth
projects. Of the expense, $217.6 resulted from noncash charges to write oﬀ assets associated with
exited projects that were previously under construction. The remaining expense included $27.0 for
severance and other beneﬁts associated with position eliminations and restructuring of certain
organizations globally. Refer to Note 4, Business and Asset Actions, for additional information.
In ﬁscal year 2022, we divested our small industrial gas business in Russia due to Russia's invasion of
Ukraine. As a result, we recorded a noncash charge of $73.7 ($61.0 after tax, or $0.27 per share), which
included transaction costs and cumulative currency translation losses.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income of $34.8 decreased 38%, or $21.1, primarily due to lower income from the sale of assets
and fees charged to our equity aﬃliates for use of patents and technology as well as an unfavorable
foreign exchange impact.
Operating Income and Margin
Operating income of $2.5 billion increased 7%, or $155.8. Positive pricing, net of power and fuel costs, of
$649 and higher volumes of $58 were partially oﬀset by higher costs of $302 and an unfavorable
currency impact of $78. The higher costs were driven by inﬂation, planned maintenance, and incentive
compensation, as well as project development and other costs related to the execution of our growth
strategy. Additionally, as discussed above, we recorded higher charges for business and asset actions in
ﬁscal year 2023 compared to ﬁscal year 2022. Operating margin of 19.8% increased 140 bp from 18.4%
in the prior year, primarily due to the impact of pricing as well as lower energy cost pass-through to
customers, which positively impacted margin by about 100 basis points, partially oﬀset by higher
charges for business and asset actions and higher other costs.
Equity Aﬃliates’ Income
Equity aﬃliates' income of $604.3 increased 26%, or $122.8, primarily due to a higher contribution from
the JIGPC joint venture, which completed the second phase of the asset purchase associated with the
Jazan gasiﬁcation and power project in January 2023, as well as higher income from our aﬃliates in Italy
and Mexico. Additionally, the prior year included an impairment charge of $14.8 ($11.1 after tax, or
$0.05 per share) related to two small aﬃliates in the Asia segment. These impacts were partially oﬀset
by the prior year recognition of the remaining deferred proﬁt associated with air separation units
previously sold to Jazan Gas Project Company, net of other project ﬁnalization costs.
For additional information on our equity aﬃliates, refer to Note 9, Equity Aﬃliates, to the consolidated
ﬁnancial statements.
27
Table of Contents
Interest Expense
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022
Interest incurred $292.9  $169.0 
Less: Capitalized interest 115.4  41.0 
Interest expense $177.5  $128.0 
Interest incurred increased 73%, or $123.9, driven by a higher average interest rate on variable-rate
instruments in our debt portfolio as well as a higher debt balance, which is largely attributable to the
U.S. Dollar- and Euro-denominated ﬁxed-rate notes issued in March 2023 under our new Green Finance
Framework as well as borrowings on our foreign credit facilities. Capitalized interest increased $74.4 due
to a higher carrying value of projects under construction.
Other Non-Operating Income (Expense), Net
Other non-operating expense was $39.0 versus income of $62.4 in the prior year primarily due to higher
non-service pension costs in 2023, which were driven by higher interest cost and lower expected returns
on plan assets for the U.S. salaried pension plan and the U.K. pension plan. This impact was partially
oﬀset by higher interest income on cash and cash items due to higher interest rates.
Discontinued Operations
Income from discontinued operations, net of tax, was $7.4 ($0.03 per share) and $12.6 ($0.06 per share)
in ﬁscal years 2023 and 2022, respectively. This primarily resulted from the release of unrecognized tax
beneﬁts on uncertain tax positions taken with respect to the sale of our former Performance Materials
Division for which the statute of limitations expired.
Net Income and Net Income Margin
Net income of $2.3 billion increased 3%, or $72.1, primarily due to favorable pricing, net of power and
fuel costs, partially oﬀset by the charge for business and asset actions, higher non-service pension costs,
and higher other costs. Net income margin of 18.6% increased 80 bp from 17.8% in the prior year due to
the factors noted above as well as lower energy cost pass-through to customers, which positively
impacted margin by about 100 bp.
Adjusted EBITDA and Adjusted EBITDA Margin
Adjusted EBITDA of $4.7 billion increased 11%, or $454.8, primarily due to higher pricing, net of power
and fuel costs, partially oﬀset by higher costs. Adjusted EBITDA margin of 37.3% increased 390 bp from
33.4% in the prior year due to the factors noted above as well as lower energy cost pass-through to
customers, which positively impacted margin by about 200 bp.
Eﬀective Tax Rate
The eﬀective tax rate equals the income tax provision divided by income from continuing operations
before taxes. Refer to Note 23, Income Taxes, to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements for details on
factors aﬀecting the eﬀective tax rate.
Our eﬀective tax rate was 19.1% and 18.2% for the ﬁscal years ended 30 September 2023 and 2022,
respectively. During ﬁscal year 2023, we recorded a charge for business and asset actions of $244.6
($204.9 attributable to Air Products after tax). Refer to Note 4, Business and Asset Actions, to the
consolidated ﬁnancial statements for additional information. The charge included certain losses for
which we could not recognize an income tax beneﬁt and were subject to a valuation allowance of $36.0.
Partially oﬀsetting the valuation allowance cost was a $15.9 income tax beneﬁt from a tax election
related to a non-U.S. subsidiary.
Our eﬀective tax rate for the current year was higher due to lower excess tax beneﬁts on share-based
compensation and the discrete tax impact of our business and asset actions discussed above. In
addition, certain recurring income tax beneﬁts had less of an impact on our eﬀective tax rate in the
current year as they did not increase in proportion to the increase in income. Our current rate is also
higher due to nonrecurring beneﬁts in several foreign jurisdictions due to the impact of tax rate changes
and productivity credit claims in the prior year.
Our adjusted eﬀective tax rate, which does not include the impact of our business and asset actions
discussed above, was 18.9% and 18.1% for the ﬁscal years ended 30 September 2023 and 2022,
respectively.
28
Table of Contents
DISCUSSION OF RESULTS BY BUSINESS SEGMENT
Americas
Change vs. Prior Year
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %/bp
Sales $5,369.3 $5,368.9 $0.4  —%
Operating income 1,439.7 1,174.4 265.3  23%
Operating margin 26.8 % 21.9 % 490  bp
Equity aﬃliates’ income $109.2 $98.2 $11.0 11%
Adjusted EBITDA 2,198.2 1,902.1 296.1  16%
Adjusted EBITDA margin 40.9 % 35.4 % 550  bp
The table below summarizes the major factors that impacted sales in the Americas segment for the
periods presented:
Volume 6 %
Price 6 %
Energy cost pass-through to customers (11 %)
Currency (1 %)
Total Americas Sales Change — %
Sales of $5.4 billion were ﬂat as higher volumes of 6% and higher pricing of 6% were oﬀset by lower
energy cost pass-through to customers of 11% and an unfavorable currency impact of 1%. The volume
improvement was primarily attributable to our on-site business, including better demand for hydrogen.
Additionally, we recovered higher costs in our merchant business through continued focus on pricing
actions. Energy cost pass-through to our on-site customers was lower due to lower natural gas prices.
Operating income of $1.4 billion increased 23%, or $265.3, due to positive pricing, net of power and fuel
costs, of $306 and favorable volumes of $78, partially oﬀset by higher costs of $112 and an unfavorable
currency impact of $7. Higher costs were driven by inﬂation, planned maintenance, and higher incentive
compensation. Operating margin of 26.8% increased 490 bp from 21.9% in the prior year primarily due
to favorable pricing and lower energy cost pass-through to customers, partially oﬀset by higher costs.
The favorable impact from lower energy cost pass-through to customers was about 250 bp.
Equity aﬃliates’ income of $109.2 increased 11%, or $11.0, driven by an aﬃliate in Mexico.
29
Table of Contents
Asia
Change vs. Prior Year
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %/bp
Sales $3,216.1 $3,143.3 $72.8  2%
Operating income 906.5 898.3 8.2  1%
Operating margin 28.2 % 28.6 % (40  bp)
Equity aﬃliates’ income $29.7 $22.1 $7.6 34%
Adjusted EBITDA 1,369.7 1,356.9 12.8  1%
Adjusted EBITDA margin 42.6 % 43.2 % (60  bp)
The table below summarizes the major factors that impacted sales in the Asia segment for the periods
presented:
Volume 3 %
Price 3 %
Energy cost pass-through to customers 2 %
Currency (6 %)
Total Asia Sales Change 2 %
Sales of $3.2 billion increased 2%, or $72.8, due to higher volumes of 3%, positive pricing of 3%, and
higher energy cost pass-through to customers of 2%, partially oﬀset by unfavorable currency impacts of
6%. Positive volume contributions from several new traditional industrial gas plants in our on-site
business were partially oﬀset by weak economic growth in China and lower activity in the electronics
manufacturing industry. Higher power costs across the region were recovered by our merchant pricing
actions. In our on-site business, the higher power costs increased energy cost pass-through to our
customers. The unfavorable currency impact was primarily attributable to the strengthening of the U.S.
Dollar against the Chinese Renminbi.
Operating income of $906.5 increased 1%, or $8.2, due to positive pricing, net of power and fuel costs,
of $59 and higher volumes of $31, partially oﬀset by an unfavorable currency impact of $56 and higher
costs of $26. The higher costs were driven by project development, higher planned maintenance, and
inﬂation. Operating margin of 28.2% decreased 40 bp from 28.6% in the prior year as higher costs were
partially oﬀset by our pricing actions.
Equity aﬃliates’ income of $29.7 increased 34%, or $7.6, driven by an aﬃliate in Thailand.
30
Table of Contents
Europe
Change vs. Prior Year
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %/bp
Sales $2,963.1 $3,086.1 ($123.0) (4%)
Operating income 663.4 503.4 160.0  32%
Operating margin 22.4 % 16.3 % 610  bp
Equity aﬃliates’ income $102.5 $78.2 $24.3 31%
Adjusted EBITDA 962.1 776.8 185.3  24%
Adjusted EBITDA margin 32.5 % 25.2 % 730  bp
The table below summarizes the major factors that impacted sales in the Europe segment for the
periods presented:
Volume — %
Price 7 %
Energy cost pass-through to customers (9 %)
Currency (2 %)
Total Europe Sales Change (4 %)
Sales of $3.0 billion decreased 4%, or $123.0, due to lower energy cost pass-through to customers of 9%
and an unfavorable currency impact of 2%, partially oﬀset by higher pricing of 7%. Energy cost pass-
through to our on-site customers was lower, reﬂecting lower natural gas prices across the region.
Currency negatively impacted sales due to the strengthening of the U.S. Dollar against the Euro and the
British Pound Sterling. The pricing improvement was attributable to our merchant business. Volumes
were ﬂat as improvement in hydrogen in our on-site business was oﬀset by lower demand for merchant
products.
Operating income of $663.4 increased 32%, or $160.0, as higher pricing, net of power and fuel costs, of
$275 was partially oﬀset by higher costs of $100 driven by inﬂation, higher incentive compensation, and
planned maintenance, unfavorable business mix of $8, and an unfavorable currency impact of $7.
Operating margin of 22.4% increased 610 bp from 16.3% in the prior year due to the factors noted
above as well as lower energy cost pass-through to customers, which positively impacted margin by
about 100 bp.
Equity aﬃliates’ income of $102.5 increased 31%, or $24.3, driven by an aﬃliate in Italy.
31
Table of Contents
Middle East and India
Change vs. Prior Year
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %
Sales $162.5  $129.5  $33.0  25 %
Operating income 16.9  21.1  (4.2) (20 %)
Equity aﬃliates’ income 349.8  293.9  55.9  19 %
Adjusted EBITDA 394.2  341.9  52.3  15 %
Sales of $162.5 increased 25%, or $33.0, driven by higher merchant volumes. Despite higher sales,
operating income of $16.9 decreased 20%, or $4.2, primarily due to higher costs for business
development and planned maintenance.
Equity aﬃliates' income of $349.8 increased 19%, or $55.9. In January 2023, we made an additional
investment in the JIGPC joint venture, which completed the second phase of the asset purchase
associated with the Jazan gasiﬁcation and power project. The resulting higher contribution from JIGPC
was partially oﬀset by a prior year net beneﬁt recognized for the remaining deferred proﬁt associated
with air separation units previously sold to Jazan Gas Project Company, net of other project ﬁnalization
costs.
Corporate and other
Change vs. Prior Year
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %
Sales $889.0  $970.8 ($81.8) (8 %)
Operating loss (287.3)(184.7) (102.6) (56 %)
Adjusted EBITDA (222.4)(130.7) (91.7) (70 %)
Sales of $889.0 decreased 8%, or $81.8, and operating loss of $287.3 increased $102.6, primarily due to
lower contributions from our sale of equipment businesses. Our Corporate and other segment also incurs
costs to provide corporate support functions and global management activities that beneﬁt all segments,
which have increased to support our growth strategy.
32
Table of Contents
RECONCILIA TIONS OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
(Millions of U.S. Dollars unless otherwise indicated, except for per share data)
We present certain ﬁnancial measures, other than in accordance with U.S. generally accepted
accounting principles ("GAAP"), on an "adjusted" or "non-GAAP" basis. On a consolidated basis, these
measures include adjusted diluted earnings per share ("EPS"), adjusted EBITDA, adjusted EBITDA margin,
the adjusted eﬀective tax rate, and capital expenditures. On a segment basis, these measures include
adjusted EBITDA and adjusted EBITDA margin. In addition to these measures, we also present certain
supplemental non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures to help the reader understand the impact that certain
disclosed items, or "non-GAAP adjustments," have on the calculation of our adjusted diluted EPS. For
each non-GAAP ﬁnancial measure, we present a reconciliation to the most directly comparable ﬁnancial
measure calculated in accordance with GAAP.
In many cases, non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures are determined by adjusting the most directly comparable
GAAP measure to exclude non-GAAP adjustments that we believe are not representative of our
underlying business performance. For example, we exclude the impact of the non-service components of
net periodic beneﬁt/cost for our deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans as further discussed below. Additionally,
we may exclude certain expenses associated with cost reduction actions, impairment charges, and gains
on disclosed transactions. The reader should be aware that we may recognize similar losses or gains in
the future.
When applicable, the tax impact of our pre-tax non-GAAP adjustments reﬂects the expected current and
deferred income tax impact of our non-GAAP adjustments. These tax impacts are primarily driven by the
statutory tax rate of the various relevant jurisdictions and the taxability of the adjustments in those
jurisdictions.
We provide these non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures to allow investors, potential investors, securities
analysts, and others to evaluate the performance of our business in the same manner as our
management. We believe these measures, when viewed together with ﬁnancial results computed in
accordance with GAAP, provide a more complete understanding of the factors and trends aﬀecting our
historical ﬁnancial performance and projected future results. However, we caution readers not to
consider these measures in isolation or as a substitute for the most directly comparable measures
calculated in accordance with GAAP. Readers should also consider the limitations associated with these
non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures, including the potential lack of comparability of these measures from one
company to another.
NON-GAAP ADJUSTMENT FOR NON-SERVICE PENSION COST (BENEFIT), NET
Our adjusted EPS and the adjusted eﬀective tax rate exclude the impact of non-service related
components of net periodic beneﬁt/cost for our deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans. The prior year non-GAAP
ﬁnancial measures presented above and reconciled below have been recast accordingly to conform to
the ﬁscal year 2023 presentation. Non-service related components are recurring, non-operating items
that include interest cost, expected returns on plan assets, prior service cost amortization, actuarial loss
amortization, as well as special termination beneﬁts, curtailments, and settlements. The net impact of
non-service related components is reﬂected within “Other non-operating income (expense), net” on our
consolidated income statements. Adjusting for the impact of non-service pension components provides
management and users of our ﬁnancial statements with a more accurate representation of our
underlying business performance because these components are driven by factors that are unrelated to
our operations, such as recent changes to the allocation of our pension plan assets associated with de-
risking as well as volatility in equity and debt markets. Further, non-service related components are not
indicative of our deﬁned beneﬁt plans’ future contribution needs due to the funded status of the plans.
33
Table of Contents
ADJUSTED DILUTED EPS
The table below provides a reconciliation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure for each of the
major components used to calculate adjusted diluted EPS from continuing operations, which we view as
a key performance metric. In periods that we have non-GAAP adjustments, we believe it is important for
the reader to understand the per share impact of each such adjustment because management does not
consider these impacts when evaluating underlying business performance. Per share impacts are
calculated independently and may not sum to total diluted EPS and total adjusted diluted EPS due to
rounding.
2023 vs. 2022Operating
IncomeEquity
Aﬃliates'
IncomeOther Non-
Operating
Income/Expense,
NetIncome
Tax
ProvisionNet Income
Attributable
to Air
ProductsDiluted EPS
2023 GAAP $2,494.6 $604.3  ($39.0)$551.2 $2,292.8 $10.30 
2022 GAAP 2,338.8 481.5  62.4 500.8 2,243.5 10.08 
$ Change GAAP $0.22 
% Change GAAP 2 %
2023 GAAP $2,494.6 $604.3  ($39.0)$551.2 $2,292.8 $10.30 
Business and asset actions 244.6  —  —  34.7  204.9  0.92 
Non-service pension cost, net —  —  86.8  21.6  65.2  0.29 
2023 Non-GAAP ("Adjusted")$2,739.2 $604.3  $47.8 $607.5 $2,562.9 $11.51 
2022 GAAP $2,338.8 $481.5  $62.4 $500.8 $2,243.5 $10.08 
Business and asset actions 73.7  —  —  12.7  61.0  0.27 
Equity method investment
impairment charge —  14.8  —  3.7  11.1  0.05 
Non-service pension beneﬁt,
net —  —  (44.7) (10.8) (33.9) (0.15)
2022 Non-GAAP ("Adjusted")$2,412.5 $496.3  $17.7 $506.4 $2,281.7 $10.25 
$ Change Non-GAAP
("Adjusted") $1.26 
% Change Non-GAAP
("Adjusted") 12 %
Charge includes $5.0 attributable to noncontrolling interests.(A)
(A ) 
34
Table of Contents
ADJUSTED EBITDA AND ADJUSTED EBITDA MARGIN
We deﬁne adjusted EBITDA as net income less income from discontinued operations, net of tax, and
excluding non-GAAP adjustments, which we do not believe to be indicative of underlying business
trends, before interest expense, other non-operating income (expense), net, income tax provision, and
depreciation and amortization expense. Adjusted EBITDA and adjusted EBITDA margin provide useful
metrics for management to assess operating performance. Margins are calculated independently for
each period by dividing each line item by consolidated sales for the respective period and may not sum
to total margin due to rounding.
The tables below present consolidated sales and a reconciliation of net income on a GAAP basis to
adjusted EBITDA and net income margin on a GAAP basis to adjusted EBITDA margin:
2023 2022
$ Margin $ Margin
Sales $12,600.0  $12,698.6 
Net income and net income margin $2,338.6  18.6 % $2,266.5  17.8 %
Less: Income from discontinued operations, net of
tax7.4  0.1 % 12.6  0.1 %
Add: Interest expense 177.5  1.4 % 128.0  1.0 %
Less: Other non-operating income (expense), net (39.0) (0.3 %) 62.4  0.5 %
Add: Income tax provision 551.2  4.4 % 500.8  3.9 %
Add: Depreciation and amortization 1,358.3  10.8 % 1,338.2  10.5 %
Add: Business and asset actions 244.6  1.9 % 73.7  0.6 %
Add: Equity method investment impairment
charge—  — % 14.8  0.1 %
Adjusted EBITDA and adjusted EBITDA
margin$4,701.8  37.3 % $4,247.0  33.4 %
2023
vs. 2022
Change GAAP
Net income $ change $72.1
Net income % change 3%
Net income margin change 80 bp
Change Non-GAAP
Adjusted EBITDA $ change $454.8
Adjusted EBITDA % change 11%
Adjusted EBITDA margin change 390 bp
35
Table of Contents
The tables below present sales and a reconciliation of operating income and operating margin by
segment to adjusted EBITDA and adjusted EBITDA margin by segment for the ﬁscal years ended 30
September 2023 and 2022:
Americas
Change vs. P rior Y ear
Fiscal Y ear Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %/bp
Sales $5,369.3   $5,368.9  $0.4  — %
Operating income $1,439.7   $1,174.4  $265.3  23 %
Operating mar gin 26.8  % 21.9  % 490 bp
Reconciliation of GA AP to Non- GAAP:
Operating income $1,439.7   $1,174.4 
Add: Depr eciation and amortization 649.3   629.5 
Add: Equity aﬃliates' income 109.2   98.2 
Adjusted EBITD A $2,198.2   $1,902.1  $296.1  16 %
Adjusted EBITD A mar gin 40.9  % 35.4  % 550 bp
Asia
Change vs. P rior Y ear
Fiscal Y ear Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %/bp
Sales $3,216.1   $3,143.3  $72.8  2 %
Operating income $906.5   $898.3  $8.2  1 %
Operating mar gin 28.2  % 28.6  % (40) bp
Reconciliation of GA AP to Non- GAAP:
Operating income $906.5   $898.3 
Add: Depr eciation and amortization 433.5   436.5 
Add: Equity aﬃliates' income 29.7   22.1 
Adjusted EBITD A $1,369.7   $1,356.9  $12.8  1 %
Adjusted EBITD A mar gin 42.6  % 43.2  % (60) bp
Europe
Change vs. P rior Y ear
Fiscal Y ear Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %/bp
Sales $2,963.1   $3,086.1  ($123.0) (4 %)
Operating income $663.4   $503.4  $160.0  32 %
Operating mar gin 22.4  % 16.3  % 610  bp
Reconciliation of GA AP to Non- GAAP:
Operating income $663.4   $503.4 
Add: Depr eciation and amortization 196.2   195.2 
Add: Equity aﬃliates' income 102.5   78.2 
Adjusted EBITD A $962.1   $776.8  $185.3  24 %
Adjusted EBITD A mar gin 32.5  % 25.2  % 730  bp
36
Table of Contents
Middle East and India
Change vs. P rior Y ear
Fiscal Y ear Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %/bp
Sales $162.5   $129.5  $33.0  25 %
Operating income $16.9   $21.1  ($4.2) (20 %)
Reconciliation of GA AP to Non- GAAP:
Operating income $16.9   $21.1 
Add: Depr eciation and amortization 27.5   26.9 
Add: Equity aﬃliates' income 349.8   293.9 
Adjusted EBITD A $394.2   $341.9  $52.3  15 %
Corporate and other
Change vs. P rior Y ear
Fiscal Y ear Ended 30 September 2023 2022 $ %/bp
Sales $889.0   $970.8  ($81.8) (8 %)
Operating loss ($287.3) ($184.7) ($102.6) (56 %)
Reconciliation of GA AP to Non- GAAP:
Operating loss ($287.3) ($184.7)
Add: Depr eciation and amortization 51.8   50.1 
Add: Equity aﬃliates' income 13.1   3.9 
Adjusted EBITD A ($222.4) ($130.7) ($91.7) (70 %)
37
Table of Contents
ADJUSTED EFFECTIVE TAX RATE
The eﬀective tax rate equals the income tax provision divided by income from continuing operations
before taxes. We calculate our adjusted eﬀective tax rate by adjusting the numerator and denominator
to exclude the tax and before tax impacts of our non-GAAP adjustments, respectively. The table below
presents a reconciliation of the GAAP eﬀective tax rate to our adjusted eﬀective tax rate:
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022
Income tax provision $551.2  $500.8 
Income from continuing operations before taxes 2,882.4  2,754.7 
Eﬀective tax rate 19.1 % 18.2 %
Income tax provision $551.2  $500.8 
Business and asset actions 34.7  12.7 
Equity method investment impairment charge —  3.7 
Non-service pension tax impact 21.6  (10.8)
Adjusted income tax provision $607.5  $506.4 
Income from continuing operations before taxes $2,882.4  $2,754.7 
Business and asset actions 244.6  73.7 
Equity method investment impairment charge —  14.8 
Non-service pension cost (beneﬁt), net 86.8  (44.7)
Adjusted income from continuing operations before taxes $3,213.8  $2,798.5 
Adjusted eﬀective tax rate 18.9 % 18.1 %
CAPITAL EXPENDITURES
Capital expenditures is a non-GAAP ﬁnancial measure that we deﬁne as the sum of cash ﬂows for
additions to plant and equipment, including long-term deposits, acquisitions (less cash acquired),
investment in and advances to unconsolidated aﬃliates, and investment in ﬁnancing receivables on our
consolidated statements of cash ﬂows. Additionally, we adjust additions to plant and equipment to
exclude NEOM Green Hydrogen Company (“NGHC”) expenditures funded by the joint venture's non-
recourse project ﬁnancing as well as our partners’ equity contributions to arrive at a measure that we
believe is more representative of our investment activities. Substantially all the funding we provide to
NGHC is limited for use by the venture for capital expenditures.
A reconciliation of cash used for investing activities to our reported capital expenditures is provided
below:
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022
Cash used for investing activities $5,916.4 $3,857.2 
Proceeds from sale of assets and investments 25.4  46.2 
Purchases of investments (640.1)(1,637.8)
Proceeds from investments 897.0 2,377.4 
Other investing activities 4.8  7.0 
NGHC expenditures not funded by Air Products' equity (979.1) — 
Capital expenditures $5,224.4 $4,650.0 
Reﬂects the portion of "Additions to plant and equipment, including long-ter m deposits" that is associated with
NGHC, less our appr oximate cash investment in the joint ventur e.(A)
(A)
38
Table of Contents
LIQUIDITY AND CAPIT AL RESOURCES
We believe we have suﬃcient cash, cash ﬂows from operations, and funding sources to meet our
liquidity needs. As further discussed in the "Cash Flows From Financing Activities" section below, we
have the ability to raise capital through a variety of ﬁnancing activities, including accessing capital or
commercial paper markets or drawing upon our credit facilities.
As of 30 September 2023, we had $1,497.1 of foreign cash and cash items compared to total cash and
cash items of $1,617.0. We do not expect that a signiﬁcant portion of the earnings of our foreign
subsidiaries and aﬃliates will be subject to U.S. income tax upon repatriation to the U.S. Depending on
the country in which the subsidiaries and aﬃliates reside, the repatriation of these earnings may be
subject to foreign withholding and other taxes. However, since we have signiﬁcant current investment
plans outside the U.S., it is our intent to permanently reinvest the majority of our foreign cash and cash
items that would be subject to additional taxes outside the U.S.
Cash Flows From Operations
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022
Net income from continuing operations attributable to Air Products $2,292.8 $2,243.5 
Adjustments to reconcile income to cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 1,358.3 1,338.2 
Deferred income taxes (24.7) 32.3 
Business and asset actions 244.6  73.7 
Undistributed earnings of equity method investments (261.2)(214.7)
Gain on sale of assets and investments (15.8) (24.1)
Share-based compensation 59.9  48.4 
Noncurrent lease receivables 79.6  94.0 
Other adjustments (103.0)(304.9)
Working capital changes that provided (used) cash, excluding eﬀects of
acquisitions:
Trade receivables 130.7 (475.2)
Inventories (129.4) (94.3)
Other receivables (93.8) (1.8)
Payables and accrued liabilities (213.3) 532.5 
Other working capital (119.0) (77.0)
Cash Provided by Operating Activities $3,205.7 $3,170.6 
In ﬁscal year 2023, cash provided by operating activities was $3,205.7. Business and asset actions of
$244.6 included noncash charges to write oﬀ assets related to our exit from certain projects previously
under construction as well as an expense for severance and other beneﬁts. Refer to Note 4, Business
and Asset Actions, to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements for additional information. The impacts
associated with our operating leases are reﬂected within "Other adjustments," which included a lump-
sum payment of $209 for a land lease associated with the NGHC joint venture. Working capital accounts
resulted in a net use of cash of $424.8. The use of cash of $213.3 within payables and accrued liabilities
primarily resulted from lower prices for the purchase of natural gas, a decrease in value of derivatives
that hedge intercompany loans, and payments for incentive compensation under the ﬁscal year 2022
plan. Inventories resulted in a use of cash of $129.4 primarily due to additional packaged gases
inventory, including helium. The use of cash of $119.0 within other working capital was primarily driven
by the timing of income tax payments. The source of cash of $130.7 from trade receivables was
primarily attributable to collection of higher natural gas costs contractually passed through to on-site
customers in ﬁscal year 2023.
39
Table of Contents
In ﬁscal year 2022, cash provided by operating activities was $3,170.6. Undistributed earnings of equity
method investments of $214.7 reﬂects activity from the JIGPC joint venture, which began contributing to
our results in late October 2021. We received cash distributions of approximately $155 from this joint
venture during ﬁscal year 2022. Other adjustments of $304.9 included adjustments for noncash currency
impacts of intercompany balances, deferred costs associated with new projects, contributions to pension
plans, and payments made for leasing activities. Working capital accounts resulted in a net use of cash
of $115.8. The use of cash of $475.2 within trade receivables included the impacts of higher underlying
sales and higher natural gas costs passed through to our on-site customers. The source of cash of
$532.5 within payables and accrued liabilities primarily resulted from higher natural gas costs and
customer advances for sale of equipment projects. Other working capital accounts resulted in a use of
cash of $77.0 primarily due to contract fulﬁllment costs and the timing of income tax payments.
Cash Flows From Investing Activities
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022
Additions to plant and equipment, including long-term deposits ($4,626.4)($2,926.5)
Acquisitions, less cash acquired —  (65.1)
Investment in and advances to unconsolidated aﬃliates (912.0)(1,658.4)
Investment in ﬁnancing receivables (665.1) — 
Proceeds from sale of assets and investments 25.4  46.2 
Purchases of investments (640.1)(1,637.8)
Proceeds from investments 897.0 2,377.4 
Other investing activities 4.8  7.0 
Cash Used for Investing Activities ($5,916.4)($3,857.2)
In ﬁscal year 2023, cash used for investing activities was $5,916.4. The use of cash primarily resulted
from capital expenditures of $4,626.4 for additions to plant and equipment, including long-term deposits,
investments in and advances to unconsolidated aﬃliates of $912.0, and investments in ﬁnancing
receivables of $665.1. Refer to the Capital Expenditures section below for further detail. Maturities of
time deposits and short-term treasury securities provided cash of $897.0, which exceeded purchases of
investments of $640.1.
In ﬁscal year 2022, cash used for investing activities was $3,857.2. Capital expenditures primarily
included $2,926.5 for additions to plant and equipment, including long-term deposits, and $1,658.4 for
investments in and advances to unconsolidated aﬃliates. Proceeds from investments of $2,377.4
resulted from maturities of time deposits and short-term treasury securities and exceeded purchases of
investments of $1,637.8.
Capital Expenditures
The components of our capital expenditures are detailed in the table below. Refer to page 38 for a
deﬁnition of this non-GAAP measure as well as a reconciliation to cash used for investing activities.
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022
Additions to plant and equipment, including long-term deposits $4,626.4 $2,926.5 
Acquisitions, less cash acquired —  65.1 
Investment in and advances to unconsolidated aﬃliates 912.0  1,658.4 
Investment in ﬁnancing receivables 665.1  — 
NGHC expenditures not funded by Air Products' equity (979.1) — 
Capital Expenditures $5,224.4 $4,650.0 
Includes contributions fr om noncontr olling partners in consolidated subsidiaries as discussed below .
Reﬂects the portion of "Additions to plant  and equipment, including long-ter m deposits" that is associated with
NGHC, less our appr oximate cash investment in the joint ventur e.(A)
(B)
(A)
(B)
40
Table of Contents
Capital expenditures in ﬁscal year 2023 totaled $5,224.4 compared to $4,650.0 in ﬁscal year 2022. The
increase of $574.4 was driven by spending for plant and equipment, which was largely attributable to
purchases associated with our low- and zero-carbon hydrogen projects, as well as ongoing maintenance
capital spending. Higher spending for plant and equipment was partially oﬀset by lower investments in
and advances to unconsolidated aﬃliates, as the second phase of our investment in JIGPC of $908 in
ﬁscal year 2023 was lower than the initial investment of $1.6 billion completed in ﬁscal year 2022. These
investments included approximately $130 and $73 in ﬁscal years 2023 and 2022, respectively, received
from a noncontrolling partner in one of our subsidiaries. We expect to complete a remaining investment
of approximately $115. Refer to Note 9, Equity Aﬃliates, to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements for
additional information. Fiscal year 2023 also included an investment in ﬁnancing receivables of $665.1,
primarily for progress payments towards the purchase of a natural gas-to-syngas processing facility in
Uzbekistan. Refer to Note 5, Acquisitions, to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements for additional
information.
Outlook for Investing Activities
It is not possible, without unreasonable eﬀorts, to reconcile our forecasted capital expenditures to future
cash used for investing activities because we are unable to identify the timing or occurrence of our
future investment activity, which is driven by our assessment of competing opportunities at the time we
enter into transactions. These decisions, either individually or in the aggregate, could have a signiﬁcant
eﬀect on our cash used for investing activities.
We expect capital expenditures for ﬁscal year 2024 to be approximately $5.0 billion to $5.5 billion, which
is driven by clean hydrogen and sustainable aviation fuel projects such as those being executed in
California and Louisiana, United States, as well as Alberta, Canada. We anticipate capital expenditures to
be funded with our current cash balance, cash generated from continuing operations, and additional
ﬁnancing activities.
As of the end of ﬁscal year 2023, we have committed capital of approximately $15 billion to projects
intended to accelerate the energy transition. These low- and zero-carbon hydrogen and other ﬁrst mover
projects demonstrate our commitment to making investments that will make a meaningful diﬀerence on
climate issues, allowing us to support our customers’ sustainability journeys, conserve resources, and
care for our employees and communities.
Cash Flows From Financing Activities
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022
Long-term debt proceeds $3,516.2 $766.2 
Payments on long-term debt (615.4)(400.0)
Net increase in commercial paper and short-term borrowings 268.2  17.9 
Dividends paid to shareholders (1,496.6)(1,383.3)
Proceeds from stock option exercises 24.0  19.3 
Investments by noncontrolling interests 234.9  21.0 
Distributions to noncontrolling interests (115.9) (4.8)
Other ﬁnancing activities (205.8) (36.9)
Cash Provided by (Used for) Financing Activities $1,609.6 ($1,000.6)
In ﬁscal year 2023, cash provided by ﬁnancing activities was $1,609.6. As further discussed below, the
source of cash was primarily attributable to long-term debt proceeds of $3,516.2 as well as an increase
in commercial paper and short-term borrowings of $268.2. These cash inﬂows were partially oﬀset by
dividend payments to shareholders of $1,496.6 and payments on long-term debt of $615.4.
The long-term debt proceeds included proceeds from our inaugural multi-currency green bonds that
were issued during the second quarter in concurrent U.S. Dollar- and Euro-denominated ﬁxed-rate note
oﬀerings with aggregate principal amounts of $600 and €700 million, respectively. Consistent with our
Green Finance Framework, we have allocated the net proceeds to ﬁnance or reﬁnance, in whole or in
part, existing or future projects that are expected to have environmental beneﬁts, including those
related to pollution prevention and control, renewable energy generation and procurement, and
sustainable aviation fuel. We expect to issue our ﬁrst allocation report in 2024. Additionally, as further
discussed below, the NGHC joint venture borrowed approximately $1.4 billion. These proceeds were
partially oﬀset by ﬁnancing fees of approximately $150, which are reﬂected within "Other ﬁnancing
activities". Refer to the Credit Facilities section below as well as Note 16, Debt, to the consolidated
ﬁnancial statements for additional information.
41
Table of Contents
In ﬁscal year 2022, cash used for ﬁnancing activities was $1,000.6. The use of cash was primarily driven
by dividend payments to shareholders of $1,383.3 and payments on long-term debt of $400.0 for the
repayment of a 3.0% Senior Note. These uses of cash were partially oﬀset by long-term debt proceeds
and short-term borrowings of $766.2 and $17.9, respectively.
Financing and Capital Structure
Total debt increased from $7,644.8 as of 30 September 2022 to $10,305.8 as of 30 September 2023,
primarily due to non-recourse project ﬁnancing secured by the NGHC joint venture for construction of the
NEOM Green Hydrogen project, issuance of our inaugural green U.S. Dollar- and Euro-denominated ﬁxed-
rate notes, and an increase in outstanding commercial paper. Total debt includes related party debt of
$328.3 and $781.0 as of 30 September 2023 and 30 September 2022, respectively.
Various debt agreements to which we are a party include ﬁnancial covenants and other restrictions,
including restrictions pertaining to the ability to create property liens and enter into certain sale and
leaseback transactions. As of 30 September 2023, we were in compliance with all of the ﬁnancial and
other covenants under our debt agreements.
2021 Credit Agreement
We have a ﬁve-year $2.75 billion revolving credit agreement maturing 31 March 2026 with a syndicate of
banks (the “2021 Credit Agreement”), under which senior unsecured debt is available to us and certain
of our subsidiaries. The 2021 Credit Agreement provides a source of liquidity and supports our
commercial paper program. No borrowings were outstanding under the 2021 Credit Agreement as of 30
September 2023. At this time, we do not expect to access the facility for additional liquidity.
The only ﬁnancial covenant in the 2021 Credit Agreement is a maximum ratio of total debt to total
capitalization (equal to total debt plus total equity) not to exceed 70%. The 2021 Credit Agreement
deﬁnes total debt as the aggregate principal amount of all indebtedness, excluding limited recourse debt
of any project ﬁnance subsidiary. Accordingly, this calculation does not consider borrowings associated
with NGHC. Total debt to total capitalization was 36.6% and 35.8% as of 30 September 2023 and 30
September 2022, respectively.
Foreign Credit Facilities
We also have credit facilities available to certain of our foreign subsidiaries totaling $1,596.8, of which
$1,041.4 was borrowed and outstanding as of 30 September 2023. The amount borrowed and
outstanding as of 30 September 2022 was $457.5. The increase from 30 September 2022 was driven by
borrowings on a new variable-rate Saudi Riyal loan facility that matures in October 2026. The interest
rate on the facility is based on the Saudi Arabian Interbank Oﬀered Rate plus an annual margin of 1.35%.
We entered into this facility in October 2022 and utilized a portion of the proceeds to repay a variable-
rate 4.10% Saudi Riyal Loan Facility of $195.6, which was presented within long-term debt on our
consolidated balance sheet as of 30 September 2022.
NEOM Green Hydrogen Project Financing
In May 2023, NGHC secured non-recourse project ﬁnancing of approximately $6.1 billion, which is
expected to fund approximately 73% of the NEOM Green Hydrogen Project and will be drawn over the
construction period. At the same time, NGHC secured additional non-recourse credit facilities totaling
approximately $500 primarily for working capital needs. As of 30 September 2023, the joint venture had
borrowed $1.4 billion of the available ﬁnancing. Refer to Note 3, Variable Interest Entities, to the
consolidated ﬁnancial statements for additional information.
Dividends
The Board of Directors determines whether to declare cash dividends on our common stock and the
timing and amount based on ﬁnancial condition and other factors it deems relevant. In ﬁscal year 2023,
the Board of Directors increased the quarterly dividend to $1.75 per share, representing an 8% increase,
or $0.13 per share, from the previous dividend of $1.62 per share. We expect to continue increasing our
quarterly dividend as we have done for the last 41 consecutive years.
Dividends are paid quarterly, usually during the sixth week after the close of the ﬁscal quarter. On 21
July 2023, the Board of Directors declared a quarterly dividend of $1.75 per share that was payable on
13 November 2023 to shareholders of record at the close of business on 2 October 2023. On 15
November 2023, the Board of Directors declared a quarterly dividend of $1.75 per share that is payable
on 12 February 2024 to shareholders of record at the close of business on 2 January 2024.
Discontinued Operations
In ﬁscal years 2023 and 2022, cash provided by operating activities of discontinued operations of $0.6
and $59.6, respectively, resulted from cash received as part of state tax refunds related to the sale of
our former Performance Materials Division in ﬁscal year 2017.
42
Table of Contents
PENSION BENEFITS
We and certain of our subsidiaries sponsor deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans and deﬁned contribution plans
that cover a substantial portion of our worldwide employees. The principal deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans
are the U.S. salaried pension plan and the U.K. pension plan. These plans were closed to new
participants in 2005, after which deﬁned contribution plans were oﬀered to new employees. The shift to
deﬁned contribution plans is expected to continue to reduce volatility of both plan expense and
contributions. For additional information, refer to Note 17, Retirement Beneﬁts, to the consolidated
ﬁnancial statements.
Net Periodic Cost (Beneﬁt)
The table below summarizes the components of net periodic cost/beneﬁt for our U.S. and international
deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans for the ﬁscal years ended 30 September:
2023 2022
Service cost $23.2  $39.8 
Non-service related costs (beneﬁts) 86.8  (44.7)
Other 0.9  1.3 
Net Periodic Cost (Beneﬁt) $110.9  ($3.6)
Net periodic cost was $110.9 in ﬁscal year 2023 versus a beneﬁt of $3.6 in the prior year. The increased
costs from the prior year were primarily attributable to higher non-service costs, which were driven by
higher interest cost and lower expected returns on plan assets due to a smaller beginning balance of
plan assets. The net impact of non-service related items are reﬂected within "Other non-operating
income (expense), net" on our consolidated income statements.
Service costs result from beneﬁts earned by active employees and are reﬂected as operating expenses
primarily within "Cost of sales" and "Selling and administrative expense" on our consolidated income
statements. The amount of service costs capitalized in ﬁscal years 2023 and 2022 was not material.
The table below summarizes the assumptions used in the calculation of net periodic cost/beneﬁt for the
ﬁscal years ended 30 September:
2023 2022
Weighted average discount rate – Service cost 5.1 % 2.4 %
Weighted average discount rate – Interest cost 5.3 % 2.0 %
Weighted average expected rate of return on plan assets 5.3 % 5.1 %
Weighted average expected rate of compensation increase 3.5 % 3.4 %
2024 Outlook
In ﬁscal year 2024, we expect to recognize pension expense of approximately $120 to $130 primarily
driven by approximately $100 to $110 of non-service related costs, including lower estimated expected
returns on plan assets due to a smaller beginning balance of plan assets and higher interest cost,
partially oﬀset by a decrease in actuarial loss amortization.
In ﬁscal year 2023, we recognized net actuarial losses of $4.4 in other comprehensive income. Actuarial
gains and losses are amortized into pension expense over prospective periods to the extent they are not
oﬀset by future gains or losses. Future changes in the discount rate and actual returns on plan assets
could impact the actuarial gain or loss and resulting amortization in years beyond ﬁscal year 2024.
43
Table of Contents
Pension Funding
Funded Status
The projected beneﬁt obligation represents the actuarial present value of beneﬁts attributable to
employee service rendered to date, including the eﬀects of estimated future salary increases. The plan
funded status is calculated as the diﬀerence between the projected beneﬁt obligation and the fair value
of plan assets at the end of the period.
The table below summarizes the projected beneﬁt obligation, the fair value of plan assets, and the
funded status for our U.S. and international plans as of 30 September:
2023 2022
Projected beneﬁt obligation $3,511.2 $3,588.3 
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 3,433.0 3,526.0 
Plan Funded Status ($78.2) ($62.3)
The net unfunded liability of $78.2 as of 30 September 2023 increased $15.9 from $62.3 as of 30
September 2022, as increases to the projected beneﬁt obligation from the service and interest cost
components of net period pension cost were greater than actuarial gains from higher discount rates.
Company Contributions
Pension funding includes both contributions to funded plans and beneﬁt payments for unfunded plans,
which are primarily non-qualiﬁed plans. With respect to funded plans, our funding policy is that
contributions, combined with appreciation and earnings, will be suﬃcient to pay beneﬁts without
creating unnecessary surpluses.
In addition, we make contributions to satisfy all legal funding requirements while managing our capacity
to beneﬁt from tax deductions attributable to plan contributions. With the assistance of third-party
actuaries, we analyze the liabilities and demographics of each plan, which help guide the level of
contributions. During 2023 and 2022, our cash contributions to funded pension plans and beneﬁt
payments for unfunded pension plans were $32.6 and $44.7, respectively.
For ﬁscal year 2024, cash contributions to deﬁned beneﬁt plans are estimated to be $35 to $45. The
estimate is based on expected contributions to certain international plans and anticipated beneﬁt
payments for unfunded plans, which are dependent upon the timing of retirements. Actual future
contributions will depend on future funding legislation, discount rates, investment performance, plan
design, and various other factors.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMA TES
Refer to Note 1, Basis of Presentation and Major Accounting Policies, and Note 2, New Accounting
Guidance, to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements for a description of our major accounting policies and
information concerning implementation and impact of new accounting guidance.
The accounting policies discussed below are those policies that we consider to be the most critical to
understanding our ﬁnancial statements because they require management's most diﬃcult, subjective, or
complex judgments, often as the result of the need to make estimates about the eﬀects of matters that
are inherently uncertain. These estimates reﬂect our best judgment about current and/or future
economic and market conditions and their eﬀect based on information available as of the date of our
consolidated ﬁnancial statements. If conditions change, actual results may diﬀer materially from these
estimates. Our management has reviewed these critical accounting policies and estimates and related
disclosures with the Audit and Finance Committee of our Board of Directors.
Depreciable Lives of Plant and Equipment
Plant and equipment, net at 30 September 2023 totaled $17,472.1, and depreciation expense totaled
$1,325.8 during ﬁscal year 2023. Plant and equipment is recorded at cost and depreciated using the
straight-line method, which deducts equal amounts of the cost of each asset from earnings every year
over its estimated economic useful life.
Economic useful life is the duration of time an asset is expected to be productively employed by us,
which may be less than its physical life. Assumptions on the following factors, among others, aﬀect the
determination of estimated economic useful life: wear and tear, obsolescence, technical standards,
contract life, market demand, competitive position, raw material availability, and geographic location.
44
Table of Contents
The estimated economic useful life of an asset is monitored to determine its appropriateness, especially
when business circumstances change. For example, changes in technology, changes in the estimated
future demand for products, excessive wear and tear, or unanticipated government actions may result in
a shorter estimated useful life than originally anticipated. In these cases, we would depreciate the
remaining net book value over the new estimated remaining life, thereby increasing depreciation
expense per year on a prospective basis. Likewise, if the estimated useful life is increased, the
adjustment to the useful life decreases depreciation expense per year on a prospective basis.
Our regional segments have numerous long-term customer supply contracts for which we construct an
on-site plant adjacent to or near the customer’s facility. These contracts typically have initial contract
terms of 10 to 20 years. Depreciable lives of the production assets related to long-term supply contracts
are generally matched to the contract lives. Extensions to the contract term of supply frequently occur
prior to the expiration of the initial term. As contract terms are extended, the depreciable life of the
associated production assets is adjusted to match the new contract term, as long as it does not exceed
the remaining physical life of the asset.
Our regional segments also have contracts for liquid or gaseous bulk supply and, for smaller customers,
packaged gases. The depreciable lives of production facilities associated with these contracts are
generally 15 years. These depreciable lives have been determined based on historical experience
combined with judgment on future assumptions such as technological advances, potential obsolescence,
competitors’ actions, etc.
In addition, we may purchase assets through transactions accounted for as either an asset acquisition or
a business combination. Depreciable lives are assigned to acquired assets based on the age and
condition of the assets, the remaining duration of long-term supply contracts served by the assets, and
our historical experience with similar assets. Management monitors its assumptions and may potentially
need to adjust depreciable life as circumstances change.
Impairment of Assets
There were no triggering events in ﬁscal year 2023 that would require impairment testing for any of our
asset groups, reporting units that contain goodwill, or indeﬁnite-lived intangibles assets. We completed
our annual impairment tests for goodwill and other indeﬁnite-lived intangible assets and concluded there
were no indications of impairment. Refer to the “Impairment of Assets” subsections below for additional
detail.
Impairment of Assets: Plant and Equipment
Plant and equipment meeting the held for sale criteria are reported at the lower of carrying amount or
fair value less cost to sell. Plant and equipment to be disposed of other than by sale may be reviewed for
impairment upon the occurrence of certain triggering events, such as unexpected contract terminations
or unexpected foreign government-imposed restrictions or expropriations. Plant and equipment held for
use is grouped for impairment testing at the lowest level for which there is identiﬁable cash ﬂows.
Impairment testing of the asset group occurs whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that
the carrying amount of the assets may not be recoverable. Such circumstances may include:
•a signiﬁcant decrease in the market value of a long-lived asset grouping;
•a signiﬁcant adverse change in the manner in which the asset grouping is being used or in its
physical condition;
•an accumulation of costs signiﬁcantly in excess of the amount originally expected for the
acquisition or construction of the long-lived asset;
•a reduction in revenues that is other than temporary;
•a history of operating or cash ﬂow losses associated with the use of the asset grouping; or
•changes in the expected useful life of the long-lived assets.
If such circumstances are determined to exist, an estimate of undiscounted future cash ﬂows produced
by that asset group is compared to the carrying value to determine whether impairment exists. If an
asset group is determined to be impaired, the loss is measured based on the diﬀerence between the
asset group’s fair value and its carrying value. An estimate of the asset group’s fair value is based on the
discounted value of its estimated cash ﬂows.
45
Table of Contents
The assumptions underlying the undiscounted future cash ﬂow projections require signiﬁcant
management judgment. Factors that management must estimate include industry and market
conditions, sales volume and prices, costs to produce, inﬂation, etc. The assumptions underlying the
cash ﬂow projections represent management’s best estimates at the time of the impairment review and
could include probability weighting of cash ﬂow projections associated with multiple potential future
scenarios. Changes in key assumptions or actual conditions that diﬀer from estimates could result in an
impairment charge. We use reasonable and supportable assumptions when performing impairment
reviews and cannot predict the occurrence of future events and circumstances that could result in
impairment charges.
In ﬁscal year 2023, there was no need to test for impairment on any of our asset groupings as no events
or changes in circumstances indicated that the carrying amount of our asset groupings may not be
recoverable.
Impairment of Assets: Goodwill
The acquisition method of accounting for business combinations requires us to make use of estimates
and judgments to allocate the purchase price paid for acquisitions to the fair value of the net tangible
and identiﬁable intangible assets. Goodwill represents the excess of the aggregate purchase price (plus
the fair value of any noncontrolling interest and previously held equity interest in the acquiree) over the
fair value of identiﬁable net assets of an acquired entity. Goodwill was $861.7 as of 30 September 2023.
Disclosures related to goodwill are included in Note 11, Goodwill, to the consolidated ﬁnancial
statements.
We review goodwill for impairment annually in the fourth quarter of the ﬁscal year and whenever events
or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of goodwill might not be recoverable. The
tests are done at the reporting unit level, which is deﬁned as being equal to or one level below the
operating segment for which discrete ﬁnancial information is available and whose operating results are
reviewed by segment managers regularly. We have ﬁve reportable business segments, seven operating
segments and 11 reporting units, eight of which include a goodwill balance. Refer to Note 25, Business
Segment and Geographic Information, for additional information. Reporting units are primarily based on
products and subregions within each reportable segment. The majority of our goodwill is assigned to
reporting units within our regional industrial gases segments.
As part of the goodwill impairment testing, we have the option to ﬁrst assess qualitative factors to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying
value. However, we choose to bypass the qualitative assessment and conduct quantitative testing to
determine if the carrying value of the reporting unit exceeds its fair value. An impairment loss will be
recognized for the amount by which the carrying value of the reporting unit exceeds its fair value, not to
exceed the total amount of goodwill allocated to that reporting unit.
To determine the fair value of a reporting unit, we initially use an income approach valuation model,
representing the present value of estimated future cash ﬂows. Our valuation model uses a discrete
growth period and an estimated exit trading multiple. The income approach is an appropriate valuation
method due to our capital-intensive nature, the long-term contractual nature of our business, and the
relatively consistent cash ﬂows generated by our reporting units. The principal assumptions utilized in
our income approach valuation model include revenue growth rates, operating proﬁt and/or adjusted
EBITDA margins, discount rate, and exit multiple. Projected revenue growth rates and operating proﬁt
and/or adjusted EBITDA assumptions are consistent with those utilized in our operating plan and/or
revised forecasts and long-term ﬁnancial planning process. The discount rate assumption is calculated
based on an estimated market-participant risk-adjusted weighted-average cost of capital, which includes
factors such as the risk-free rate of return, cost of debt, and expected equity premiums. The exit multiple
is determined from comparable industry transactions and where appropriate, reﬂects expected long-
term growth rates.
If our initial review under the income approach indicates there may be impairment, we incorporate
results under the market approach to further evaluate the existence of impairment. When the market
approach is utilized, fair value is estimated based on market multiples of revenue and earnings derived
from comparable publicly-traded industrial gases companies and/or regional manufacturing companies
engaged in the same or similar lines of business as the reporting unit, adjusted to reﬂect diﬀerences in
size and growth prospects. When both the income and market approach are utilized, we review relevant
facts and circumstances and make a qualitative assessment to determine the proper weighting.
Management judgment is required in the determination of each assumption utilized in the valuation
model, and actual results could diﬀer from the estimates.
In the fourth quarter of ﬁscal year 2023, we conducted our annual goodwill impairment test, noting no
indications of impairment. The fair value of all our reporting units substantially exceeded their carrying
value.
46
Table of Contents
Future events that could have a negative impact on the level of excess fair value over carrying value of
the reporting units include, but are not limited to: long-term economic weakness, decline in market
share, pricing pressures, inability to successfully implement cost improvement measures, increases to
our cost of capital, changes in the strategy of the reporting unit, and changes to the structure of our
business as a result of future reorganizations or divestitures of assets or businesses. Negative changes in
one or more of these factors, among others, could result in impairment charges.
Impairment of Assets: Intangible Assets
Intangible assets, net with determinable lives at 30 September 2023 totaled $297.5 and consisted
primarily of customer relationships, purchased patents and technology, and land use rights. These
intangible assets are tested for impairment as part of the long-lived asset grouping impairment tests.
Impairment testing of the asset group occurs whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that
the carrying value of the assets may not be recoverable. See the impairment discussion above under
"Impairment of Assets – Plant and Equipment" for a description of how impairment losses are
determined.
Indeﬁnite-lived intangible assets at 30 September 2023 totaled $37.1 and consisted of trade names and
trademarks. Indeﬁnite-lived intangibles are subject to impairment testing at least annually or more
frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate that potential impairment exists. The
impairment test for indeﬁnite-lived intangible assets involves calculating the fair value of the indeﬁnite-
lived intangible assets and comparing the fair value to their carrying value. If the fair value is less than
the carrying value, the diﬀerence is recorded as an impairment loss. To determine fair value, we utilize
the royalty savings method, a form of the income approach. This method values an intangible asset by
estimating the royalties avoided through ownership of the asset.
Disclosures related to intangible assets other than goodwill are included in Note 12, Intangible Assets, to
the consolidated ﬁnancial statements.
In the fourth quarter of ﬁscal year 2023, we conducted our annual impairment test of indeﬁnite-lived
intangibles, noting no indications of impairment.
Impairment of Assets: Equity Method Investments
Investments in and advances to equity aﬃliates totaled $4,617.8 at 30 September 2023. The majority of
our equity method investments are ventures with other industrial gas companies. Summarized ﬁnancial
information of our equity aﬃliates is included in Note 9, Equity Aﬃliates, to the consolidated ﬁnancial
statements. We review our equity method investments for impairment whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the investment may not be recoverable.
An impairment loss is recognized in the event that an other-than-temporary decline in fair value below
the carrying value of an investment occurs. We estimate the fair value of our investments under the
income approach, which considers the estimated discounted future cash ﬂows expected to be generated
by the investee, and/or the market approach, which considers market multiples of revenue and earnings
derived from comparable publicly-traded industrial gas companies. Changes in key assumptions about
the ﬁnancial condition of an investee or actual conditions that diﬀer from estimates could result in an
impairment charge.
In ﬁscal year 2023, there was no need to test any of our equity aﬃliate investments for impairment as
no events or changes in circumstances indicated that the carrying amount of the investments may not
be recoverable.
Revenue Recognition: Cost Incurred Input Method
Revenue from equipment sale contracts is generally recognized over time as we have an enforceable
right to payment for performance completed to date and our performance under the contract terms does
not create an asset with alternative use. We use a cost incurred input method to recognize revenue by
which costs incurred to date relative to total estimated costs at completion are used to measure
progress toward satisfying performance obligations. Costs incurred include material, labor, and overhead
costs and represent work contributing and proportionate to the transfer of control to the customer.
Accounting for contracts using the cost incurred input method requires management judgment relative
to assessing risks and their impact on the estimates of revenues and costs. Our estimates are impacted
by factors such as the potential for incentives or penalties on performance, schedule delays, technical
issues, cost inﬂation, labor productivity, the complexity of work performed, the availability of materials,
and performance of subcontractors. When adjustments in estimated total contract revenues or
estimated total costs are required, any changes in the estimated proﬁt from prior estimates are
recognized in the current period for the inception-to-date eﬀect of such change. When estimates of total
costs to be incurred on a contract exceed estimates of total revenues to be earned, a provision for the
entire estimated loss on the contract is recorded in the period in which the loss is determined.
47
Table of Contents
In addition to the typical risks associated with underlying performance of engineering, project
procurement, and construction activities, our sale of equipment projects within our Corporate and other
segment require monitoring of risks associated with schedule, geography, and other aspects of the
contract and their eﬀects on our estimates of total revenues and total costs to complete the contract.
Changes in estimates on projects accounted for under the cost incurred input method unfavorably
impacted operating income by approximately $115 in ﬁscal year 2023 and $30 in ﬁscal year 2022.
We assess the performance of our sale of equipment projects as they progress. Our earnings could be
positively or negatively impacted by changes to our contractual revenues and cost forecasts on these
projects.
Revenue Recognition: On-site Customer Contracts
For customers who require large volumes of gases on a long-term basis, we produce and supply gases
under long-term contracts from large facilities that we build, own, and operate on or near the customer’s
facilities. Certain of these on-site contracts contain complex terms and provisions regarding tolling
arrangements, minimum payment requirements, variable components, pricing provisions, and
amendments, which require signiﬁcant judgment to determine the amount and timing of revenue
recognition.
Income Taxes
We account for income taxes under the asset and liability method. Under this method, deferred tax
assets and liabilities are recognized for the tax eﬀects of temporary diﬀerences between the ﬁnancial
reporting and tax basis of assets and liabilities measured using enacted tax rates in eﬀect for the year in
which the diﬀerences are expected to be recovered or settled. As of 30 September 2023, accrued
income taxes, including the amount recorded as noncurrent, was $240.6, and net deferred tax liabilities
were $1,106.4. Tax liabilities related to uncertain tax positions as of 30 September 2023 were $96.5,
excluding interest and penalties. Income tax expense for the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2023 was
$551.2.
Management judgment is required concerning the ultimate outcome of tax contingencies and the
realization of deferred tax assets.
Actual income taxes paid may vary from estimates, depending upon changes in income tax laws, actual
results of operations, and the ﬁnal audit of tax returns by taxing authorities. Tax assessments may arise
several years after tax returns have been ﬁled. We believe that our recorded tax liabilities adequately
provide for these assessments.
Deferred tax assets are recorded for operating losses and tax credit carryforwards. However, when we
do not expect suﬃcient sources of future taxable income to realize the beneﬁt of the operating losses or
tax credit carryforwards, these deferred tax assets are reduced by a valuation allowance. A valuation
allowance is recognized if, based on the weight of available evidence, it is considered more likely than
not that some portion or all of the deferred tax asset will not be realized. The factors used to assess the
likelihood of realization include forecasted future taxable income and available tax planning strategies
that could be implemented to realize or renew net deferred tax assets in order to avoid the potential loss
of future tax beneﬁts. The eﬀect of a change in the valuation allowance is reported in income tax
expense.
A 1% increase or decrease in our eﬀective tax rate may result in a decrease or increase to net income,
respectively, of approximately $29.
Disclosures related to income taxes are included in Note 23, Income Taxes, to the consolidated ﬁnancial
statements.
48
Table of Contents
Pension and Other Postretirement Beneﬁts
The amounts recognized in the consolidated ﬁnancial statements for pension and other postretirement
beneﬁts are determined on an actuarial basis utilizing numerous assumptions. The discussion that
follows provides information on the signiﬁcant assumptions, expense, and obligations associated with
the deﬁned beneﬁt plans.
Actuarial models are used in calculating the expense and liability related to the various deﬁned beneﬁt
plans. These models have an underlying assumption that the employees render service over their
service lives on a relatively consistent basis; therefore, the expense of beneﬁts earned should follow a
similar pattern.
Several assumptions and statistical variables are used in the models to calculate the expense and
liability related to the plans. We determine assumptions about the discount rate, the expected rate of
return on plan assets, and the rate of compensation increase. Note 17, Retirement Beneﬁts, to the
consolidated ﬁnancial statements includes disclosure of these rates on a weighted-average basis for
both the U.S. and international plans. The actuarial models also use assumptions about demographic
factors such as retirement age, mortality, and turnover rates. Mortality rates are based on the most
recent U.S. and international mortality tables. We believe the actuarial assumptions are reasonable.
However, actual results could vary materially from these actuarial assumptions due to economic events
and diﬀerences in rates of retirement, mortality, and turnover.
One of the assumptions used in the actuarial models is the discount rate used to measure beneﬁt
obligations. This rate reﬂects the prevailing market rate for high-quality, ﬁxed-income debt instruments
with maturities corresponding to the expected timing of beneﬁt payments as of the annual measurement
date for each of the various plans. We measure the service cost and interest cost components of pension
expense by applying spot rates along the yield curve to the relevant projected cash ﬂows. The rates
along the yield curve are used to discount the future cash ﬂows of beneﬁt obligations back to the
measurement date. These rates change from year to year based on market conditions that aﬀect
corporate bond yields. A higher discount rate decreases the present value of the beneﬁt obligations and
results in lower pension expense. With respect to impacts on pension beneﬁt obligations, a 50 bp
increase or decrease in the discount rate may result in a decrease or increase, respectively, to pension
expense of approximately $15 per year.
The expected rate of return on plan assets represents an estimate of the long-term average rate of
return to be earned by plan assets reﬂecting current asset allocations. In determining estimated asset
class returns, we take into account historical and future expected long-term returns and the value of
active management, as well as the interest rate environment. Asset allocation is determined based on
long-term return, volatility and correlation characteristics of the asset classes, the proﬁles of the plans’
liabilities, and acceptable levels of risk. Lower returns on the plan assets result in higher pension
expense. A 50 bp increase or decrease in the estimated rate of return on plan assets may result in a
decrease or increase, respectively, to pension expense of approximately $17 per year.
We use a market-related valuation method for recognizing certain investment gains or losses for our
signiﬁcant pension plans. Investment gains or losses are the diﬀerence between the expected return and
actual return on plan assets. The expected return on plan assets is determined based on a market-
related value of plan assets. This is a calculated value that recognizes investment gains and losses on
equities over a ﬁve-year period from the year in which they occur and reduces year-to-year volatility. The
market-related value for non-equity investments equals the actual fair value. Expense in future periods
will be impacted as gains or losses are recognized in the market-related value of assets.
The expected rate of compensation increase is another key assumption. We determine this rate based
on review of the underlying long-term salary increase trend characteristic of labor markets and historical
experience, as well as comparison to peer companies. A 50 bp increase or decrease in the expected rate
of compensation may result in an increase or decrease to pension expense, respectively, of
approximately $4 per year.
49
Table of Contents
Loss Contingencies
In the normal course of business, we encounter contingencies, or situations involving varying degrees of
uncertainty as to the outcome and eﬀect on our company. We accrue a liability for loss contingencies
when it is considered probable that a liability has been incurred and the amount of loss can be
reasonably estimated. When only a range of possible loss can be established, the most probable amount
in the range is accrued. If no amount within this range is a better estimate than any other amount within
the range, the minimum amount in the range is accrued.
Contingencies include those associated with litigation and environmental matters, for which our
accounting policy is discussed in Note 1, Basis of Presentation and Major Accounting Policies, to the
consolidated ﬁnancial statements, and details are provided in Note 18, Commitments and Contingencies,
to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements. Signiﬁcant judgment is required to determine both the
probability and whether the amount of loss associated with a contingency can be reasonably estimated.
These determinations are made based on the best available information at the time. As additional
information becomes available, we reassess probability and estimates of loss contingencies. Revisions to
the estimates associated with loss contingencies could have a signiﬁcant impact on our results of
operations in the period in which an accrual for loss contingencies is recorded or adjusted. For example,
due to the inherent uncertainties related to environmental exposures, a signiﬁcant increase to
environmental liabilities could occur if a new site is designated, the scope of remediation is increased, a
diﬀerent remediation alternative is identiﬁed, or our proportionate share of the liability increases.
Similarly, a future charge for regulatory ﬁnes or damage awards associated with litigation could have a
signiﬁcant impact on our net income in the period in which it is recorded.
Item 7A . Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Mark et Risk
Our earnings, cash ﬂows, and ﬁnancial position are exposed to market risks arising from ﬂuctuations in
interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates. It is our policy to minimize our cash ﬂow exposure to
adverse changes in currency exchange rates and to manage the ﬁnancial risks inherent in funding with
debt capital.
We address these ﬁnancial exposures through a controlled program of risk management that includes
the use of derivative ﬁnancial instruments. We have established counterparty credit guidelines and
generally enter into transactions with ﬁnancial institutions of investment grade or better, thereby
minimizing the risk of credit loss. All instruments are entered into for other than trading purposes. For
details on the types and use of these derivative instruments and related major accounting policies, refer
to Note 1, Basis of Presentation and Major Accounting Policies, and Note 14, Financial Instruments, to
the consolidated ﬁnancial statements. Additionally, we mitigate adverse energy price impacts through
our cost pass-through contracts with customers and price increases.
Our derivative and other ﬁnancial instruments consist of long-term debt, including the current portion
and amounts owed to related parties; interest rate swaps; cross currency interest rate swaps; and
foreign exchange-forward contracts. The net market value of these ﬁnancial instruments combined is
referred to below as the "net ﬁnancial instrument position" and is disclosed in Note 15, Fair Value
Measurements, to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements. Our net ﬁnancial instrument position increased
from a liability of $6,898.6 at 30 September 2022 to a liability of $8,990.8 at 30 September 2023. The
increase was primarily due to NEOM Green Hydrogen Project ﬁnancing and the issuance of U.S. Dollar-
and Euro-denominated ﬁxed-rate notes during the ﬁscal year.
The analysis below presents the sensitivity of the market value of our ﬁnancial instruments to selected
changes in market rates and prices. Market values are the present values of projected future cash ﬂows
based on the market rates and prices chosen. The market values for interest rate risk and foreign
currency risk are calculated by us using a third-party software model that utilizes standard pricing
models to determine the present value of the instruments based on market conditions as of the
valuation date, such as interest rates, spot and forward exchange rates, and implied volatility.
50
Table of Contents
Interest Rate Risk
Our debt portfolio as of 30 September 2023, including the eﬀect of currency and interest rate swap
agreements, was composed of 80% ﬁxed-rate debt and 20% variable-rate debt. Our debt portfolio as of
30 September 2022, including the eﬀect of currency and interest rate swap agreements, was composed
of 79% ﬁxed-rate debt and 21% variable-rate debt.
The sensitivity analysis related to the interest rate risk on the ﬁxed portion of our debt portfolio assumes
an instantaneous 100 bp parallel move in interest rates from the level at 30 September 2023, with all
other variables held constant. A 100 bp increase in market interest rates would result in a decrease of
$728 and $364 in the net liability position of ﬁnancial instruments at 30 September 2023 and 2022,
respectively. A 100 bp decrease in market interest rates would result in an increase of $845 and $425 in
the net liability position of ﬁnancial instruments at 30 September 2023 and 2022, respectively.
Based on the variable-rate debt included in our debt portfolio, including the interest rate swap
agreements, a 100 bp increase in interest rates would result in an additional $21 and $16 of interest
incurred per year at 30 September 2023 and 2022, respectively. A 100 bp decline in interest rates would
lower interest incurred by $21 and $16 per year at 30 September 2023 and 2022, respectively.
Foreign Currency Exchange Rate Risk
The sensitivity analysis related to foreign currency exchange rates assumes an instantaneous 10%
change in the foreign currency exchange rates from their levels at 30 September 2023 and 2022, with all
other variables held constant. A 10% strengthening or weakening of the functional currency of an entity
versus all other currencies would result in a decrease or increase, respectively, of $308 and $165 in the
net liability position of ﬁnancial instruments at 30 September 2023 and 2022, respectively. The increase
in sensitivity is primarily due to the issuance of Euro-denominated ﬁxed-rate notes during the ﬁscal year.
The primary currency pairs for which we have exchange rate exposure are the Euro and U.S. Dollar and
Chinese Renminbi and U.S. Dollar. Foreign currency debt, cross currency interest rate swaps, and foreign
exchange-forward contracts are used in countries where we do business, thereby reducing our net asset
exposure. Foreign exchange-forward contracts and cross currency interest rate swaps are also used to
hedge our ﬁrm and highly anticipated foreign currency cash ﬂows. Thus, there is either an asset or
liability or cash ﬂow exposure related to all of the ﬁnancial instruments in the above sensitivity analysis
for which the impact of a movement in exchange rates would be in the opposite direction and materially
equal to the impact on the instruments in the analysis.
The majority of our sales are denominated in foreign currencies as they are derived outside the United
States. Therefore, ﬁnancial results will be aﬀected by changes in foreign currency rates. The Chinese
Renminbi and the Euro represent the largest exposures in terms of our foreign earnings. We estimate
that a 10% reduction in either the Chinese Renminbi or the Euro versus the U.S. Dollar would lower our
annual operating income by approximately $55 and $20, respectively.
51
Table of Contents
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
INDEX TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL ST ATEMENTS
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting 53
Report of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID No. 34)54
Consolidated Income Statements – Fiscal Years Ended 30 September 2023 and 2022 56
Consolidated Comprehensive Income Statements – Fiscal Years Ended 30 September 2023 and 202257
Consolidated Balance Sheets – 30 September 2023 and 2022 58
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows – Fiscal Years Ended 30 September 2023 and 2022 59
Consolidated Statements of Equity – Fiscal Years Ended 30 September 2023 and 2022 60
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 61
52
Table of Contents
MANAGEMENT’S REPOR T ON INTERNAL CONTROL O VER FINANCIAL
REPOR TING
Air Products’ management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over
ﬁnancial reporting. Our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, which is deﬁned in the following
sentences, is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of our
ﬁnancial reporting and the preparation of ﬁnancial statements for external purposes in accordance with
U.S. generally accepted accounting principles and includes those policies and procedures that:
(i)pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reﬂect the
transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company;
(ii)provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation
of ﬁnancial statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, and that
receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations
of management and directors of the Company; and
(iii)provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized
acquisition, use or disposition of the Company’s assets that could have a material eﬀect on the
ﬁnancial statements.
Because of inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting can only provide reasonable
assurance and may not prevent or detect misstatements. Further, because of changes in conditions, the
eﬀectiveness of our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may vary over time. Our processes contain
self-monitoring mechanisms, and actions are taken to correct deﬁciencies as they are identiﬁed.
Management has evaluated the eﬀectiveness of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting based on
criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). Based on this evaluation, management
concluded that, as of 30 September 2023, the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting was
eﬀective.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, an independent registered public accounting ﬁrm, has issued its opinion on the
Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of 30 September 2023 as stated in its report which
appears herein.
/s/ Seiﬁ Ghasemi /s/ Melissa N. Schaeﬀer
Seiﬁ Ghasemi Melissa N. Schaeﬀer
Chairman, President, and Senior Vice President and
Chief Executive Oﬃcer Chief Financial Oﬃcer
16 November 2023 16 November 2023
53
Table of Contents
REPOR T OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc.
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and
subsidiaries (the "Company") as of September 30, 2023 and 2022, the related consolidated income
statements, comprehensive income statements, statements of equity, and statements of cash ﬂows, for
each of the three years in the period ended September 30, 2023, and the related notes (collectively
referred to as the "ﬁnancial statements"). We also have audited the Company’s internal control over
ﬁnancial reporting as of September 30, 2023, based on criteria established in Internal Control —
Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the ﬁnancial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the
ﬁnancial position of the Company as of September 30, 2023 and 2022, and the results of its operations
and its cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended September 30, 2023, in conformity
with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Also, in our opinion, the
Company maintained, in all material respects, eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of
September 30, 2023, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013)
issued by COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’s management is responsible for these ﬁnancial statements, for maintaining eﬀective
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, and for its assessment of the eﬀectiveness of internal control
over ﬁnancial reporting, included in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control Over
Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these ﬁnancial statements and an
opinion on the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting based on our audits. We are a public
accounting ﬁrm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB)
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal
securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and
the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that
we plan and perform the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements
are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud, and whether eﬀective internal control
over ﬁnancial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the ﬁnancial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material
misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures to
respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the
amounts and disclosures in the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall
presentation of the ﬁnancial statements. Our audit of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting included
obtaining an understanding of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating eﬀectiveness of internal control
based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other procedures as we considered
necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Deﬁnition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable
assurance regarding the reliability of ﬁnancial reporting and the preparation of ﬁnancial statements for
external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal
control over ﬁnancial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the
maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reﬂect the transactions and
dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of ﬁnancial statements in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only
in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide
reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or
disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material eﬀect on the ﬁnancial statements.
54
Table of Contents
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of eﬀectiveness to future periods are subject to the
risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of
compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the
ﬁnancial statements that was communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee
and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2)
involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical
audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the ﬁnancial statements, taken as a whole, and
we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the
critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Revenue Recognition – On-site Customer Contracts – Refer to Notes 1 and 6 to the Financial
Statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
On-site industrial gas customer contracts involve large capital investments to serve customers who
require large volumes of gases and have relatively constant demand. The Company builds, owns and
operates facilities on or near the customer’s facilities to produce and supply the customer with gases
under a long-term arrangement. Typically, these contracts have 15- to 20-year terms and contain ﬁxed
monthly charges and/or minimum purchase requirements. Revenue associated with these contracts is
generally recognized over time during the period in which the Company delivers or makes available the
agreed upon quantity of gases. In addition, certain on-site industrial gas contracts contain complex
terms and provisions such as tolling arrangements, minimum payment requirements, pricing provisions,
and variable components that are speciﬁc to a customer arrangement, including certain contracts with
related parties. These arrangements may require greater judgment in determining when contractual
requirements have been met, impacting the timing and amount of revenue to be recorded.
We identiﬁed revenue recognition for certain on-site industrial gas customer contracts with complex
terms and provisions as a critical audit matter because of the judgments necessary for management to
evaluate these contract terms, including amendments, in order to determine the amount of revenue to
be recognized. This required a high degree of auditor judgment when performing procedures to audit
management’s determination of the amount and timing of revenue recognition and evaluating the
results of those procedures.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to revenue recognition for certain on-site industrial gas customer contracts
with complex terms and provisions included the following procedures, among others:
•We tested the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s controls related to the amount and timing of
revenue recognition, including controls over the evaluation of complex terms and provisions in
certain on-site industrial gas customer contracts.
•We evaluated the terms included within original customer contracts and related amendments to
assess the accounting for provisions such as minimum payment requirements, pricing provisions,
settlement terms, and variable components that require management to apply judgment in
determining revenue recognition associated with the contract.
•We evaluated customer transactions and agreed the amount of revenue recognized to underlying
contracts, customer invoices, and cash receipts.
•We inquired of personnel who oversee operations, customer relations, and revenue recognition
as to the presence of contract amendments, and interpretation of contract terms.
•We considered the nature of transactions with related parties and any potential impact on
revenue recognition.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Philadelphia, Pennsylvania
November 16, 2023
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2018.
55
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED INCOME ST ATEMENTS
For the Fiscal Years Ended 30 September
(Millions of U.S. Dollars, except for share and per share data) 2023 2022 2021
Sales $12,600.0 $12,698.6 $10,323.0 
Cost of sales 8,833.0 9,338.5 7,186.1 
Facility closure —  —  23.2 
Selling and administrative expense 957.0  900.6  828.4 
Research and development expense 105.6  102.9  93.5 
Business and asset actions 244.6  73.7  — 
Gain on exchange with joint venture partner —  —  36.8 
Other income (expense), net 34.8  55.9  52.8 
Operating Income 2,494.6 2,338.8 2,281.4 
Equity aﬃliates' income 604.3  481.5  294.1 
Interest expense 177.5  128.0  141.8 
Other non-operating income (expense), net (39.0) 62.4  73.7 
Income From Continuing Operations Before Taxes 2,882.4 2,754.7 2,507.4 
Income tax provision 551.2  500.8  462.8 
Income From Continuing Operations 2,331.2 2,253.9 2,044.6 
Income from discontinued operations, net of tax 7.4  12.6  70.3 
Net Income 2,338.6 2,266.5 2,114.9 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of continuing
operations 38.4  10.4  15.8 
Net Income Attributable to Air Products $2,300.2 $2,256.1 $2,099.1 
Net Income Attributable to Air Products
Net income from continuing operations $2,292.8 $2,243.5 $2,028.8 
Net income from discontinued operations 7.4  12.6  70.3 
Net Income Attributable to Air Products $2,300.2 $2,256.1 $2,099.1 
Per Share Data (U.S. Dollars per share)
Basic EPS from continuing operations $10.31 $10.11  $9.16 
Basic EPS from discontinued operations 0.03  0.06  0.32 
Basic EPS attributable to Air Products $10.35 $10.16  $9.47 
Diluted EPS from continuing operations $10.30 $10.08  $9.12 
Diluted EPS from discontinued operations 0.03  0.06  0.32 
Diluted EPS Attributable to Air Products $10.33 $10.14  $9.43 
Weighted Average Common Shares (in millions)
Basic 222.3  222.0  221.6 
Diluted 222.7  222.5  222.5 
Earnings per shar e ("EPS") is calculated independently for each component and may not sum to total EPS due to
rounding.
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.(A)
(A)
56
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED COMPREHENSIVE INCOME ST ATEMENTS
For the Fiscal Years Ended 30 September
(Millions of U.S. Dollars) 2023 2022 2021
Net Income $2,338.6 $2,266.5 $2,114.9 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), net of tax:
Translation adjustments, net of tax of ($32.8), $71.2, and $2.8 151.1 (1,230.5) 267.3 
Net gain (loss) on derivatives, net of tax of $48.6, ($63.9), and
($9.0) 369.2  (120.3) 3.3 
Pension and postretirement beneﬁts, net of tax of ($2.9), ($33.4),
and $91.4 (8.9) (112.2) 274.3 
Reclassiﬁcation adjustments:
   Currency translation adjustment (0.3) 7.3  — 
Derivatives, net of tax of ($13.6), $30.3, and $13.9 (43.9) 91.4  43.5 
Pension and postretirement beneﬁts, net of tax of $17.5, $21.8,
and $24.4 53.8  64.8  74.6 
Total Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) 521.0 (1,299.5) 663.0 
Comprehensive Income 2,859.6  967.0 2,777.9 
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 38.4  10.4  15.8 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) Attributable to
Noncontrolling Interests 184.3  (29.3) 38.8 
Comprehensive Income Attributable to Air Products $2,636.9  $985.9 $2,723.3 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
57
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED BALANCE SHEETS
As of the Fiscal Years Ended 30 September
(Millions of U.S. Dollars, except for share and per share data) 2023 2022
Assets
Current Assets
Cash and cash items $1,617.0  $2,711.0 
Short-term investments 332.2  590.7 
Trade receivables, net 1,700.4  1,794.4 
Inventories 651.8  514.2 
Prepaid expenses 177.0  156.8 
Other receivables and current assets 722.1  515.8 
Total Current Assets 5,200.5  6,282.9 
Investment in net assets of and advances to equity aﬃliates 4,617.8  3,353.8 
Plant and equipment, net 17,472.1  14,160.5 
Goodwill, net 861.7  823.0 
Intangible assets, net 334.6  347.5 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 974.0  694.8 
Noncurrent lease receivables 494.7  583.1 
Financing receivables 817.2  — 
Other noncurrent assets 1,229.9  947.0 
Total Noncurrent Assets 26,802.0  20,909.7 
Total Assets $32,002.5  $27,192.6 
Liabilities and Equity
Current Liabilities
Payables and accrued liabilities $2,890.1  $2,771.6 
Accrued income taxes 131.2  135.2 
Short-term borrowings 259.5  10.7 
Current portion of long-term debt 615.0  548.3 
Total Current Liabilities 3,895.8  3,465.8 
Long-term debt 9,280.6  6,433.8 
Long-term debt – related party 150.7  652.0 
Noncurrent operating lease liabilities 631.1  592.1 
Other noncurrent liabilities 1,118.0  1,099.1 
Deferred income taxes 1,266.0  1,247.4 
Total Noncurrent Liabilities 12,446.4  10,024.4 
Total Liabilities 16,342.2  13,490.2 
Commitments and Contingencies - See Note 18
Air Products Shareholders’ Equity
Common stock (par value $1 per share; issued 2023 and 2022 - 249,455,584 shares) 249.4  249.4 
Capital in excess of par value 1,190.5  1,141.4 
Retained earnings 17,289.7  16,520.3 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (2,449.4) (2,786.1)
Treasury stock, at cost (2023 - 27,255,739 shares; 2022 - 27,616,888 shares) (1,967.3) (1,981.0)
Total Air Products Shareholders' Equity 14,312.9  13,144.0 
Noncontrolling Interests 1,347.4  558.4 
Total Equity 15,660.3  13,702.4 
Total Liabilities and Equity $32,002.5  $27,192.6 
Includes balances associated with a consolidated variable interest entity ("VIE"), including amounts reﬂected in "Total Assets"
that can only be used to settle obligations of the VIE of $2,256.8 and $519.7 as of 30 September 2023 and 30 September 2022,
respectively, as well as liabilities of the VIE reﬂected within "Total Liabilities" for which creditors do not have recourse to the
general credit of Air Products of $1,461.1 and $506.8 as of 30 September 2023 and 30 September 2022, respectively. Refer to
Note 3, Variable Interest Entities, for additional information.
The accompanying notes ar e an integral part of these statements.(A)
(A)
(A)
(A)
58
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF CASH FL OWS
For the Fiscal Years Ended 30 September
(Millions of U.S. Dollars) 2023 2022 2021
Operating Activities
Net income $2,338.6 $2,266.5 $2,114.9 
Less: Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of continuing operations 38.4  10.4  15.8 
Net income attributable to Air Products 2,300.2 2,256.1 2,099.1 
Net income from discontinued operations (7.4) (12.6) (70.3)
Net income from continuing operations attributable to Air Products 2,292.8 2,243.5 2,028.8 
Adjustments to reconcile income to cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 1,358.3 1,338.2 1,321.3 
Deferred income taxes (24.7) 32.3  94.0 
Facility closure —  —  23.2 
Business and asset actions 244.6  73.7  — 
Undistributed earnings of equity method investments (261.2) (214.7) (138.2)
Gain on sale of assets and investments (15.8) (24.1) (37.2)
Share-based compensation 59.9  48.4  44.5 
Noncurrent lease receivables 79.6  94.0  98.8 
Other adjustments (103.0) (304.9) (116.7)
Working capital changes that provided (used) cash, excluding eﬀects of acquisitions:
Trade receivables 130.7  (475.2) (130.5)
Inventories (129.4) (94.3) (47.2)
Other receivables (93.8) (1.8) 75.5 
Payables and accrued liabilities (213.3) 532.5  187.9 
Other working capital (119.0) (77.0) (69.0)
Cash Provided by Operating Activities 3,205.7 3,170.6 3,335.2 
Investing Activities
Additions to plant and equipment, including long-term deposits (4,626.4)(2,926.5)(2,464.2)
Acquisitions, less cash acquired —  (65.1) (10.5)
Investment in and advances to unconsolidated aﬃliates (912.0)(1,658.4) (76.0)
Investment in ﬁnancing receivables (665.1) —  — 
Proceeds from sale of assets and investments 25.4  46.2  37.5 
Purchases of investments (640.1)(1,637.8)(2,100.7)
Proceeds from investments 897.0 2,377.4 1,875.2 
Other investing activities 4.8  7.0  5.8 
Cash Used for Investing Activities (5,916.4)(3,857.2)(2,732.9)
Financing Activities
Long-term debt proceeds 3,516.2  766.2  178.9 
Payments on long-term debt (615.4) (400.0) (462.9)
Net increase in commercial paper and short-term borrowings 268.2  17.9  1.0 
Dividends paid to shareholders (1,496.6)(1,383.3)(1,256.7)
Proceeds from stock option exercises 24.0  19.3  10.6 
Investments by noncontrolling interests 234.9  21.0  136.6 
Distributions to noncontrolling interests (115.9) (4.8) (5.3)
Other ﬁnancing activities (205.8) (36.9) (23.1)
Cash Provided by (Used for) Financing Activities 1,609.6 (1,000.6)(1,420.9)
Discontinued Operations
Cash provided by operating activities 0.6  59.6  6.7 
Cash provided by investing activities —  —  — 
Cash provided by ﬁnancing activities —  —  — 
Cash Provided by Discontinued Operations 0.6  59.6  6.7 
Eﬀect of Exchange Rate Changes on Cash 6.5  (130.3) 27.8 
Decrease in cash and cash items (1,094.0)(1,757.9) (784.1)
Cash and Cash items – Beginning of Year 2,711.0 4,468.9 5,253.0 
Cash and Cash Items – End of Period $1,617.0 $2,711.0 $4,468.9 
The accompanying notes ar e an integral part of these statements.
59
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF EQUITY
For the Fiscal Years Ended 30 September
(Millions of U.S. Dollars,
except for per share data)Common
StockCapital
in Excess
of Par
ValueRetained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Treasury
StockAir Products
Shareholders’
EquityNon-
controlling
InterestsTotal
Equity
Balance as of 30
September 2020$249.4 $1,094.8 $14,875.7  ($2,140.1)($2,000.0)$12,079.8 $363.3 $12,443.1 
Net income —  —  2,099.1  —  —  2,099.1  15.8  2,114.9 
Other comprehensive
income (loss)—  —  —  624.2  —  624.2  38.8  663.0 
Dividends on common stock
(per share $5.84)—  — (1,292.6) —  —  (1,292.6) — (1,292.6)
Distributions to
noncontrolling interests—  —  —  —  —  —  (5.3) (5.3)
Share-based compensation —  43.5  —  —  —  43.5  —  43.5 
Issuance of treasury shares
for stock option and award
plans—  (21.5) —  —  12.1  (9.4) —  (9.4)
Investments by
noncontrolling interests—  —  —  —  —  —  139.8  139.8 
Purchase of noncontrolling
interests—  (1.2) —  —  —  (1.2) (4.1) (5.3)
Other equity transactions —  0.2  (3.9) —  —  (3.7) —  (3.7)
Balance as of 30
September 2021$249.4 $1,115.8 $15,678.3  ($1,515.9)($1,987.9)$13,539.7 $548.3 $14,088.0 
Net income —  —  2,256.1  —  —  2,256.1  10.4  2,266.5 
Other comprehensive
income (loss)—  —  —  (1,270.2) —  (1,270.2) (29.3)(1,299.5)
Dividends on common stock
(per share $6.36)—  — (1,410.6) —  —  (1,410.6) — (1,410.6)
Distributions to
noncontrolling interests—  —  —  —  —  —  (4.8) (4.8)
Share-based compensation —  46.0  —  —  —  46.0  —  46.0 
Issuance of treasury shares
for stock option and award
plans—  (20.9) —  —  6.9  (14.0) —  (14.0)
Investments by
noncontrolling interests—  —  —  —  —  —  33.0  33.0 
Purchase of noncontrolling
interests—  —  —  —  —  —  (1.9) (1.9)
Other equity transactions —  0.5  (3.5) —  —  (3.0) 2.7  (0.3)
Balance as of 30
September 2022$249.4 $1,141.4 $16,520.3  ($2,786.1)($1,981.0)$13,144.0 $558.4 $13,702.4 
Net income —  —  2,300.2  —  —  2,300.2  38.4  2,338.6 
Other comprehensive
income (loss)—  —  —  336.7  —  336.7  184.3  521.0 
Dividends on common stock
(per share $6.87)—  — (1,526.2) —  —  (1,526.2) — (1,526.2)
Distributions to
noncontrolling interests—  —  —  —  —  — (115.9) (115.9)
Share-based compensation —  54.6  —  —  —  54.6  —  54.6 
Issuance of treasury shares
for stock option and award
plans—  (6.1) —  —  13.7  7.6  —  7.6 
Investments by
noncontrolling interests—  —  —  —  —  —  682.2  682.2 
Other equity transactions —  0.6  (4.6) —  —  (4.0) —  (4.0)
Balance as of 30
September 2023$249.4 $1,190.5 $17,289.7  ($2,449.4)($1,967.3)$14,312.9 $1,347.4 $15,660.3 
Includes noncash activity r elated to the NEOM Gr een Hydr ogen Company joint ventur e. Refer to Note 3, Variable Interest Entities , for
additional infor mation.
The accompanying notes ar e an integral part of these statements.(A)
(A)
60
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL ST ATEMENTS
(Millions of U.S. Dollars unless otherwise indicated, except for share and per share data)
1.Basis of Presentation and Major Accounting Policies 62
2.New Accounting Guidance 70
3.Variable Interest Entities 71
4.Business and Asset Actions 73
5.Acquisitions 73
6.Revenue Recognition 74
7.Discontinued Operations 77
8.Inventories 77
9.Equity Aﬃliates 78
10.Plant and Equipment, net 80
11.Goodwill 80
12.Intangible Assets 81
13.Leases 82
14.Financial Instruments 84
15.Fair Value Measurements 88
16.Debt 90
17.Retirement Beneﬁts 93
18.Commitments and Contingencies 99
19.Capital Stock 103
20.Share-Based Compensation 103
21.Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss 105
22.Earnings Per Share 106
23.Income Taxes 107
24.Supplemental Information 112
25.Business Segment and Geographic Information 114
61
Table of Contents
1.  BASIS OF PRESENT ATION AND MAJOR ACCOUNTING POLICIES
As used in this report, unless the context indicates otherwise, the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” the
“Company,” "Air Products," or “registrant” include our controlled subsidiaries and aﬃliates.
About Air Products
Air Products, a Delaware corporation originally founded in 1940, is a world-leading industrial gases
company. Focused on energy, environmental, and emerging markets, Air Products' core business
provides a portfolio of products, and services that include atmospheric gases, process and specialty
gases, equipment, and related services to customers in dozens of industries. Air Products also develops,
engineers, builds, owns, and operates some of the world's largest industrial gas and carbon-capture
projects, supplying world-scale clean hydrogen that will support the world's transition to lower carbon
energy, particularly in the global transportation, and industrial markets. Air Products trades on the New
York Stock Exchange under the symbol "APD."
Air Products manages and reports its operating results through ﬁve reportable segments: Americas, Asia,
Europe, Middle East and India, and Corporate and other. Refer to Note 25, Business Segment and
Geographic Information, for additional information.
Basis of Presentation
The accompanying consolidated ﬁnancial statements were prepared in accordance with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America (“GAAP”) and include the accounts of Air
Products and Chemicals, Inc. and those of its controlled subsidiaries. The notes that follow are an
integral part of our consolidated ﬁnancial statements. These notes, unless otherwise indicated, are
presented on a continuing operations basis. Intercompany transactions and balances are eliminated in
consolidation.
Discontinued Operations
The results of operations and cash ﬂows for our discontinued operations have been segregated from the
results of continuing operations and segment results. The comprehensive income related to discontinued
operations has not been segregated and is included in the consolidated comprehensive income
statements. There were no assets and liabilities presented as discontinued operations on our
consolidated balance sheets. Refer to Note 7, Discontinued Operations, for additional information.
Estimates and Assumptions
Preparation of the consolidated ﬁnancial statements in conformity with GAAP requires management to
make estimates and assumptions that aﬀect amounts reported in the consolidated ﬁnancial statements
and the accompanying notes. Actual results could diﬀer from those estimates.
Reclassiﬁcations
Certain prior year information has been reclassiﬁed to conform to the ﬁscal year 2023 presentation. For
example, beginning in the ﬁrst quarter of ﬁscal year 2023, we present "Operating lease right-of-use
assets, net" and "Noncurrent operating lease liabilities" in separate captions on our consolidated balance
sheets. These balances were previously presented within "Other noncurrent assets" and "Other
noncurrent liabilities," respectively.
Consolidation Principles
We consolidate all entities we control under either the voting interest model, which generally applies
when we hold a majority of the voting interest of an entity, or the variable interest model, which applies
to arrangements for which we are the primary beneﬁciary of a variable interest entity ("VIE"). For
consolidated subsidiaries in which our ownership is less than 100%, the outside shareholders’ interests
are reﬂected as non-controlling interests on our consolidated ﬁnancial statements.
We are considered the primary beneﬁciary of a VIE when we have both the power to direct the activities
that most signiﬁcantly impact the economic performance of the VIE and the obligation to absorb losses
or the right to receive beneﬁts that could potentially be signiﬁcant to the VIE. We are the primary
beneﬁciary of the NEOM Green Hydrogen Company and consolidate the joint venture within our Middle
East and India segment. For additional information, refer to Note 3, Variable Interest Entities. We are not
the primary beneﬁciary of any other material VIEs.
We account for a VIE for which we exercise signiﬁcant inﬂuence but are not the primary beneﬁciary, such
as the Jazan Integrated Gasiﬁcation and Power Company joint venture, as an equity method investment.
For additional information on this joint venture, refer to Note 9, Equity Aﬃliates.
62
Table of Contents
Revenue Recognition
We recognize revenue when or as performance obligations are satisﬁed, which occurs when control is
transferred to the customer.
We determine the transaction price of our contracts based on the amount of consideration to which we
expect to be entitled to receive in exchange for the goods or services provided. Our contracts within the
scope of revenue guidance do not contain payment terms that include a signiﬁcant ﬁnancing
component.
Sales returns and allowances are not a business practice in the industry.
Our sale of gas contracts are either accounted for over time during the period in which we deliver or
make available the agreed upon quantity of goods or at a point in time when the customer receives and
obtains control of the product, which generally occurs upon delivery. We generally recognize revenue
from our sale of gas contracts based on the right to invoice practical expedient.
Our sale of equipment contracts are generally comprised of a single performance obligation as the
individual promised goods or services contained within the contracts are integrated with or dependent
upon other goods or services in the contract for a single output to the customer. Revenue from our sale
of equipment contracts is generally recognized over time as we have an enforceable right to payment
for performance completed to date and our performance under the contract terms does not create an
asset with alternative use. We recognize these contracts using a cost incurred input method by which
costs incurred to date relative to total estimated costs at completion are used to measure progress
toward satisfying performance obligations.
Amounts billed for shipping and handling fees are classiﬁed as sales in the consolidated income
statements. Shipping and handling activities for our sale of equipment contracts may be performed after
the customer obtains control of the promised goods. In these cases, we have elected to apply the
practical expedient to account for shipping and handling as activities to fulﬁll the promise to transfer the
goods.
Amounts billed for sales and use taxes, value-added taxes, and certain excise and other speciﬁc
transactional taxes imposed on revenue-producing transactions are presented on a net basis and
excluded from sales in the consolidated income statements.
For additional information, refer to Note 6, Revenue Recognition.
Cost of Sales
Cost of sales predominantly represents the cost of tangible products sold. These costs include labor, raw
materials, plant engineering, power, depreciation, production supplies and materials packaging costs,
and maintenance costs. Costs incurred for shipping and handling are also included in cost of sales.
Depreciation
Depreciation is recorded using the straight-line method, which deducts equal amounts of the cost of
each asset from earnings every year over its expected economic useful life. The principal lives for major
classes of plant and equipment are summarized in Note 10, Plant and Equipment, net.
Selling and Administrative Expense
The principal components of selling and administrative expense are costs related to compensation,
administrative functions, and professional fees.
Postemployment Beneﬁts
We provide ongoing beneﬁt arrangements that provide nonretirement postemployment beneﬁts such as
severance and outplacement services to involuntarily terminated employees. We record a liability for
these beneﬁts when we determine it is probable that the beneﬁts will be paid in an amount that can be
reasonably estimated. These criteria are met when management, with the appropriate level of authority,
approves and commits to a termination plan that identiﬁes impacted employees and their related
beneﬁts and is expected to be substantially completed within one year. We do not provide material one-
time beneﬁt arrangements.
Fair Value Measurements
We are required to measure certain assets and liabilities at fair value, either upon initial measurement or
for subsequent accounting or reporting. For example, fair value is used in the initial measurement of
assets and liabilities acquired in a business combination; on a recurring basis in the measurement of
derivative ﬁnancial instruments; and on a nonrecurring basis when long-lived assets are written down to
fair value when held for sale or determined to be impaired. Refer to Note 15, Fair Value Measurements,
and Note 17, Retirement Beneﬁts, for information on the methods and assumptions used in our fair
value measurements.
63
Table of Contents
Financial Instruments
We address certain ﬁnancial exposures through a controlled program of risk management that includes
the use of derivative ﬁnancial instruments. The types of derivative ﬁnancial instruments permitted for
such risk management programs are speciﬁed in policies set by management. Refer to Note 14,
Financial Instruments, for further detail on the types and use of derivative instruments into which we
enter.
Major ﬁnancial institutions are counterparties to all of these derivative contracts. We have established
counterparty credit guidelines and generally enter into transactions with ﬁnancial institutions of
investment grade or better. Management believes the risk of incurring losses related to credit risk is
remote, and any losses would be immaterial to the consolidated ﬁnancial results, ﬁnancial condition, or
liquidity.
We recognize derivatives on the balance sheet at fair value. On the date the derivative instrument is
entered into, we generally designate the derivative as either (1) a hedge of a forecasted transaction or
of the variability of cash ﬂows to be received or paid related to a recognized asset or liability (cash ﬂow
hedge), (2) a hedge of a net investment in a foreign operation (net investment hedge), or (3) a hedge of
the fair value of a recognized asset or liability (fair value hedge).
The following details the accounting treatment of our cash ﬂow, fair value, net investment, and non-
designated hedges:
•Changes in the fair value of a derivative that is designated as and meets the cash ﬂow hedge
criteria are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive loss ("AOCL") to the extent eﬀective and
then recognized in earnings when the hedged items aﬀect earnings.
•Changes in the fair value of a derivative that is designated as and meets all the required criteria
for a fair value hedge, along with the gain or loss on the hedged asset or liability that is attributable
to the hedged risk, are recorded in current period earnings.
•Changes in the fair value of a derivative and foreign currency debt that are designated as and
meet all the required criteria for a hedge of a net investment are recorded as translation
adjustments in AOCL.
•Changes in the fair value of a derivative that is not designated as a hedge are recorded
immediately in earnings.
We formally document the relationships between hedging instruments and hedged items, as well as our
risk management objective and strategy for undertaking various hedge transactions. This process
includes relating derivatives that are designated as fair value or cash ﬂow hedges to speciﬁc assets and
liabilities on the balance sheet or to speciﬁc ﬁrm commitments or forecasted transactions. We also
formally assess, at the inception of the hedge and on an ongoing basis, whether derivatives are highly
eﬀective in oﬀsetting changes in fair values or cash ﬂows of the hedged item. If it is determined that a
derivative is not highly eﬀective as a hedge, or if a derivative ceases to be a highly eﬀective hedge, we
will discontinue hedge accounting with respect to that derivative prospectively.
Foreign Currency
Since we do business in many foreign countries, ﬂuctuations in currency exchange rates aﬀect our
ﬁnancial position and results of operations.
In most of our foreign operations, the local currency is considered the functional currency. Foreign
subsidiaries translate their assets and liabilities into U.S. dollars at current exchange rates in eﬀect as of
the balance sheet date. The gains or losses that result from this process are shown as translation
adjustments in AOCL in the equity section of the balance sheet.
The revenue and expense accounts of foreign subsidiaries are translated into U.S. dollars at the average
exchange rates that prevail during the period. Therefore, the U.S. dollar value of these items on the
consolidated income statements ﬂuctuates from period to period, depending on the value of the U.S.
dollar against foreign currencies. Some transactions are made in currencies diﬀerent from an entity’s
functional currency. Gains and losses from these foreign currency transactions, and the impact of related
hedges, are generally reﬂected in "Other income (expense), net" on our consolidated income statements
as they occur and were not material for the periods presented.
Foreign exchange gains and losses from the foreign currency remeasurement of balances associated
with intercompany and third-party ﬁnancing transactions, related income tax assets and liabilities, and
the impact of related hedges are reﬂected within “Other non-operating income (expense), net" and were
not material for the periods presented.
64
Table of Contents
In addition, foreign currency forward points and currency swap basis diﬀerences that are excluded from
the assessment of hedge eﬀectiveness of our cash ﬂow hedges of intercompany loans (“excluded
components”) are recorded within “Other non-operating income (expense), net" on a straight-line basis.
Excluded components were expenses of $25.1, $23.2, and $31.0 in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021,
respectively.
Government Assistance
We receive, or expect to receive in the future, various types of government assistance, primarily in the
form of grants or refundable tax credits. Government assistance is recognized when there is reasonable
assurance that we have complied with relevant conditions and the assistance will be received.
Government assistance is recognized in the consolidated income statements on a systematic basis over
the periods in which we recognize the related costs for which the government assistance is intended to
compensate. Government assistance related to assets is included in the balance sheet as a reduction of
the cost of the asset and results in reduced depreciation expense over the useful life of the asset.
Government assistance that relates to expenses is recognized in the income statement as a reduction of
the related expense or as a component of other income (expense), net. Government assistance did not
have a material impact on our ﬁnancial statements in ﬁscal year 2023.
Environmental Expenditures
Accruals for environmental loss contingencies are recorded when it is probable that a liability has been
incurred and the amount of loss can be reasonably estimated. Remediation costs are capitalized if the
costs improve our property as compared with the condition of the property when originally constructed
or acquired, or if the costs prevent environmental contamination from future operations. We expense
environmental costs related to existing conditions resulting from past or current operations and from
which no current or future beneﬁt is discernible. The amounts charged to income from continuing
operations related to environmental matters totaled $24.9, $22.3, and $18.6 in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022,
and 2021, respectively.
The measurement of environmental liabilities is based on an evaluation of currently available
information with respect to each individual site and considers factors such as existing technology,
presently enacted laws and regulations, and prior experience in remediation of contaminated sites. An
environmental liability related to cleanup of a contaminated site might include, for example, a provision
for one or more of the following types of costs: site investigation and testing costs, remediation costs,
post-remediation monitoring costs, natural resource damages, and outside legal fees. These liabilities
include costs related to other potentially responsible parties to the extent that we have reason to believe
such parties will not fully pay their proportionate share. They do not consider any claims for recoveries
from insurance or other parties and are not discounted.
As assessments and remediation progress at individual sites, the amount of projected cost is reviewed,
and the liability is adjusted to reﬂect additional technical and legal information that becomes available.
Management has an established process in place to identify and monitor our environmental exposures.
An environmental accrual analysis is prepared and maintained that lists all environmental loss
contingencies, even where an accrual has not been established. This analysis assists in monitoring our
overall environmental exposure and serves as a tool to facilitate ongoing communication among our
technical experts, environmental managers, environmental lawyers, and ﬁnancial management to
ensure that required accruals are recorded and potential exposures disclosed.
Due to inherent uncertainties involved in evaluating environmental exposures, actual costs to be
incurred at identiﬁed sites in future periods may vary from the estimates. Refer to Note 18,
Commitments and Contingencies, for additional information on our environmental loss contingencies.
The accruals for environmental liabilities are reﬂected in the consolidated balance sheets, primarily as
part of other noncurrent liabilities.
Litigation
In the normal course of business, we are involved in legal proceedings. We accrue a liability for such
matters when it is probable that a liability has been incurred and the amount of loss can be reasonably
estimated. When only a range of possible loss can be established, the most probable amount in the
range is accrued. If no amount within this range is a better estimate than any other amount within the
range, the minimum amount in the range is accrued. The accrual for a litigation loss contingency
includes estimates of potential damages and other directly related costs expected to be incurred. Refer
to Note 18, Commitments and Contingencies, for additional information on our current legal
proceedings.
65
Table of Contents
Share-Based Compensation
We expense the grant-date fair value of our share-based awards over the vesting period during which
employees perform related services. Expense recognition is accelerated for retirement-eligible
individuals who would meet the requirements for vesting of awards upon their retirement. Refer to Note
20, Share-Based Compensation, for additional information regarding our awards, including the models
and assumptions used to determine their grant-date fair value.
Income Taxes
We account for income taxes under the asset and liability method. Under this method, deferred tax
assets and liabilities are recognized for the tax eﬀects of temporary diﬀerences between the ﬁnancial
reporting and tax bases of assets and liabilities using enacted tax rates in eﬀect for the year in which the
diﬀerences are expected to be recovered or settled. A principal temporary diﬀerence results from the
excess of tax depreciation over book depreciation because accelerated methods of depreciation and
shorter useful lives are used for income tax purposes. The cumulative impact of a change in tax rates or
regulations is included in income tax expense in the period that includes the enactment date. We
recognize deferred tax assets net of existing valuation allowances to the extent we believe that these
assets are more likely than not to be realized considering all available evidence.
A tax beneﬁt for an uncertain tax position is recognized when it is more likely than not that the position
will be sustained upon examination based on its technical merits. This position is measured as the
largest amount of tax beneﬁt that is greater than 50% likely of being realized. Interest and penalties
related to unrecognized tax beneﬁts are recognized as a component of income tax expense.
We have elected as an accounting policy to account for Global Intangible Low Tax Income (“GILTI”) as a
period cost when incurred.
For additional information regarding our income taxes, refer to Note 23, Income Taxes.
Other Non-Operating Income (Expense), net
"Other non-operating income (expense), net" includes interest income associated with our cash and cash
items and short-term investments, certain foreign currency remeasurements and impacts from the
related hedging activities discussed in the Foreign Currency section above, and non-service cost
components of net periodic pension and postretirement beneﬁt cost. Our non-service costs primarily
include interest cost, expected return on plan assets, amortization of actuarial gains and losses, and
settlements.
Cash and Cash Items
"Cash and cash items" include cash, time deposits, and treasury securities acquired with an original
maturity of three months or less.
Short-term Investments
"Short-term investments" include time deposits and treasury securities with original maturities greater
than three months and less than one year.
Credit Losses
We are exposed to credit losses primarily through sales of products and services. When extending credit,
we evaluate customer creditworthiness based on a combination of qualitative and quantitative factors
that include, but are not limited to, the customer’s credit score from external providers, ﬁnancial
condition, and past payment experience.
We assess allowances for credit losses on our trade receivables, lease receivable, and ﬁnancing
receivable portfolios. Allowances are evaluated by portfolio on a collective basis where similar
characteristics exist. A provision for customer defaults is made on a general formula basis as the risk of
some default is expected but cannot yet be associated with speciﬁc customers. The assessment of the
likelihood of default is based on various factors, including the length of time the receivables are past
due, historical experience, existing economic conditions, and forward-looking information. When we
identify speciﬁc customers with known collectability issues, the assessment for credit losses is
performed on an individual basis, considering current and forward-looking information of the customer.
We also consider variables that may mitigate the inherent credit risk of a particular transaction, such as
the estimated fair value of the collateral, whether by use or sale.
66
Table of Contents
The use of forward-looking information considers economic conditions that may aﬀect the customers’
ability to pay. Although we historically have not experienced signiﬁcant credit losses, our exposure to
credit losses may increase if our customers are adversely aﬀected by economic pressures or uncertainty
associated with local or global economic recessions, or other customer-speciﬁc factors. We review our
reserves for credit losses on a quarterly basis.
Trade receivables comprise amounts owed to us through our operating activities and are presented net
of allowances for credit losses. Changes to the carrying amount of the allowance for credit losses on
trade receivables are summarized below:
Balance at 30 September 2020 $23.9 
Adoption of new credit losses standard 0.5 
Provision for credit losses 2.7 
Write-oﬀs charged against the allowance (3.8)
Currency translation and other 1.8 
Balance at 30 September 2021 $25.1 
Provision for credit losses 7.5 
Write-oﬀs charged against the allowance (7.9)
Currency translation and other (0.6)
Balance at 30 September 2022 $24.1 
Provision for credit losses 8.2 
Write-oﬀs charged against the allowance (7.9)
Currency translation and other (1.5)
Balance at 30 September 2023 $22.9 
In addition, our lease receivables and ﬁnancing receivables are presented net of allowances for credit
losses. As of 30 September 2023 and 2022, the credit quality of lease receivables and ﬁnancing
receivables did not require a material allowance for credit losses. For additional information on our lease
arrangements, refer to Note 13, Leases.
Inventories
We carry inventory that is comprised of ﬁnished goods, work-in-process, raw materials and supplies.
Refer to Note 8, Inventories, for further detail.
Inventories on our consolidated balance sheets are stated at the lower of cost or net realizable value. We
determine the cost of all our inventories on a ﬁrst-in, ﬁrst-out basis ("FIFO"). We write down our
inventories for estimated obsolescence or unmarketable inventory based upon assumptions about future
demand and market conditions.
Equity Method Investments
We apply the equity method of accounting when we have the ability to exercise signiﬁcant inﬂuence but
do not control the operating and ﬁnancial decisions of an investee, which generally applies when our
ownership interest in common stock or in-substance common stock of the investee is between 20% and
50%. Under the equity method, we initially record our investment at cost and subsequently adjust the
investment to recognize our share of net earnings or losses, distributions received, and other-than-
temporary impairments. The carrying value of our equity method investments is reﬂected as
"Investment in net assets of and advances to equity aﬃliates" on our consolidated balance sheets. We
use the cumulative earnings approach for determining cash ﬂow presentation of cash distributions
received from equity method investees. Equity investments are reviewed for impairment whenever
events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the investment may not be
recoverable.
Our share of the investee's net earnings is primarily presented net of income taxes within “Equity
aﬃliates’ income" on our consolidated income statements. Proﬁts or losses related to intra-entity sales
with our equity method investees are eliminated consistent with our ownership percentage in the entity
until realized by the investee through a transaction with a third party. In addition, “Equity aﬃliates’
income” includes interest income from shareholder loans viewed as in-substance common stock.
67
Table of Contents
Plant and Equipment, net
Plant and equipment, net is stated at cost less accumulated depreciation. Construction costs, labor, and
applicable overhead related to installations are capitalized. Expenditures for additions and
improvements that extend the lives or increase the capacity of plant assets are capitalized. The costs of
maintenance and repairs of plant and equipment are expensed as incurred.
Fully depreciated assets are retained in the gross plant and equipment and accumulated depreciation
accounts until they are removed from service. In the case of disposals, assets and related accumulated
depreciation are removed from the accounts, and the net amounts, less proceeds from disposal, are
included in income. Refer to Note 10, Plant and Equipment, net, for further detail.
Computer Software
We capitalize costs incurred to purchase or develop software for internal use. Capitalized costs include
purchased computer software packages, payments to vendors/consultants for development and
implementation or modiﬁcation to a purchased package to meet our requirements, payroll and related
costs for employees directly involved in development, and interest incurred while software is being
developed. Capitalized costs are reﬂected in "Plant and equipment, net" on the consolidated balance
sheets and are depreciated over the estimated useful life of the software, generally a period of three to
ﬁve years.
We capitalize costs incurred with the implementation of a cloud computing arrangement that is a service
contract, consistent with our policy for software developed or obtained for internal use. However, the
capitalized costs are reﬂected in "Other noncurrent assets" on our consolidated balance sheets and
expensed over the term of the related hosting arrangement.
Leases as Lessee
As lessee, we recognize a right-of-use ("ROU") asset and lease liability on the balance sheet for all leases
with terms in excess of 12 months. We evaluate whether an arrangement contains a lease at inception
by determining whether there is an identiﬁable asset, we obtain substantially all the economic beneﬁts
from that asset, and we direct how and for what purpose the asset is used during the term of the
arrangement. We apply a practical expedient to exclude arrangements with initial terms of 12 months or
less from our balance sheet.
ROU assets represent our right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilities
represent our obligation to make lease payments arising from the lease. ROU assets and lease liabilities
are recognized at the commencement date based on the present value of lease payments over the lease
term. Since our leases generally do not provide an implicit discount rate, we use our incremental
borrowing rates based on the information available at the commencement date in determining the
present value of lease payments. To determine the incremental borrowing rate, we consider our
unsecured borrowings and published market rates, and then adjust those rates to assume full
collateralization and to factor in the individual lease term, geography, and payment structure.
Our lease term includes periods covered by options to extend or terminate the lease when it is
reasonably certain that we will exercise an option to extend or not exercise an option to terminate. Lease
payments consider our practical expedient to combine amounts for lease and related non-lease
components for all classes of underlying assets in which we are lessee. Fixed payments and payments
associated with escalation clauses based on an index are included in the ROU asset and lease liability at
commencement. Variable lease payments are excluded from the ROU assets and lease liabilities and are
recognized in the period in which the obligation for those payments is incurred. Our variable lease
payments primarily include the impact from escalation clauses that are not ﬁxed or based on an index.
Prepaid lease payments are included in the recognition of ROU assets. Our lease agreements do not
contain any material lease incentives, residual value guarantees or restrictions or covenants.
Leases as Lessor
Certain contracts associated with facilities that are built to provide product to a speciﬁc customer are
accounted for as containing embedded leases. Our lease receivables are primarily long-term in nature
and relate to sales-type leases on certain on-site assets for which payments are collected over the
contract term. Revenue representing interest income from the ﬁnancing component of the lease
receivable is reﬂected as sales over the life of the contract.
68
Table of Contents
In cases for which operating lease treatment is appropriate, there is no diﬀerence in revenue recognition
over the life of the contract as compared to accounting for the contract under a sale of gas agreement.
These contracts qualify for a practical expedient available to lessors to combine the lease and non-lease
components and account for the combined component in accordance with the accounting treatment for
the predominant component. We elected to apply this practical expedient and have accounted for the
combined component as product sales under the revenue standard as we control the operations and
maintenance of the assets that provide the supply of gas to our customers.
As we generally control the operations and maintenance of the assets that provide the supply of gas to
our customers, there have been no new arrangements that qualiﬁed as a lease in ﬁscal year 2023.
Financing Receivables
Some of our acquisitions include terms that provide the seller with both the right to receive all output
from the acquired asset for an agreed upon term as well as the right to reacquire the asset at a future
date. In these instances, we evaluate the contract terms to determine whether we have obtained control
of the underlying asset, or the transaction qualiﬁes as a ﬁnancing arrangement. For transactions that
qualify as ﬁnancing arrangements, we record our investment as a ﬁnancing receivable, net of any
allowances for credit losses, on our consolidated balance sheets. We then recognize a portion of the
payments received as a reduction to the ﬁnancing receivable. Related interest income is presented
within “Sales” on our consolidated income statements with revenue received to operate the plant.
Interest income on our ﬁnancing receivables was not material in ﬁscal year 2023.
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets
Long-lived assets are grouped for impairment testing at the lowest level for which there are identiﬁable
cash ﬂows that are largely independent of the cash ﬂows of other assets and liabilities. Long-lived assets
are evaluated for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying
amount of an asset group may not be recoverable. We assess recoverability by comparing the carrying
amount of the asset group to estimated undiscounted future cash ﬂows expected to be generated by the
asset group. If an asset group is considered impaired, the impairment loss to be recognized is measured
as the amount by which the asset group’s carrying amount exceeds its fair value. Long-lived assets
meeting the held for sale criteria are reported at the lower of carrying amount or fair value less cost to
sell.
Asset Retirement Obligations
The fair value of a liability for an asset retirement obligation is recognized in the period in which it is
incurred. The fair value of the liability is measured using discounted estimated cash ﬂows and is
adjusted to its present value in subsequent periods as accretion expense is recorded. The corresponding
asset retirement costs are capitalized as part of the carrying amount of the related long-lived asset and
depreciated over the asset’s useful life. Our asset retirement obligations are primarily associated with
on-site long-term supply contracts under which we have built a facility on land owned by the customer
and are obligated to remove the facility at the end of the contract term. Our asset retirement obligations
totaled $297.3 and $274.7 at 30 September 2023 and 2022, respectively. Refer to Note 18,
Commitments and Contingencies, for further detail.
Goodwill
Business combinations are accounted for using the acquisition method. The purchase price is allocated
to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on their estimated fair values. Any excess purchase
price (plus the fair value of any noncontrolling interest and previously held equity interest in the
acquiree) over the fair market value of the net assets acquired, including identiﬁed intangibles, is
recorded as goodwill. Preliminary purchase price allocations are made at the date of acquisition and
ﬁnalized when information about facts and circumstances that existed as of the acquisition date needed
to ﬁnalize underlying estimates is obtained or when we determine that such information is not
obtainable, within a maximum measurement period of one year.
Goodwill is subject to impairment testing at least annually. In addition, goodwill is tested more frequently
if a change in circumstances or the occurrence of events indicates that potential impairment exists.
Refer to Note 11, Goodwill, for further detail.
Intangible Assets
Intangible assets with determinable lives primarily consist of customer relationships, purchased patents
and technology, and certain land use rights. The cost of intangible assets with determinable lives is
amortized on a straight-line basis over the estimated period of economic beneﬁt. No residual value is
estimated for these intangible assets. Indeﬁnite-lived intangible assets consist of trade names and
trademarks. Indeﬁnite-lived intangibles are subject to impairment testing at least annually. In addition,
intangible assets are tested more frequently if a change in circumstances or the occurrence of events
indicates that potential impairment exists.
69
Table of Contents
Customer relationships are generally amortized over periods of ﬁve to 25 years. Purchased patents and
technology and other ﬁnite-lived intangibles are generally amortized over periods of ﬁve to 15 years.
Other intangibles includes certain land use rights, which are generally amortized over a period of 50
years. Amortizable lives are adjusted whenever there is a change in the estimated period of economic
beneﬁt. Refer to Note 12, Intangible Assets, for further detail.
Retirement Beneﬁts
Our retirement beneﬁt plans are discussed in Note 17, Retirement Beneﬁts. The cost of beneﬁts we
contribute to deﬁned contribution plans is recognized in the year earned. The cost of beneﬁts under our
deﬁned beneﬁt and other post-retirement plans is generally recognized over the employees’ service
period. We use actuarial methods and assumptions in the valuation of deﬁned beneﬁt obligations and
the determination of expense. Diﬀerences between actual and expected results or changes in the value
of obligations and plan assets are recognized systematically over subsequent periods.
2.  NEW ACCOUNTING GUIDANCE
Accounting Guidance Implemented in Fiscal Year 2023
Government Assistance
In November 2021, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued disclosure guidance to
increase the transparency of transactions an entity has with a government that are accounted for by
applying a grant or contribution accounting model. We adopted the annual disclosure guidance on a
prospective basis in ﬁscal year 2023. Refer to Note 1, Basis of Presentation and Major Accounting
Policies, for additional information.
Reference Rate Reform
In March 2020, the FASB issued an update to provide practical expedients and exceptions for applying
GAAP to contracts, hedging relationships and other transactions aﬀected by reference rate reform if
certain criteria are met. This update is primarily applicable to our contracts and hedging relationships
that reference the London Inter-Bank Oﬀered Rate ("LIBOR"). In December 2022, the FASB extended the
date through which the amendments may be applied to impacted contracts and hedges to 31 December
2024. In ﬁscal year 2023, we amended our remaining interest rate swaps that referenced LIBOR to use a
daily compounded Secured Overnight Financing Rate ("SOFR"). There were no ﬁnancial statement
impacts from the amendment.
70
Table of Contents
3. VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
We are the primary beneﬁciary of the NEOM Green Hydrogen Company joint venture ("NGHC"), which is
a variable interest entity ("VIE") that is consolidated in our Middle East and India segment. We are not
the primary beneﬁciary of any other material VIEs. We account for a VIE for which we exercise signiﬁcant
inﬂuence but are not the primary beneﬁciary, such as the Jazan Integrated Gasiﬁcation and Power
Company joint venture ("JIGPC"), as an equity method investment. For additional information on JIGPC,
refer to Note 9, Equity Aﬃliates.
The table below summarizes balances associated with NGHC as reﬂected on our consolidated balance
sheets. For additional information on this joint venture, refer to the "NEOM Green Hydrogen Project"
section that follows.
30 September 30 September
2023 2022
Assets
Cash and cash items $78.2  $274.7 
Trade receivables, net —  1.3 
Prepaid expenses 21.4  0.1 
Other receivables and current assets 181.6  23.3 
Total current assets $281.2  $299.4 
Plant and equipment, net 1,396.1  218.8 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 228.9  — 
Other noncurrent assets 350.6  1.5 
Total noncurrent assets $1,975.6  $220.3 
Total assets $2,256.8  $519.7 
Liabilities
Payables and accrued liabilities $141.0  $58.1 
Accrued income taxes 0.6  — 
Total current liabilities $141.6  $58.1 
Long-term debt 1,274.4  — 
Long-term debt – related party —  447.3 
Noncurrent operating lease liabilities 18.9  — 
Other noncurrent liabilities 2.1  1.4 
Deferred income taxes 24.1  — 
Total noncurrent liabilities $1,319.5  $448.7 
Total liabilities $1,461.1  $506.8 
Equity
Accumulated other comprehensive income $77.7  $— 
Noncontrolling interests 723.6  30.0 
During the third quarter of ﬁscal year 2023, outstanding shareholder loans to NGHC were converted to equity in the entity.
Accordingly, related party debt outstanding was reclassiﬁed to investments attributable to the noncontrolling partners of NGHC.
This noncash activity is presented within “Investments by noncontrolling interests” on our consolidated statements of equity for
the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2023.(A)
(A)
(A)
71
Table of Contents
NEOM Green Hydrogen Project
In the fourth quarter of ﬁscal year 2020, we announced the NEOM Green Hydrogen Project (the "NEOM
project”), a multi-billion dollar green hydrogen-based ammonia production facility that will be powered
by renewable energy in NEOM City, Saudi Arabia. We, along with our joint venture partners, ACWA Power
and NEOM Company, are equal owners in NGHC, which will develop, construct, own, operate, and
ﬁnance the project.
During the third quarter of ﬁscal year 2022, we entered into an interim agreement with NGHC under
which we commenced construction of the NEOM project. In addition, we executed an agreement with
NGHC under which we will be the exclusive oﬀtaker of green ammonia produced by the NEOM project
under a long-term take-if-tendered agreement. We intend to transport the green ammonia around the
world to be dissociated to produce green hydrogen for transportation and industrial markets. In May
2023, NGHC ﬁnalized the $6.7 billion engineering, procurement, and construction ("EPC") agreement
with Air Products named as the main contractor and system integrator for the facility. As of 30
September 2023, we had unconditional purchase obligations of approximately $5 billion for open
purchase orders related to construction of the project.
Air Products has one-third of the voting interests in the NGHC joint venture; however, substantially all
the activities of the joint venture involve or are conducted on behalf of Air Products. Since we have
disproportionately few voting rights relative to our economic interests in the joint venture, we
determined that NGHC is a variable interest entity. In addition, we determined that we are the primary
beneﬁciary of NGHC since we have the power to unilaterally direct certain signiﬁcant activities, including
key design and construction decisions, and we share power with our joint venture partners related to
other activities that are signiﬁcant to the economic performance of NGHC. Therefore, we consolidate
NGHC within the Middle East and India segment.
Project Financing
In May 2023, NGHC secured non-recourse project ﬁnancing of approximately $6.1 billion, which is
expected to fund about 73% of the project and will be drawn over the construction period. At the same
time, NGHC secured additional non-recourse credit facilities totaling approximately $500 primarily for
working capital needs. Under the ﬁnancing, the assets of NGHC can only be used to settle obligations of
the joint venture, and creditors of NGHC do not have recourse to the general credit of Air Products.
The joint venture completed its ﬁrst drawdown on the project ﬁnancing in July 2023. The table below
summarizes the interest rate, maturity, and carrying amount of borrowings associated with NGHC as of
30 September 2023:
Fiscal Y ear
Maturities30 September
2023
Payable in U.S. Dollars
U.S. Dollar variable-rate facilities 6.62%2027 to 2053 $1,094.9  
U.S. Dollar stated-rate facility 5.00% 2027 to 2053 138.5  
Total P ayable in U.S. Dollars $1,233.4  
Payable in Other Currencies
Saudi Riyal L oan F acility variable-rate 6.69% 2027 131.4  
Total Principal Amount $1,364.8  
Less: Unamortized discount and debt issuance costs(90.4)
Total NGHC Long-term Debt$1,274.4  
Reﬂects a daily compounded SOFR as of 30 September 2023 plus an annual margin of 1.31%. This does not include the impact
of our ﬂoating-to-ﬁxed interest rate swaps, which result in an overall lower interest rate for the borrowings. These derivative
instruments, which had a notional principal amount of $1,182.5 and an average pay rate of 2.82% as of 30 September 2023, are
reﬂected within the table provided in Note 14, Financial Instruments, on page 85 .
Based on the Saudi Arabian Interbank Oﬀered Rate ("SAIBOR") plus an annual margin of 0.8%.
Our consolidated balance sheet as of 30 September 2023 also includes $58.8 for remaining project ﬁnancing fees that are
eligible for deferral as a noncurrent asset until additional borrowings are drawn, at which time the unamortized balance will be
reclassiﬁed as an oﬀset to the outstanding debt.
Land Lease
The green hydrogen-based ammonia production facility is being constructed on land owned by our joint
venture partner, NEOM Company, for which NGHC signed a 50-year lease agreement. The land lease
commenced during the third quarter of ﬁscal year 2023. Accordingly, we recorded an operating lease(A)
(B)
(C)
(A)
(B)
(C)
with a right-of-use asset and corresponding liability of $223, of which $209 was paid as a lump-sum in
August 2023. Additional payments under the lease will occur after the ﬁrst 30 years of the lease term.
72
Table of Contents
4. BUSINES S AND AS SET ACTIONS
The charges we record for business and asset actions are not recorded in segment results.
Fiscal Year 2023
Our consolidated income statement for the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2023 includes an expense of
$244.6 ($204.9 attributable to Air Products after tax) resulting from strategic business and asset actions
intended to optimize costs and focus resources on our growth projects. Of the expense, $217.6 resulted
from noncash charges to write oﬀ assets associated with exited projects that were previously under
construction in our Asia and Europe segments. The assets written oﬀ included those related to our
withdrawal from coal gasiﬁcation in Indonesia as well as a project in Ukraine that was permanently
suspended due to Russia's invasion of the country. The remaining expense includes $27.0 for severance
and other beneﬁts payable to approximately 450 employees due to position eliminations and
restructuring of certain organizations globally. The table below summarizes the carrying amount of the
accrual for unpaid beneﬁts as of 30 September 2023, which we expect to substantially pay through ﬁscal
year 2024.
Charge for severance and other beneﬁts $27.0 
Cash expenditures (6.8)
Currency translation adjustment (0.4)
Amount reﬂected in "Payables and accrued liabilities" as of 30 September 2023 $19.8 
Fiscal Year 2022
We divested our small industrial gas business in Russia due to Russia's invasion of Ukraine in the fourth
quarter of ﬁscal year 2022. As a result, we recorded a noncash business and asset actions charge of
$73.7, which included transaction costs and cumulative currency translation losses. Prior to the
divestiture, this business was reﬂected in our Europe segment.
5.  ACQUISITIONS
Fiscal Year 2023
Uzbekistan Asset Purchase
On 25 May 2023, we entered into an investment agreement with the Government of the Republic of
Uzbekistan and Uzbekneftegaz JSC (“UNG”) to purchase a natural gas-to-syngas processing facility in
Qashqadaryo Province, Uzbekistan, for $1 billion. Under the agreement, Air Products will acquire, own,
and operate the facility and supply all oﬀtake products to UNG under a 15-year on-site contract, with
UNG supplying the feedstock natural gas and utilities.
We are accounting for the transaction as a ﬁnancing arrangement because UNG has the right to
reacquire the facility at the end of the contract term. Accordingly, progress payments of approximately
$800, of which $600 was completed during ﬁscal year 2023, are reﬂected within "Financing Receivables"
on our consolidated balance sheet as of 30 September 2023. The progress payments are reﬂected within
“Investment in ﬁnancing receivables” on our consolidated statement of cash ﬂows. In early ﬁscal year
2024, we made an additional progress payment of $100.
73
Table of Contents
Fiscal Year 2021
Gain on Exchange With Joint Venture Partner
We previously held a 50% ownership interest in Tyczka Industrie-Gases GmbH ("TIG"), a joint venture in
Germany with the Tyczka Group that was primarily a merchant gases business. We accounted for this
arrangement as an equity method investment in our former Industrial Gases – EMEA segment.
Eﬀective 23 February 2021 (the "acquisition date"), TIG was separated into two businesses, one of which
we acquired on a 100% basis. Our partner paid us $10.8 to acquire the other business. The exchange
resulted in a gain of $36.8 ($27.3 after-tax), which is reﬂected as “Gain on exchange with joint venture
partner” on our consolidated income statements for the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2021. The gain
included $12.7 from the revaluation of our previously held equity interest in the portion of the business
that we retained and $24.1 from the sale of our equity interest in the remaining business. The gain was
not recorded in segment results.
We estimated an acquisition date fair value of $15.4 for our previously held equity interest in the
acquired portion of the business using a market approach, which considered historical earnings and the
application of a market-based multiple derived from comparable transactions.
We accounted for the acquisition as a business combination. The results of this business are
consolidated within our Europe segment.
6. REVENUE RECOGNITION
Nature of Goods and Services
The principal activities from which we generate sales from our contracts with customers are described
below with their respective revenue recognition policies. For an overall summary of these policies and
discussion on payment terms and presentation, refer to Note 1, Basis of Presentation and Major
Accounting Policies.
Regional Industrial Gases
Our regional industrial gases businesses produce and sell atmospheric gases such as oxygen, nitrogen,
and argon (primarily recovered by the cryogenic distillation of air) and process gases such as hydrogen,
helium, carbon dioxide, carbon monoxide, syngas, and specialty gases. We distribute gases to our sale of
gas customers through diﬀerent supply modes depending on various factors including the customer's
volume requirements and location. Our supply modes are as follows:
•On-site Gases—Supply mode associated with customers who require large volumes of gases and
have relatively constant demand. Gases are produced and supplied by large facilities on or near
the customers’ facilities or by pipeline systems from centrally located production facilities. These
sale of gas contracts generally have 15- to 20-year terms. We also deliver smaller quantities of
product through small on-site plants (cryogenic or non-cryogenic generators), typically via 10- to
15-year sale of gas contracts. The contracts within this supply mode generally contain ﬁxed
monthly charges and/or minimum purchase requirements with price escalation provisions that are
generally based on external indices. Revenue associated with this supply mode is generally
recognized over time during the period in which we deliver or make available the agreed upon
quantity of goods.
•Merchant Gases—Supply mode associated with liquid bulk and packaged gases customers. Liquid
bulk customers receive delivery of product in liquid or gaseous form by tanker or tube trailer. The
product is stored, usually in its liquid state, in equipment we typically design and install at the
customer’s site for vaporizing into a gaseous state as needed. Packaged gases customers receive
small quantities of product delivered in either cylinders or dewars. Both liquid bulk and packaged
gases sales do not contain minimum purchase requirements as they are governed by contracts
and/or purchase orders that are based on the customer's requirements. These contracts contain
stated terms that are generally ﬁve years or less. Performance obligations associated with this
supply mode are satisﬁed at a point in time when the customer receives and obtains control of
the product, which generally occurs upon delivery.
74
Table of Contents
The timing of revenue recognition for our regional industrial gases businesses is generally consistent
with our right to invoice the customer. Variable components of consideration that may not be resolved
within the month, such as the ability to earn an annual bonus or incur a penalty, are more relevant to on-
site contracts and are considered constrained as they can be impacted by a single signiﬁcant event such
as a plant outage, which could occur at the end of a contract period. We consider contract modiﬁcations
on an individual basis to determine appropriate accounting treatment. However, contract modiﬁcations
are generally accounted for prospectively as they relate to distinct goods or services associated with
future periods of performance.
We mitigate energy and natural gas price risk contractually through pricing formulas, surcharges, and
cost pass-through arrangements.
Equipment
We design and manufacture equipment for air separation, hydrocarbon recovery and puriﬁcation, natural
gas liquefaction, and liquid helium and liquid hydrogen transport and storage. The Corporate and other
segment serves our sale of equipment customers.
Our sale of equipment contracts are generally comprised of a single performance obligation as the
individual promised goods or services contained within the contracts are integrated with or dependent
upon other goods or services in the contract for a single output to the customer. Revenue from our sale
of equipment contracts is generally recognized over time as we have an enforceable right to payment
for performance completed to date and our performance under the contract terms does not create an
asset with alternative use. Otherwise, sale of equipment contracts are satisﬁed at the point in time the
customer obtains control of the equipment, which is generally determined based on the shipping terms
of the contract. For contracts recognized over time, we primarily recognize revenue using a cost incurred
input method by which costs incurred to date relative to total estimated costs at completion are used to
measure progress toward satisfying performance obligations. Costs incurred include those for materials,
labor, and overhead and represent work contributing and proportionate to the transfer of control to the
customer.
Since our contracts are generally comprised of a single performance obligation, contract modiﬁcations
are typically accounted for as part of the existing contract and are recognized as a cumulative
adjustment for the inception-to-date eﬀect of such change. In addition, changes in estimates on projects
accounted for under the cost incurred input method are recognized as a cumulative adjustment for the
inception-to-date eﬀect of such change. We recorded changes to project estimates that unfavorably
impacted operating income by approximately $115, $30, and $19 in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021,
respectively.
75
Table of Contents
Disaggregation of Revenue
The tables below present our consolidated sales disaggregated by supply mode for each of our
reportable segments. We believe this presentation best depicts the nature, timing, type of customer, and
contract terms for our sales.
Americas Asia EuropeMiddle East
and IndiaCorporate
and other Total %
2023
On-site $3,143.9 $1,923.0 $1,036.6  $75.7  $— $6,179.2 49 %
Merchant 2,225.4  1,293.1  1,926.5  86.8  —  5,531.8 44 %
Sale of equipment —  —  —  —  889.0  889.0  7 %
Total $5,369.3 $3,216.1 $2,963.1 $162.5 $889.0 $12,600.0 100 %
2022
On-site $3,423.1 $1,833.9 $1,298.2  $77.9  $— $6,633.1 52 %
Merchant 1,945.8  1,309.4  1,787.9  51.6  —  5,094.7 40 %
Sale of equipment —  —  —  —  970.8  970.8  8 %
Total $5,368.9 $3,143.3 $3,086.1 $129.5 $970.8 $12,698.6 100 %
2021
On-site $2,469.5 $1,718.8  $802.4  $70.7  $— $5,061.4 49 %
Merchant 1,698.1  1,202.0  1,543.2  28.6  —  4,471.9 43 %
Sale of equipment —  —  —  —  789.7  789.7  8 %
Total $4,167.6 $2,920.8 $2,345.6  $99.3 $789.7 $10,323.0 100 %
Interest income associated with ﬁnancing and lease arrangements accounted for less than 1% of our
total consolidated sales in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021.
Remaining Performance Obligations
As of 30 September 2023, the transaction price allocated to remaining performance obligations is
estimated to be approximately $25 billion. This amount includes ﬁxed-charge contract provisions
associated with our on-site and sale of equipment supply modes. We estimate that approximately half of
this revenue will be recognized over the next ﬁve years and the balance thereafter.
Our remaining performance obligations do not include (1) expected revenue associated with new on-site
plants that are not yet on-stream; (2) consideration associated with contracts that have an expected
duration of less than one year; and (3) variable consideration for which we recognize revenue at the
amount to which we have the right to invoice, including energy cost pass-through to customers.
In the future, actual amounts will diﬀer due to events outside of our control, including, but not limited to,
inﬂationary price escalations; currency exchange rates; and amended, terminated, or renewed contracts.
Contract Balances
The table below details balances arising from contracts with customers:
30 September Balance Sheet Location 2023 2022
Assets
Contract assets – current Other receivables and current assets $124.7  $69.0 
Contract fulﬁllment costs – current Other receivables and current assets 89.0  84.1 
Liabilities
Contract liabilities – current Payables and accrued liabilities $413.0 $439.1 
Contract liabilities – noncurrent Other noncurrent liabilities 136.9  67.2 
Contract assets and liabilities result from diﬀerences in timing of revenue recognition and customer
invoicing. These balances are reported on the consolidated balance sheets on a contract-by-contract
basis at the end of each reporting period.
76
Table of Contents
Contract assets primarily relate to our sale of equipment contracts for which revenue is recognized over
time. These balances represent unbilled revenue, which occurs when revenue recognized under the
measure of progress exceeds the amount invoiced to our customers. Our ability to invoice the customer
for contract asset balances is not only based on the passage of time, but also the achievement of certain
contractual milestones.
Contract fulﬁllment costs primarily include deferred costs related to sale of equipment projects that
cannot be inventoried and for which we expect to recognize revenue upon transfer of control at project
completion or costs related to fulﬁlling a speciﬁc anticipated contract.
Costs to obtain a contract, or "contract acquisition costs," are capitalized only after we have established
a contract with the customer. We elected to apply the practical expedient to expense these costs as they
are incurred if the amortization period of the asset that would have otherwise been recognized is one
year or less. Our contract acquisition costs capitalized as of 30 September 2023 and 2022 were not
material.
Contract liabilities include advanced payments or right to consideration prior to performance under the
contract and are recognized as revenue when or as we perform. Increases to our current contract
liabilities primarily relate to new sale of equipment projects as balances associated with our sale of gas
contracts are generally related to ﬁxed charges and are relatively consistent period over period. During
the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2023, we recognized sales of approximately $295 associated with
sale of equipment contracts that were included within our contract liabilities balance as of 30 September
2022. Advanced payments from our customers do not represent a signiﬁcant ﬁnancing component as
these payments are intended for purposes other than ﬁnancing, such as to meet working capital
demands or to protect us from our customer failing to meet its obligations under the terms of the
contract.
7.  DISCONTINUED OPERA TIONS
Our consolidated income statements include income from discontinued operations, net of tax, of $7.4,
$12.6, and $70.3 in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively, primarily from the release of
unrecognized tax beneﬁts on uncertain tax positions for which the statute of limitations expired.
In ﬁscal year 2023, income from discontinued operations, net of tax, of $7.4 primarily resulted from a
net tax beneﬁt recorded in the fourth quarter upon release of tax liabilities for uncertain tax positions
taken with respect to the sale of our former Performance Materials Division ("PMD"), which was
completed in 2017. Additionally, our consolidated statement of cash ﬂows for the ﬁscal year ended 30
September 2023 reﬂects cash provided by operating activities of discontinued operations of $0.6 from
income tax refunds associated with the sale.
In ﬁscal year 2022, income from discontinued operations, net of tax, of $12.6 primarily resulted from a
net tax beneﬁt recorded in the fourth quarter upon release of tax liabilities for uncertain tax positions
taken with respect to the sale of PMD. Additionally, our consolidated statement of cash ﬂows for the
ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2022 reﬂects cash provided by operating activities of discontinued
operations of $59.6 primarily from income tax refunds associated with the sale.
In ﬁscal year 2021, income from discontinued operations, net of tax, of $70.3 included net tax beneﬁts
of $60.0 recorded upon release of tax liabilities for uncertain tax positions. Of this amount, we recorded
$51.8 in the fourth quarter for liabilities associated with PMD and $8.2 in the third quarter for liabilities
associated with our former Energy-from-Waste ("EfW") business. Additionally, we recorded a tax beneﬁt
of $10.3 in the ﬁrst quarter of ﬁscal year 2021 primarily from the settlement of a state tax appeal
related to the gain on the sale of PMD. Our consolidated statement of cash ﬂows for the ﬁscal year
ended 30 September 2021 reﬂects cash provided by operating activities of discontinued operations of
$6.7 from cash received as part of the settlement.
8.  INVENTORIES
The components of inventories are as follows:
30 September 2023 2022
Finished goods $211.6  $162.0 
Work in process 28.4  22.0 
Raw materials, supplies, and other 411.8  330.2 
Inventories $651.8  $514.2 
77
Table of Contents
9. EQUITY AFFILIA TES
"Investment in net assets of and advances to equity aﬃliates" on our consolidated balance sheets were
$4,617.8 and $3,353.8 as of 30 September 2023 and 2022, respectively. Substantially all our equity
method investments are foreign aﬃliates.
As of 30 September 2023, our equity aﬃliates were as follows:
Abdullah Hashim Industrial Gases & Equipment Co ., Ltd.
(25%);INFRA Group ( 40%);
Air Products South A frica (P roprietary) Limited ( 50%); INOX Air P roducts P rivate Limited ( 50%);
Bangk ok Cogeneration Company Limited ( 49%); Jazan Integrated Gasiﬁcation and P ower Company
(51%);
Bangk ok Industrial Gases Co ., Ltd. ( 49%); Kulim Industrial Gases Sdn. Bhd. ( 50%);
Chengdu Air & Gas P roducts Ltd. ( 50%); Sapio P roduzione Idr ogeno Ossigeno S.r .l. (49%);
Helios S.p.A . (49%); and principally, other industrial gas pr oducers.
Dividends and other distributions received from equity aﬃliates were $344.3, $285.1, and $157.3 in
ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively.
As of 30 September 2023 and 2022, the amount of investment in companies accounted for by the equity
method included equity method goodwill of $41.3 and $44.6, respectively.
Summarized Financial Information
The summarized ﬁnancial information presented below is on a combined 100% basis and has been
compiled based on the ﬁnancial statements of our equity aﬃliates.
30 September    2023 2022
Current assets $3,097.1 $2,454.6 
Noncurrent assets 14,468.2 9,805.6 
Current liabilities 1,145.7  939.0 
Noncurrent liabilities   11,934.0 7,713.5 
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 2021
Net sales $5,192.9 $4,124.4 $3,338.1 
Gross proﬁt 2,465.5 1,894.0 1,492.9 
Operating income 1,847.4 1,320.1  962.2 
Net income 1,062.9  895.1  646.0 
Includes ﬁnancing revenue of $1,011.3, $674.6, and $134.9 in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. Financing
revenue in ﬁscal years 2023 and 2022 primarily relates to the JIGPC joint venture discussed below.
Investment in Jazan Integrated Gasiﬁcation and Power Company (“JIGPC”)
During the ﬁrst quarter of ﬁscal year 2022, we made an initial investment of $1.6 billion to acquire a
55% ownership interest in the Jazan Integrated Gasiﬁcation and Power Company ("JIGPC") joint venture
of which 4% is attributable to the noncontrolling partner of Air Products Qudra ("APQ"). During the
second quarter of ﬁscal year 2023, we completed a second investment of $908, which did not change
our ownership interest. Additional information on the JIGPC joint venture is provided below.
Our investments were made primarily in the form of shareholder loans that qualify as in-substance
common stock in the joint venture and were executed to align with the timing of the joint venture's
purchase of project assets. The amounts invested included approximately $130 and $73 received from
the noncontrolling partner of APQ for the ﬁrst and second investment, respectively. As of 30 September
2023, the carrying value of our investment in JIGPC, including amounts attributable to noncontrolling
interests, totaled $2,862.2. We expect to complete a remaining investment of approximately $115 for
additional assets to be purchased by the joint venture.(A)
(A)
78
Table of Contents
We determined JIGPC is a variable interest entity for which we are not the primary beneﬁciary as we do
not have the power to direct the activities that are most signiﬁcant to the economic performance of the
joint venture. Instead, these activities, including plant dispatch, operating and maintenance decisions,
budgeting, capital expenditures, and ﬁnancing, require unanimous approval of the owners or are
controlled by the customer. Since we have the ability to exercise signiﬁcant inﬂuence in the joint
venture, we accounted for our investment in JIGPC under the equity method within the Middle East and
India segment beginning in the ﬁrst quarter of ﬁscal year 2022. Our loss exposure is limited to our
investment in the joint venture.
Certain shareholders receive a preferred cash distribution pursuant to the joint venture agreement,
which speciﬁes each shareholder’s share of income after considering the amount of cash available for
distribution. As such, the earnings attributable to Air Products may not be proportionate to our
ownership interest in the venture.
JIGPC Joint Venture
JIGPC is a joint venture with Saudi Aramco Power Company (a subsidiary of Aramco), ACWA Power, and
APQ in the Jazan Economic City, Saudi Arabia. On 27 September 2021, JIGPC signed deﬁnitive
agreements for the acquisition of project assets from Aramco for $12 billion and entered into related
project ﬁnancing for the purchase of the project assets, which include power blocks, gasiﬁers, air
separation units, syngas cleanup assets, and utilities, in multiple phases. The ﬁrst phase was completed
on 27 October 2021 for $7.39 billion, and the second phase was completed for $4.15 billion on 19
January 2023. We expect JIGPC to acquire additional assets totaling approximately $525. JIGPC will
commission, operate, and maintain the project assets to supply electricity, steam, hydrogen, and utilities
to Aramco’s reﬁnery and terminal complex under a 25-year agreement, which commenced in the ﬁrst
quarter of ﬁscal year 2022. JIGPC recorded ﬁnancing receivables upon acquisition of the assets and
recognizes ﬁnancing income over the supply term.
Jazan Gas Project Company
Jazan Gas Project Company (“JGPC”), a previous joint venture between Air Products and ACWA Holding,
had a 20-year agreement to supply oxygen and nitrogen to Aramco’s oil reﬁnery and power plant in
Jazan. The parties terminated the supply agreement in October 2021, and JGPC sold its air separation
units to Aramco. We initially sold these assets to JGPC and deferred proﬁt proportionate to our 26%
ownership in the joint venture. With the termination of the supply agreement and sale of the air
separation units complete, we recognized the remaining deferred proﬁt, net of other project ﬁnalization
costs, in equity aﬃliates’ income in the ﬁrst quarter of ﬁscal year 2022. Additionally, our consolidated
statement of cash ﬂows for ﬁscal year 2022 includes a noncash adjustment of $94.4 to reduce the
carrying value of our investment in JGPC to zero and remove an obligation to make equity contributions
to JGPC under an equity bridge loan that was no longer required.
Equity Method Investment Impairment
During the fourth quarter of ﬁscal year 2022, we determined there was an other-than-temporary
impairment in two small equity aﬃliates in the Asia segment. As a result, we recorded a noncash charge
of $14.8 to write down the full carrying value of the investments. This charge is reﬂected on our
consolidated income statements within “Equity aﬃliates' income” and was not recorded in segment
results.
79
Table of Contents
10. PLANT AND EQUIPMENT , NET
The major classes of plant and equipment are as follows:
30 September Useful life 2023 2022
Land $320.8  $266.7 
Buildings 30 years 1,543.7  1,431.3 
Production facilities 10-20
years 19,593.1  18,000.5 
Distribution and other machinery and equipment 5-25 years 5,129.6  4,784.9 
Construction in progress 6,159.1  3,676.7 
Plant and equipment, at cost $32,746.3 $28,160.1 
Less: Accumulated depreciation 15,274.2  13,999.6 
Plant and equipment, net $17,472.1 $14,160.5 
Depr eciable lives of pr oduction facilities r elated to long-ter m customer supply contracts ar e generally matched to
the contract lives.
The depr eciable lives for various types of distribution equipment ar e: 10 to 25 years for cylinders, depending on
the natur e and pr operties of the pr oduct; 20 years for tanks; generally 7.5 years for customer stations; and 5 to 15
years for tractors and trailers.
Depreciation expense was $1,325.8, $1,302.7, and $1,284.1 in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021,
respectively.
11.  GOODWILL
Changes to the carrying amount of consolidated goodwill by segment are as follows:
Americas Asia EuropeMiddle East
and IndiaCorporate
and other Total
Goodwill, net as of 30 September 2021 $151.0 $184.3 $533.5  $8.0  $34.7 $911.5 
Acquisitions —  —  17.0  7.5  —  24.5 
Currency translation and other (7.8) (11.6) (93.0) 0.3  (0.9) (113.0)
Goodwill, net as of 30 September 2022 $143.2 $172.7 $457.5  $15.8  $33.8 $823.0 
Currency translation and other 3.4  (0.8) 36.0  —  0.1  38.7 
Goodwill, net as of 30 September
2023 $146.6 $171.9 $493.5  $15.8  $33.9 $861.7 
Goodwill acquired in ﬁscal year 2022 was primarily attributable to expected cost synergies associated with small
business combinations, of which $3.2 was deductible for tax purposes.
30 September 2023 2022 2021
Goodwill, gross $1,158.4 $1,096.0 $1,239.2 
Accumulated impairment losses (296.7) (273.0) (327.7)
Goodwill, net $861.7  $823.0  $911.5 
Accumulated impairment losses are attributable to our Latin America reporting unit ("LASA") within the Americas
segment and include the impact of currency translation.
We review goodwill for impairment annually in the fourth quarter of the ﬁscal year and whenever events
or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of goodwill might not be recoverable. The
impairment test for goodwill involves calculating the fair value of each reporting unit and comparing that
value to the carrying value. If the fair value of the reporting unit is less than its carrying value, the
diﬀerence is recorded as a goodwill impairment charge, not to exceed the total amount of goodwill
allocated to that reporting unit. During the fourth quarter of ﬁscal year 2023, we conducted our annual
goodwill impairment test and determined that the fair value of all our reporting units exceeded their
carrying value.(A)
(B)
(A)
(B)
(A)
(A)
(A)
(A)
80
Table of Contents
12.  INTANGIBLE AS SETS
The table below summarizes the major classes of our intangible assets:
2023 2022
30 September GrossAccumulated
Amortization/
Impairment Net GrossAccumulated
Amortization/
Impairment Net
Finite-lived:
Customer relationships $507.3  ($262.2)$245.1 $487.5  ($226.3)$261.2 
Patents and technology 41.1  (26.7) 14.4  33.1  (16.3) 16.8 
Other 76.7  (38.7) 38.0  73.4  (37.0) 36.4 
Total ﬁnite-lived intangible
assets $625.1  ($327.6)$297.5 $594.0  ($279.6)$314.4 
Indeﬁnite-lived:
Trade names and
trademarks 47.2  (10.1) 37.1  42.2  (9.1) 33.1 
Total intangible assets $672.3  ($337.7)$334.6 $636.2  ($288.7)$347.5 
Amortization expense for intangible assets was $32.5, $35.5, and $37.2 in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and
2021, respectively. Refer to Note 1, Basis of Presentation and Major Accounting Policies, for the
amortization periods for each major class of intangible assets.
The table below details the amount of amortization expense expected to be recorded for our ﬁnite-lived
intangible assets in each of the next ﬁve years and thereafter:
2024 $30.4 
2025 29.2 
2026 28.2 
2027 27.7 
2028 25.6 
Thereafter 156.4 
Total $297.5 
Indeﬁnite-lived intangible assets are subject to impairment testing at least annually or more frequently if
events or changes in circumstances indicate that potential impairment exists. The impairment test for
indeﬁnite-lived intangible assets involves calculating the fair value of the indeﬁnite-lived intangible
assets and comparing the fair value to their carrying value. If the fair value is less than the carrying
value, the diﬀerence is recorded as an impairment loss. During the fourth quarter of ﬁscal year 2023, we
conducted our annual impairment test of indeﬁnite-lived intangible assets and determined that the fair
value of all our intangible assets exceeded their carrying value.
81
Table of Contents
13.  LEASES
Lessee Accounting
We are the lessee under various agreements for real estate, vehicles, aircraft, and other equipment that
are accounted for as operating leases. Our ﬁnance leases principally relate to the right to use machinery
and equipment and are not material.
Amounts associated with operating leases and their presentation on our consolidated balance sheets are
as follows:
30 September 2023 2022
Operating lease right-of-use assets $974.0  $694.8 
Operating lease liabilities
Payables and accrued liabilities 94.7  90.0 
Noncurrent operating lease liabilities 631.1  592.1 
Total operating lease liabilities $725.8  $682.1 
30 September 2023 2022
Weighted-average remaining lease term in years 19.9 19.1
Weighted-average discount rate 2.6 % 2.1 %
Calculated on the basis of the r emaining lease ter m and the lease liability balance for each lease as of the
reporting date.
Calculated on the basis of the discount rate used to calculate the lease liability for each lease and the r emaining
balance of the lease payments for each lease as of the r eporting date.
The following maturity analysis of our operating lease liabilities as of 30 September 2023 presents the
undiscounted cash ﬂows for each of the next ﬁve years and thereafter with a reconciliation to the lease
liability recognized on our balance sheet:
Operating
Leases
2024 $111.0 
2025 89.6 
2026 67.4 
2027 50.6 
2028 44.6 
Thereafter 628.8 
Total undiscounted lease payments 992.0 
Imputed interest (266.2)
Present value of lease liability recognized on balance sheet $725.8 
Operating lease expense was $109.9, $105.3, and $89.5 for ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021,
respectively. These amounts do not include short-term and variable lease expenses, which were not
material. The impacts associated with our operating leases on the consolidated statements of cash ﬂows
are reﬂected within "Other adjustments" within operating activities. This includes the noncash operating
lease expense as well as a use of cash of $337.8, $128.0, and $98.8 for payments on amounts included
in the measurement of the lease liability for ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. Payments in
ﬁscal year 2023 included a lump-sum payment of $209 for a land lease associated with the NGHC joint
venture. Refer to Note 3, Variable Interest Entities, for additional information.
We recorded noncash right-of-use asset additions of approximately $150, $252, and $259 in ﬁscal years
2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively.(A)
(B)
(A)
(B)
82
Table of Contents
Lessor Accounting
Certain contracts associated with facilities that are built to provide product to a speciﬁc customer have
been accounted for as containing embedded leases. Refer to Note 1, Basis of Presentation and Major
Accounting Policies, for a description of our accounting policy for arrangements in which we are the
lessor.
"Lease receivables, net" relate to sales-type leases on certain on-site assets for which payments are
collected over the contract term. The table below details balances associated with our lease receivables:
30 September 2023 2022
Current lease receivables, net $78.0  $77.8 
Noncurrent lease receivables, net 494.7 583.1
Total lease receivables, net $572.7  $660.9 
Presented within "Other r eceivables and cur rent assets" on our consolidated balance sheets.
The majority of our leases are of high credit quality and were originated prior to ﬁscal year 2017. As of
30 September 2023 and 2022, the credit quality of lease receivables did not require a material
allowance for credit losses.
The table below summarizes lease payments collected in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021:
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 2021
Payments that reduced the noncurrent lease receivable balance $79.6  $94.0  $98.8 
Payments recognized as interest income 49.6 59.1 67.4
Total lease payments collected $129.2  $153.1  $166.2 
As of 30 September 2023, minimum lease payments expected to be collected were as follows:
2024 $120.5 
2025 115.1 
2026 105.4 
2027 92.2 
2028 76.1 
Thereafter 279.1 
Total 788.4 
Unearned interest income (215.7)
Lease receivables, net $572.7 
Our contracts generally do not have the option to extend or terminate the lease or provide the customer
the right to purchase the asset at the end of the contract term. Instead, renewal of such contracts
requires negotiation of mutually agreed terms by both parties. Unless the customer terminates within
the required notice period, the contract will go into evergreen. Given the long-term duration of our
contracts, there is no assumed residual value for the assets at the end of the lease term.(A)
(A)
83
Table of Contents
14.  FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS
Currency Price Risk Management
Our earnings, cash ﬂows, and ﬁnancial position are exposed to foreign currency risk from foreign
currency-denominated transactions and net investments in foreign operations. It is our policy to seek to
minimize our cash ﬂow volatility from changes in currency exchange rates. This is accomplished by
identifying and evaluating the risk that our cash ﬂows will change in value due to changes in exchange
rates and by executing strategies necessary to manage such exposures. Our objective is to maintain
economically balanced currency risk management strategies that provide adequate downside protection.
Forward Exchange Contracts
We enter into forward exchange contracts to reduce the cash ﬂow exposure to foreign currency
ﬂuctuations associated with highly anticipated cash ﬂows and certain ﬁrm commitments, such as the
purchase of plant and equipment. We also enter into forward exchange contracts to hedge the cash ﬂow
exposure on intercompany loans and third-party debt. This portfolio of forward exchange contracts
consists primarily of Euros and U.S. Dollars. The maximum remaining term of any forward exchange
contract currently outstanding and designated as a cash ﬂow hedge at 30 September 2023 is 3.1 years.
Forward exchange contracts are also used to hedge the value of investments in certain foreign
subsidiaries and aﬃliates by creating a liability in a currency in which we have a net equity position. The
primary currency pair in this portfolio of forward exchange contracts is Euros and U.S. Dollars.
We also utilize forward exchange contracts that are not designated as hedges. These contracts are used
to economically hedge foreign currency-denominated monetary assets and liabilities, primarily working
capital. The primary objective of these forward exchange contracts is to protect the value of foreign
currency-denominated monetary assets and liabilities from the eﬀects of volatility in foreign exchange
rates that might occur prior to their receipt or settlement. This portfolio of forward exchange contracts
consists of many diﬀerent foreign currency pairs, with a proﬁle that changes from time to time
depending on our business activity and sourcing decisions.
The table below summarizes our outstanding currency price risk management instruments:
2023 2022
30 SeptemberUS$
NotionalYears
Average
MaturityUS$
NotionalYears
Average
Maturity
Forward Exchange Contracts
Cash ﬂow hedges $4,463.2  0.7 $4,525.0  0.7
Net investment hedges 864.0  2.5 542.2  2.2
Not designated 709.4  0.3 534.3  0.3
Total Forward Exchange Contracts $6,036.6  0.9 $5,601.5  0.8
We also use foreign currency-denominated debt to hedge the foreign currency exposures of our net
investment in certain foreign subsidiaries. The designated foreign currency-denominated debt and
related accrued interest was €1,938.6 million ($2,049.7) at 30 September 2023 and €1,265.4 million
($1,240.4) at 30 September 2022. The designated foreign currency-denominated debt is presented
within "Long-term debt" on the consolidated balance sheets.
Debt Portfolio Management
It is our policy to identify, on a continuing basis, the need for debt capital and to evaluate the ﬁnancial
risks inherent in funding the Company with debt capital. Reﬂecting the result of this ongoing review, we
manage our debt portfolio and hedging program with the intent to (1) reduce funding risk with respect to
borrowings made by us to preserve our access to debt capital and provide debt capital as required for
funding and liquidity purposes, and (2) manage the aggregate interest rate risk and the debt portfolio in
accordance with certain debt management parameters.
84
Table of Contents
Interest Rate Management Contracts
We enter into interest rate swaps to change the ﬁxed/variable interest rate mix of our debt portfolio in
order to maintain the percentage of ﬁxed- and variable-rate debt within the parameters set by
management. In accordance with these parameters, the agreements are used to manage interest rate
risks and costs inherent in our debt portfolio. Our interest rate management portfolio generally consists
of ﬁxed-to-ﬂoating interest rate swaps (which are designated as fair value hedges), pre-issuance interest
rate swaps and treasury locks (which hedge the interest rate risk associated with anticipated ﬁxed-rate
debt issuances and are designated as cash ﬂow hedges), and ﬂoating-to-ﬁxed interest rate swaps (which
are designated as cash ﬂow hedges). As of 30 September 2023, the outstanding interest rate swaps
were denominated in U.S. Dollars. The notional amount of the interest rate swap agreements is equal to
or less than the designated debt being hedged. When interest rate swaps are used to hedge variable-
rate debt, the indices of the swaps and the debt to which they are designated are the same. It is our
policy not to enter into any interest rate management contracts which lever a move in interest rates on
a greater than one-to-one basis. In May 2023, NGHC entered into ﬂoating-to-ﬁxed interest rate swaps
that are designated as cash ﬂow hedges in connection with the non-recourse project ﬁnancing secured
by the joint venture. Refer to Note 3, Variable Interest Entities, for additional information.
Cross Currency Interest Rate Swap Contracts
We enter into cross currency interest rate swap contracts when our risk management function deems
necessary. These contracts may entail both the exchange of ﬁxed- and ﬂoating-rate interest payments
periodically over the life of the agreement and the exchange of one currency for another currency at
inception and at a speciﬁed future date. The contracts are used to hedge either certain net investments
in foreign operations or non-functional currency cash ﬂows related to intercompany loans. The current
cross currency interest rate swap portfolio consists of ﬁxed-to-ﬁxed swaps primarily between the U.S.
Dollar and each of the Chinese Renminbi, Indian Rupee, and Chilean Peso.
The table below summarizes our outstanding interest rate management contracts and cross currency
interest rate swaps:
2023 2022
30 SeptemberUS$
NotionalAverage
Pay %Average
Receive
%Years
Average
MaturityUS$
NotionalAverage
Pay %Average
Receive
%Years
Average
Maturity
Interest rate swaps
(fair value hedge)$800.0   SOFR 1.64  % 4.0 $800.0  Various 1.64 % 5.0
Interest rate swaps
(cash ﬂow hedge)$1,182.5   2.82  % SOFR 22.1 $—  — % — % 0.0
Cross cur rency inter est
rate swaps (net
investment hedge)$80.8   4.60  % 3.65  % 0.9 $176.7   4.12 % 3.07 % 1.2
Cross cur rency inter est
rate swaps (cash ﬂow
hedge)$598.2   4.89  % 3.22  % 2.2 $785.7   4.78 % 3.05 % 2.3
Cross cur rency inter est
rate swaps (not
designated)$44.5   5.39  % 3.54  % 0.2 $37.7  5.39 % 3.54 % 1.2
The table below provides the amounts recorded on the consolidated balance sheet related to cumulative
basis adjustments for fair value hedges:
Carrying amounts of hedged itemCumulative hedging adjustment,
included in carrying amount
30 September 2023 2022 2023 2022
Long-term debt $2,011.4  $2,012.9  ($80.5) ($77.1)
85
Table of Contents
The tables below summarize the fair value and balance sheet location of our outstanding derivatives.
30 September Balance Sheet
Location 2023 2022 Balance Sheet
Location 2023 2022
Derivatives Designated
as Hedging Instruments:
Forwar d exchange contractsOther
receivables and
current assets $50.2   $71.6 Payables and
accrued
liabilities $94.1   $226.2  
Interest rate management
contractsOther
receivables and
current assets 13.0   36.7 Payables and
accrued
liabilities —  — 
Forwar d exchange contractsOther
noncur rent
assets 19.8   60.8 Other
noncur rent
liabilities 25.7   46.9 
Interest rate management
contractsOther
noncur rent
assets 300.8   12.5 Other
noncur rent
liabilities 87.0   91.2 
Total Derivatives
Designated as Hedging
Instruments $383.8   $181.6   $206.8   $364.3  
Derivatives Not
Designated as Hedging
Instruments:
Forwar d exchange contractsOther
receivables and
current assets $6.4  $6.1 Payables and
accrued
liabilities $4.6  $2.1 
Interest rate management
contractsOther
receivables and
current assets 3.9  — Payables and
accrued
liabilities —  — 
Forwar d exchange contractsOther
noncur rent
assets —  0.1 Other
noncur rent
liabilities —  0.1 
Interest rate management
contractsOther
noncur rent
assets —  1.3 Other
noncur rent
liabilities —  — 
Total Derivatives Not
Designated as Hedging
Instruments $10.3   $7.5  $4.6  $2.2 
Total Derivatives $394.1   $189.1   $211.4   $366.5  
Refer to Note 15, Fair Value Measurements, which deﬁnes fair value, describes the method for
measuring fair value, and provides additional disclosures regarding fair value measurements.
The tables below summarize gains (losses) recognized in other comprehensive income during the period
related to our net investment and cash ﬂow hedging relationships:
2023 2022
Net Investment Hedging Relationships
Forwar d exchange contracts ($39.3) $89.8 
Foreign cur rency debt (99.9) 229.6  
Cross cur rency inter est rate swaps (5.9) 12.5 
Total Amount Recognized in OCI (145.1 ) 331.9  
Tax eﬀects 35.8   (82.1)
Net Amount Recognized in OCI ($109.3 ) $249.8  
Derivatives in Cash Flow Hedging Relationships
Forwar d exchange contracts $111.1   ($310.2 )
Forwar d exchange contracts, e xcluded components (18.7) 2.8 
Other 325.4   123.2  
Total Amount Recognized in OCI 417.8   (184.2 )
Tax eﬀects (48.6) 63.9 
Net Amount Recognized in OCI $369.2   ($120.3 )
Other primarily includes interest rate and cross currency interest rate swaps for which excluded components are recognized in
“Payables and accrued liabilities” and “Other receivables and current assets” as a component of accrued interest payable and
accrued interest receivable, respectively. These excluded components are recorded in “Other non-operating income (expense),
net” over the life of the cross currency interest rate swap. Other also includes the recognition of our share of gains and losses,
net of tax, related to interest rate swaps held by our equity aﬃliates.(A)
(A)
86
Table of Contents
The tables below summarize the location and amounts recognized in income related to our cash ﬂow and
fair value hedging relationships by contract type:
Sales Cost of Sales Interest ExpenseOther Non-
Operating Income
(Expense), Net
2023 2022 2023 2022 2023 2022 2023 2022
Total presented in
consolidated income
statements that
includes eﬀects of
hedging below $12,600.0 $12,698.6 $8,833.0 $9,338.5 $177.5 $128.0 ($39.0)$62.4 
(Gain) Loss Eﬀects of
Cash Flow Hedging:
Forward Exchange
Contracts:
Amount reclassiﬁed
from OCI into
income ($0.6) $0.8  $4.9  ($0.1) $—  $— ($77.8)$205.7 
Amount excluded
from eﬀectiveness
testing recognized
in earnings based
on amortization
approach —  —  —  —  —  —  15.7  4.6 
Other:
Amount reclassiﬁed
from OCI into
income —  —  —  —  5.5  5.8  (5.2)(95.1)
Total (Gain) Loss
Reclassiﬁed from OCI
to Income (0.6) 0.8  4.9  (0.1) 5.5  5.8 (67.3)115.2 
Tax eﬀects 0.1  (0.3) (1.2) (0.3) (2.0) (2.2) 16.7 (27.5)
Net (Gain) Loss
Reclassiﬁed from OCI
to Income ($0.5) $0.5  $3.7  ($0.4) $3.5  $3.6 ($50.6)$87.7 
(Gain) Loss Eﬀects of
Fair Value Hedging:
Other:
Hedged items $—  $—  $—  $— ($3.4)($77.6) $—  $— 
Derivatives
designated as
hedging instruments —  —  —  —  3.4  77.6  —  — 
Total (Gain) Loss
Recognized in
Income $—  $—  $—  $—  $—  $—  $—  $— 
87
Table of Contents
The table below summarizes the location and amounts recognized in income related to our derivatives
not designated as hedging instruments by contract type:
Other Income
(Expense), NetOther Non-Operating
Income (Expense), Net
2023 2022 2023 2022
The Eﬀects of Derivatives Not Designated as Hedging Instruments:
Forward Exchange Contracts ($1.0) ($3.7) ($2.4) ($2.9)
Other —  —  0.3  (2.3)
Total (Gain) Loss Recognized in Income ($1.0) ($3.7) ($2.1) ($5.2)
The amount of unrealized gains and losses related to cash ﬂow hedges as of 30 September 2023 that
are expected to be reclassiﬁed to earnings in the next twelve months is not material.
The cash ﬂows related to derivative contracts are generally reported in the operating activities section of
the consolidated statements of cash ﬂows.
Credit Risk-Related Contingent Features
Certain derivative instruments are executed under agreements that require us to maintain a minimum
credit rating with both Standard & Poor’s and Moody’s. If our credit rating falls below this threshold, the
counterparty to the derivative instruments has the right to request full collateralization on the
derivatives’ net liability position. The net liability position of derivatives with credit risk-related
contingent features was $94.2 and $114.8 as of 30 September 2023 and 2022, respectively. Because our
current credit rating is above the various pre-established thresholds, no collateral has been posted on
these liability positions.
Counterparty Credit Risk Management
We execute ﬁnancial derivative transactions with counterparties that are highly rated ﬁnancial
institutions, all of which are investment grade at this time. Some of our underlying derivative
agreements give us the right to require the institution to post collateral if its credit rating falls below the
pre-established thresholds with Standard & Poor’s, Moody’s, or Fitch. The collateral that the
counterparties would be required to post was $345.0 and $62.8 as of 30 September 2023 and 2022,
respectively. No ﬁnancial institution is required to post collateral at this time, as all have credit ratings at
or above threshold.
15. FAIR V ALUE MEASUREMENTS
Fair value is deﬁned as an exit price, or the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to
transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date.
The fair value hierarchy prioritizes the inputs to valuation techniques used to measure fair value into
three broad levels as follows:
•Level 1—Quoted prices (unadjusted) in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.
•Level 2—Inputs that are observable for the asset or liability, either directly or indirectly through
market corroboration, for substantially the full term of the asset or liability.
•Level 3—Inputs that are unobservable for the asset or liability based on our own assumptions
about the assumptions market participants would use in pricing the asset or liability.
The methods and assumptions used to measure the fair value of ﬁnancial instruments are as follows:
Short-term Investments
Short-term investments primarily include time deposits with original maturities greater than three
months and less than one year. We estimated the fair value of our short-term investments, which
approximates carrying value as of the balance sheet date, using Level 2 inputs within the fair value
hierarchy. Level 2 measurements were based on current interest rates for similar investments with
comparable credit risk and time to maturity.
88
Table of Contents
Derivatives
The fair value of our interest rate management contracts and forward exchange contracts are quantiﬁed
using the income approach and are based on estimates using standard pricing models. These models
consider the value of future cash ﬂows as of the balance sheet date, discounted to a present value using
discount factors that match both the time to maturity and currency of the underlying instruments. These
standard pricing models utilize inputs that are derived from or corroborated by observable market data
such as interest rate yield curves as well as currency spot and forward rates; therefore, the fair value of
our derivatives is classiﬁed as a Level 2 measurement. On an ongoing basis, we randomly test a subset
of our valuations against valuations received from the transaction’s counterparty to validate the
accuracy of our standard pricing models. Counterparties to these derivative contracts are highly rated
ﬁnancial institutions.
Refer to Note 14, Financial Instruments, for a description of derivative instruments, including details
related to the balance sheet line classiﬁcations.
Long-term Debt, Including Related Party
The fair value of our debt is based on estimates using standard pricing models that consider the value of
future cash ﬂows as of the balance sheet date, discounted to a present value using discount factors that
match both the time to maturity and currency of the underlying instruments. These standard valuation
models utilize observable market data such as interest rate yield curves and currency spot rates;
therefore, the fair value of our debt is classiﬁed as a Level 2 measurement.
The carrying values and fair values of ﬁnancial instruments were as follows:
2023 2022
30 September Carrying Value Fair ValueCarrying Value Fair Value 
Assets
Derivatives
Forward exchange contracts $76.4  $76.4  $138.6  $138.6 
Interest rate management contracts 317.7  317.7  50.5  50.5 
Liabilities
Derivatives
Forward exchange contracts $124.4  $124.4  $275.3  $275.3 
Interest rate management contracts 87.0  87.0  91.2  91.2 
Long-term debt, including current
portion and related party 10,046.3  9,173.5  7,634.1  6,721.2 
The carrying amounts reported on the consolidated balance sheets for cash and cash items, short-term
investments, trade receivables, payables and accrued liabilities, accrued income taxes, and short-term
borrowings approximate fair value due to the short-term nature of these instruments. Accordingly, these
items have been excluded from the above table.
89
Table of Contents
The table below summarizes assets and liabilities on the consolidated balance sheets that are measured
at fair value on a recurring basis:
2023 2022
30 September TotalLevel 1Level 2Level 3 TotalLevel 1Level 2Level 3 
Assets at Fair
Value
Derivatives
Forward exchange
contracts $76.4  $— $76.4  $— $138.6  $— $138.6  $— 
Interest rate
management
contracts 317.7  — 317.7  —  50.5  —  50.5  — 
Total Assets at
Fair Value $394.1  $— $394.1  $— $189.1  $— $189.1  $— 
Liabilities at Fair
Value
Derivatives
Forward exchange
contracts $124.4  $— $124.4  $— $275.3  $— $275.3  $— 
Interest rate
management
contracts 87.0  —  87.0  —  91.2  —  91.2  — 
Total Liabilities at
Fair Value $211.4  $— $211.4  $— $366.5  $— $366.5  $— 
16. DEBT
The table below summarizes our total outstanding debt as reﬂected on our consolidated balance sheets:
30 September 2023 2022
Short-term borrowings $259.5  $10.7 
Current portion of long-term debt 615.0  548.3 
Long-term debt 9,280.6  6,433.8 
Long-term debt – related party 150.7  652.0 
Total Debt $10,305.8  $7,644.8 
Balances reﬂect bank obligations with weighted average interest rates of 5.2% and 4.2% as of 30 September 2023
and 2022, respectively. The increase from ﬁscal year 2022 primarily relates to commercial paper.
Related Party Debt
Our related party debt includes loans with our joint venture partners. Total debt owed to related parties
was $328.3 and $781.0 as of 30 September 2023 and 30 September 2022, respectively, of which $177.6
and $129.0, respectively, was reﬂected within "Current portion of long-term debt" on our consolidated
balance sheets. During the third quarter of ﬁscal year 2023, outstanding shareholder loans to the NGHC
joint venture were converted to equity in the entity. Refer to Note 3, Variable Interest Entities, for
additional information on this joint venture. The remaining related party debt balance as of 30
September 2023 primarily includes a loan with Lu’An Clean Energy Company.
Debt Covenants
Various debt agreements to which we are a party include ﬁnancial covenants and other restrictions,
including restrictions pertaining to the ability to create property liens and enter into certain sale and
leaseback transactions. As of 30 September 2023, we were in compliance with all the ﬁnancial and other
covenants under our debt agreements.(A)
(A)
90
Table of Contents
Summary of Long-Term Debt Instruments
The table below summarizes the coupon interest rates, ﬁscal year maturities, and carrying amounts of
our long-term debt, including current portion and amounts owed to related parties. Variable rates are
determined as of 30 September 2023.
30 September Maturities 2023 2022
Payable in U.S. Dollars
Medium-ter m Notes (weighted average rate)
Series E 7.6% 2026 $17.2   $17.2 
Senior Notes
Note 2.75% 2023 —  400.0  
Note 3.35% 2024 400.0   400.0  
Note 1.50% 2026 550.0   550.0  
Note 1.85% 2027 650.0   650.0  
Note 2.05% 2030 900.0   900.0  
Note 4.800 % 2033 600.0   — 
Note 2.70% 2040 750.0   750.0  
Note 2.80% 2050 950.0   950.0  
Other (weighted average rate)
Variable-rate industrial r evenue bonds 3.55% 2035 to 2050 618.9   618.9  
Other variable-rate 6.78% 2024 to 2032 41.4   41.4 
Payable in Other Currencies
Eurobonds 1.000 % 2025 317.2   294.1  
Eurobonds 0.500 % 2028 528.6   490.1  
Eurobonds 0.800 % 2032 528.6   490.1  
Eurobonds 4.000 % 2035 740.1   — 
Saudi Riyal L oan F acility variable-rate 4.10% 2023 —  195.6  
Saudi Riyal L oan F acility variable-rate 7.00% 2027 451.1   — 
Saudi Riyal L oan F acility 2.00% 2034 192.1   — 
New T aiwan Dollar L oan F acility 1.86% 2024 to 2028 167.5   189.0  
New T aiwan Dollar L oan F acility 2.66% 2026 to 2029 186.1   31.5 
New T aiwan Dollar L oan F acility variable-rate 2.55% 2026 to 2030 3.1  — 
Other 2023 —  0.1 
Related P arty Debt
Chinese R enminbi 5.5% 2024 to 2027 313.5   321.5  
Chinese R enminbi 5.7% 2033 14.8   12.2 
Non-Recourse Debt Associated With NGHC 2027 to 2053 1,364.8   — 
Finance Lease Obligations  (weighted average rate)
Foreign 11.4% 2025 to 2036 7.5  7.6 
Total Principal Amount $10,292.5   $7,309.3  
Plus: R elated party shar eholder loans to NGHC —  447.3  
Less: Unamortized discount and debt issuance costs (165.7 ) (45.4)
Less: F air value hedge accounting adjustments (80.5) (77.1)
Total Long-term Debt $10,046.3   $7,634.1  
Less: Cur rent portion of long-ter m debt (615.0 ) (548.3 )
Less: L ong-ter m debt – r elated party (150.7 ) (652.0 )
Long-term Debt $9,280.6   $6,433.8  
Refer to the "NEOM Green Hydrogen Project Financing" section below for additional information.
Refer to Note 14, Financial Instruments, for additional information.
Principal maturities of long-term debt, including current portion and amounts owed to related parties, in
each of the next ﬁve years and thereafter are as follows:
2024 $615.3 
2025 419.5 
2026 701.4 
2027 1,362.8 
2028 632.2 
Thereafter 6,561.3 
Total $10,292.5 (A)
(B)
(A)
(B)
91
Table of Contents
Interest
The table below reconciles interest incurred to interest expense as presented on our consolidated
income statements. Capitalized interest represents the portion of interest incurred that we include in the
cost of new plant and equipment that we build during the year.
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 2021
Interest incurred $292.9  $169.0  $170.1 
Less: Capitalized interest 115.4  41.0  28.3 
Interest expense $177.5  $128.0  $141.8 
Cash paid for interest, net of amounts capitalized, was $131.5, $128.5, and $150.4 in ﬁscal years 2023,
2022, and 2021, respectively.
Green Financing
On 3 March 2023, we issued our inaugural multi-currency green bonds under our new Green Finance
Framework, which was established to further align our ﬁnancings with our sustainability strategy. The
concurrent oﬀerings included U.S. Dollar- and Euro-denominated ﬁxed-rate notes with aggregate
principal amounts of $600 and €700 million, respectively. The proceeds from the notes were reduced by
deferred ﬁnancing charges and discounts of approximately $15, which are being amortized over the life
of the underlying bonds.
Credit Facilities
2021 Credit Agreement
We have a ﬁve-year $2.75 billion revolving credit agreement maturing 31 March 2026 with a syndicate of
banks (the “2021 Credit Agreement”), under which senior unsecured debt is available to us and certain
of our subsidiaries. The 2021 Credit Agreement provides a source of liquidity and supports our
commercial paper program. No borrowings were outstanding under the 2021 Credit Agreement as of 30
September 2023.
The only ﬁnancial covenant in the 2021 Credit Agreement is a maximum ratio of total debt to total
capitalization (equal to total debt plus total equity) not to exceed 70%. The 2021 Credit Agreement
deﬁnes total debt as the aggregate principal amount of all indebtedness, excluding limited recourse debt
of any project ﬁnance subsidiary. Accordingly, this calculation does not consider borrowings associated
with NGHC.
Foreign Credit Facilities
We also have credit facilities available to certain of our foreign subsidiaries totaling $1,596.8, of which
$1,041.4 was borrowed and outstanding as of 30 September 2023. The amount borrowed and
outstanding as of 30 September 2022 was $457.5. The increase from 30 September 2022 was driven by
borrowings on a new variable-rate Saudi Riyal loan facility that matures in October 2026. The interest
rate on the facility is based on SAIBOR plus an annual margin of 1.35%. We entered into this facility in
October 2022 and utilized a portion of the proceeds to repay a variable-rate 4.10% Saudi Riyal loan
facility of $195.6, which was presented within long-term debt on our consolidated balance sheet as of 30
September 2022.
NEOM Green Hydrogen Project Financing
In May 2023, NGHC secured non-recourse project ﬁnancing of approximately $6.1 billion, which is
expected to fund about 73% of the NEOM Green Hydrogen Project and will be drawn over the
construction period. At the same time, NGHC secured additional non-recourse credit facilities totaling
approximately $500 primarily for working capital needs. As of 30 September 2023, the joint venture had
borrowed $1.4 billion of the available ﬁnancing. For additional information, including details of related
debt instruments, refer to Note 3, Variable Interest Entities.
92
Table of Contents
17. RETIREMENT BENEFITS
We and certain of our subsidiaries sponsor deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans and deﬁned contribution plans
that cover a substantial portion of our worldwide employees. The principal deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans
are the U.S. salaried pension plan and the U.K. pension plan. These plans were closed to new
participants in 2005, after which deﬁned contribution plans were oﬀered to new employees. The
principal deﬁned contribution plan is the Retirement Savings Plan, in which a substantial portion of the
U.S. employees participate. A similar plan is oﬀered to U.K. employees. We also provide other
postretirement beneﬁts consisting primarily of healthcare beneﬁts to U.S. retirees who meet age and
service requirements.
Deﬁned Beneﬁt Pension Plans
Pension beneﬁts earned are generally based on years of service and compensation during active
employment. The components of net periodic (beneﬁt) cost for our deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans for
ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021 were as follows:
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September
2023 2022 2021
U.S.Inter-
nationalTotal U.S.Inter-
nationalTotal U.S.Inter-
nationalTotal
Service cost $10.9 $12.3 $23.2 $18.3 $21.5 $39.8 $21.3 $23.4 $44.7 
Non-service cost (beneﬁt):
Interest cost 129.9 59.9 189.8 73.9 28.9 102.8 68.9 25.2 94.1 
Expected return on plan
assets (127.1)(49.2)(176.3)(168.3)(67.4)(235.7)(194.5)(83.4)(277.9)
Prior service cost
amortization 1.2  0.7  1.9  1.3  —  1.3  1.2  —  1.2 
Actuarial loss
amortization 59.7 11.6 71.3 66.0 14.7 80.7 78.5 19.3 97.8 
Settlements 1.4  0.6  2.0  6.0  0.2  6.2  1.3  0.5  1.8 
Curtailments — (1.9)(1.9) —  —  —  —  —  — 
Other —  0.9  0.9  —  1.3  1.3  —  1.0  1.0 
Net Periodic Cost
(Beneﬁt) $76.0 $34.9 $110.9 ($2.8)($0.8)($3.6)($23.3)($14.0)($37.3)
Our service costs are primarily included within "Cost of sales" and "Selling and administrative expense"
on our consolidated income statements. The amount of service costs capitalized in ﬁscal years 2023,
2022 and 2021 were not material. The non-service related impacts, including pension settlement losses
and curtailment gains, are presented outside operating income within "Other non-operating income
(expense), net."
Certain of our pension plans provide for a lump sum beneﬁt payment option at the time of retirement, or
for corporate oﬃcers, six months after their retirement date. A participant’s vested beneﬁt is considered
settled upon cash payment of the lump sum. We recognize pension settlement losses when cash
payments exceed the sum of the service and interest cost components of net periodic beneﬁt cost of the
plan for the ﬁscal year. We recognized pension settlement losses of $1.4, $6.0 and $1.3 in ﬁscal years
2023, 2022 and 2021, respectively, to accelerate recognition of a portion of actuarial losses deferred in
accumulated other comprehensive loss associated with the U.S. supplementary pension plan.
We calculate net periodic beneﬁt cost for a given ﬁscal year based on assumptions developed at the end
of the previous ﬁscal year. The following table sets forth the weighted average assumptions used in the
calculation of net periodic beneﬁt cost:
  2023 2022 2021
   U.S.International U.S.International U.S.International
Discount rate – Service
cost 5.7 % 4.6 % 3.0 % 1.9 % 3.0 % 1.6 %
Discount rate – Interest
cost 5.5 % 5.0 % 2.3 % 1.6 % 2.1 % 1.2 %
Expected return on plan
assets 5.8 % 4.2 % 5.8 % 4.0 % 6.8 % 4.7 %
Rate of compensation
increase 3.5 % 3.4 % 3.5 % 3.3 % 3.5 % 3.3 %
93
Table of Contents
The projected beneﬁt obligation ("PBO") is the actuarial present value of beneﬁts attributable to
employee service rendered to date, including the eﬀects of estimated future salary increases. The
following table sets forth the weighted average assumptions used in the calculation of the PBO:
2023 2022
U.S.International U.S. International
Discount rate 6.0 % 5.1 % 5.6 % 4.7 %
Rate of compensation increase 3.5 % 3.4 % 3.5 % 3.4 %
The following tables reﬂect the change in the PBO and the change in the fair value of plan assets based
on the plan year measurement date, as well as the amounts recognized in the consolidated balance
sheets:
2023 2022
U.S.International U.S.International
Change in Projected Beneﬁt
Obligation
Obligation at beginning of year $2,450.8  $1,137.5  $3,335.3  $1,969.6 
Service cost 10.9  12.3  18.3  21.5 
Interest cost 129.9  59.9  73.9  28.9 
Amendments 0.3  7.0  1.5  0.1 
Actuarial (gain) loss (68.3) (80.1) (793.8) (575.2)
Curtailments —  (14.8) —  — 
Settlements (4.7) (3.4) (19.2) (0.9)
Participant contributions —  0.8  —  1.2 
Beneﬁts paid (170.1) (52.8) (165.2) (53.0)
Currency translation and other —  96.0  —  (254.7)
Obligation at End of Year $2,348.8  $1,162.4  $2,450.8  $1,137.5 
2023 2022
U.S.International U.S.International
Change in Plan Assets
Fair value at beginning of year $2,404.0  $1,122.0  $3,343.7  $1,905.0 
Actual return on plan assets 61.4  (52.7) (778.3) (498.5)
Settlements (4.7) (3.4) (19.2) (0.9)
Company contributions 8.4  24.2  23.0  21.7 
Participant contributions —  0.8  —  1.2 
Beneﬁts paid (170.1) (52.8) (165.2) (53.0)
Currency translation and other —  95.9  —  (253.5)
Fair Value at End of Year $2,299.0  $1,134.0  $2,404.0  $1,122.0 
Funded Status at End of Year ($49.8) ($28.4) ($46.8) ($15.5)
2023 2022
U.S.International U.S.International
Amounts Recognized
Noncurrent assets $36.2  $83.8  $36.4  $97.5 
Accrued liabilities 5.3  0.6  5.8  0.4 
Noncurrent liabilities 80.7  111.6  77.4  112.6 
Net Liability Recognized ($49.8) ($28.4) ($46.8) ($15.5)
94
Table of Contents
The changes in plan assets and beneﬁt obligation that have been recognized in other comprehensive
income on a pretax basis during ﬁscal years 2023 and 2022 consist of the following:
2023 2022
U.S.International U.S.International
Net actuarial (gain) loss arising during the
period ($2.6) $7.0  $152.8  ($9.3)
Amortization of net actuarial loss (61.1) (12.2) (72.0) (14.9)
Prior service cost arising during the period 0.3  7.0  1.5  0.1 
Amortization of prior service (cost) credit (1.2) 1.2  (1.3) — 
Total ($64.6) $3.0  $81.0  ($24.1)
The net actuarial gains and losses represent the actual changes in the estimated obligation and plan
assets that have not yet been recognized in the consolidated income statements and are included in
accumulated other comprehensive loss. Actuarial losses arising during ﬁscal year 2023 are primarily
attributable to lower than expected returns on plan assets that were partially oﬀset by higher discount
rates. Accumulated actuarial gains and losses that exceed a corridor are amortized over the average
remaining service period of active U.S. participants, which was approximately seven years as of 30
September 2023. For U.K. participants, accumulated actuarial gains and losses that exceed a corridor
are amortized over the average remaining life expectancy, which was approximately 23 years as of 30
September 2023.
The components recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss on a pretax basis at
30 September consisted of the following:
2023 2022
U.S.International U.S.International
Net actuarial loss $461.8  $506.4  $525.5  $511.6 
Prior service cost 5.6  11.9  6.5  3.7 
Net transition liability —  0.4  —  0.4 
Total $467.4  $518.7  $532.0  $515.7 
The accumulated beneﬁt obligation ("ABO") is the actuarial present value of beneﬁts attributed to
employee service rendered to a particular date, based on current salaries. The ABO for all deﬁned
beneﬁt pension plans was $3,429.1 and $3,491.4 as of 30 September 2023 and 2022, respectively.
The following table provides information on pension plans where the beneﬁt liability exceeds the value of
plan assets:
2023 2022
30 September U.S.International U.S.International
Pension Plans with PBO in Excess of Plan
Assets:
PBO $2,194.5  $295.1  $2,289.7  $284.9 
Fair value of plan assets 2,108.5  182.9  2,206.5  171.8 
PBO in excess of plan assets $86.0  $112.2  $83.2  $113.1 
Pension Plans with ABO in Excess of Plan
Assets:
ABO $47.1  $144.3  $50.5  $101.3 
Fair value of plan assets —  56.3  —  20.1 
ABO in excess of plan assets $47.1  $88.0  $50.5  $81.2 
The tables above include several pension arrangements that are not funded because of jurisdictional
practice. The ABO and PBO related to these plans as of 30 September 2023 were $54.5 and $58.7,
respectively.
95
Table of Contents
Pension Plan Assets
Our pension plan investment strategy is to invest in diversiﬁed portfolios to earn a long-term return
consistent with acceptable risk in order to pay retirement beneﬁts and meet regulatory funding
requirements while minimizing company cash contributions over time. De-risking strategies are also
employed for closed plans as funding improves, generally resulting in higher allocations to long duration
bonds. The plans invest primarily in passive and actively managed equity and debt securities. Equity
investments are diversiﬁed geographically and by investment style and market capitalization. Fixed
income investments include sovereign, corporate and asset-backed securities generally denominated in
the currency of the plan. The U.S. and U.K. plans' investment managers are authorized to utilize
derivatives to manage interest and inﬂation exposure.
Asset allocation targets are established based on the long-term return, volatility and correlation
characteristics of the asset classes, the proﬁles of the plans’ liabilities, and acceptable levels of risk. As
of 30 September 2023, the U.S pension plan was at target with respect to the ﬁxed income securities
portfolio. The company continues to monitor the investment portfolio and various investment markets
and will take action accordingly. Assets are routinely rebalanced through contributions, beneﬁt
payments, and otherwise as deemed appropriate. The actual and target allocations at the measurement
date are as follows:
2023 Target Allocation 2023 Actual Allocation 2022 Actual Allocation
U.S.International U.S.International U.S.International
Asset
Category
Equity securities17 - 29% 5 - 30% 19 % 19 % 17 % 31 %
Fixed income
securities 66 - 80% 70 - 95% 72 % 80 % 73 % 68 %
Real estate and
other 3 - 5% — % 8 % — % 10 % — %
Cash — % — % 1 % 1 % — % 1 %
Total 100 % 100 % 100 % 100 %
In ﬁscal year 2023, the 5.8% expected return for U.S. plan assets was based on a weighted average of
estimated long-term returns of major asset classes and the historical performance of plan assets. In
determining the estimated long-term asset class returns, we take into account historical long-term
returns and the value of active management, as well as other economic and market factors, and input
from our actuaries and investment advisors.
In ﬁscal year 2023, the 4.2% expected rate of return for international plan assets was based on a
weighted average return for plans outside the U.S., which vary signiﬁcantly in size, asset structure and
expected returns. The expected asset return for the U.K. plan, which represents approximately 80% of
the assets of our International plans, was 4.3% and was derived from expected equity and debt security
returns.
96
Table of Contents
The table below summarizes pension plan assets measured at fair value by asset class (see Note 15, Fair
Value Measurements, for deﬁnition of the levels):
2023 2022
30 September TotalLevel 1Level 2Level 3 TotalLevel 1Level 2Level 3
U.S. Qualiﬁed
Pension Plans
Cash and cash
equivalents $14.6 $14.6  $—  $—  $14.0 $14.0  $—  $— 
Equity securities 143.0 143.0  —  —  127.4 127.4  —  — 
Equity mutual funds 105.2 105.2  —  —  84.5 84.5  —  — 
Equity pooled funds 187.8  — 187.8  —  188.4  — 188.4  — 
Fixed income securities1,661.8  — 1,661.8  — 1,759.1  — 1,759.1  — 
Total U.S. Qualiﬁed
Pension Plans at Fair
Value $2,112.4 $262.8 $1,849.6  $— $2,173.4 $225.9 $1,947.5  $— 
Real estate pooled
funds 186.6  230.6 
Total U.S. Qualiﬁed
Pension Plans $2,299.0  $2,404.0 
International Pension
Plans
Cash and cash
equivalents $8.0 $8.0  $—  $—  $12.1 $12.1  $—  $— 
Equity pooled funds 218.5  — 218.5  —  348.1  — 348.1  — 
Fixed income pooled
funds 724.6  — 630.4 94.2  589.9  — 536.4 53.5 
Other pooled funds 17.1  —  17.1  —  16.4  —  16.4  — 
Insurance contracts 165.8  —  — 165.8  155.5  —  — 155.5 
Total International
Pension Plans $1,134.0 $8.0 $866.0 $260.0 $1,122.0 $12.1 $900.9 $209.0 
Real estate pooled funds consist of funds that invest in pr operties. These funds generally allow for quarterly
redemption with 30 days' notice. T iming for r edemption could be delayed based on the priority of our r equest and
the availability of funds. Inter ests in these funds ar e valued using the net asset value ("NA V") per shar e practical
expedient and ar e not classiﬁed in the fair value hierar chy.
The table below summarizes changes in fair value of the pension plan assets classiﬁed as Level 3:
Insurance
ContractsFixed Income
Pooled FundsTotal Level 3
Balance at 30 September 2021 $246.6  $—  $246.6 
Purchases, sales, and settlements, net —  80.3  80.3 
Actual return on plan assets held at end of year (91.1) (26.8) (117.9)
Balance at 30 September 2022 $155.5  $53.5  $209.0 
Purchases, sales, and settlements, net (3.7) 34.5  30.8 
Actual return on plan assets held at end of year 14.0  6.2  20.2 
Balance at 30 September 2023 $165.8  $94.2  $260.0 
The descriptions and fair value methodologies for the U.S. and International pension plan assets are as
follows:
Cash and Cash Equivalents
The carrying amounts of cash and cash equivalents approximate fair value due to the short-term
maturity.
Equity Securities
Equity securities are valued at the closing market price reported on a U.S. or international exchange
where the security is actively traded and are therefore classiﬁed as Level 1 assets.
Equity Mutual Funds
Shares of mutual funds are valued at the daily closing price as reported by the fund. The mutual funds
are required to publish their daily NAV and to transact at that price. The mutual funds are deemed to be
actively traded and are classiﬁed as Level 1 assets.(A)
(A)
97
Table of Contents
Equity Pooled Funds
Units of pooled funds are valued at the per unit NAV determined by the fund manager based on the
value of the underlying traded holdings and are classiﬁed as Level 2 assets.
Fixed Income Securities
Corporate and government bonds, and related ﬁxed income securities, are classiﬁed as Level 2 assets,
as they are either valued at quoted market prices from observable pricing sources at the reporting date
or valued based upon comparable securities with similar yields and credit ratings. U.S. plan ﬁxed income
investments primarily include U.S. corporate bonds, U.S. treasury investments, interest rate swaps, total
return swaps, and U.S. treasury future contracts.
Fixed Income Pooled Funds
Fixed income pooled funds are classiﬁed as either Level 2 or Level 3 assets depending on the underlying
investments of the fund. Fixed income pooled funds classiﬁed as Level 2 assets may hold government
bonds, index linked bonds, corporate bonds, cash, and derivative instruments. The NAV of these assets is
based on quoted market pricing from observable pricing sources or valued based upon comparable
securities with similar yields, credit ratings, or factors as of the reporting date. Fixed income pooled
funds classiﬁed as Level 3 may hold high yield bonds, emerging market debt, loans, structured credit,
and other instruments. Due to the limited market activity of the underlying securities, the NAV of these
assets is based on the fund manager's estimate of the fair value of the shares held as of the reporting
date.
Other Pooled Funds
Other pooled funds are classiﬁed as Level 2 assets, as they are valued at the NAV of the shares held at
year end, which is based on the fair value of the underlying investments.
Insurance Contracts
Insurance contracts are classiﬁed as Level 3 assets, as they are carried at contract value, which
approximates the estimated fair value. The estimated fair value is based on the fair value of the
underlying investment of the insurance company and discount rates that require inputs with limited
observability.
Contributions and Projected Beneﬁt Payments
Pension contributions to funded plans and beneﬁt payments for unfunded plans for ﬁscal year 2023 were
$32.6. Contributions for funded plans resulted primarily from contractual and regulatory requirements.
Beneﬁt payments to unfunded plans were due primarily to the timing of retirements. We anticipate
contributing $35 to $45 to the deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans in ﬁscal year 2024. These contributions are
anticipated to be driven primarily by contractual and regulatory requirements for funded plans and
beneﬁt payments for unfunded plans, which are dependent upon timing of retirements.
Projected beneﬁt payments, which reﬂect expected future service, are as follows:
U.S.International
2024 $176.5  $59.9 
2025 179.8  59.8 
2026 182.2  63.5 
2027 184.1  66.2 
2028 187.5  68.1 
2029-2033 943.2  372.1 
These estimated beneﬁt payments are based on assumptions about future events. Actual beneﬁt
payments may vary signiﬁcantly from these estimates.
98
Table of Contents
Deﬁned Contribution Plans
We maintain a non-leveraged employee stock ownership plan ("ESOP") which forms part of the Air
Products and Chemicals, Inc. Retirement Savings Plan ("RSP"). The ESOP was established in May of 2002.
The balance of the RSP is a qualiﬁed deﬁned contribution plan including a 401(k) elective deferral
component. A substantial portion of U.S. employees are eligible and participate.
We treat dividends paid on ESOP shares as ordinary dividends. Under existing tax law, we may deduct
dividends which are paid with respect to shares held by the plan. Shares of our common stock in the
ESOP totaled 1,822,509 as of 30 September 2023.
Our contributions to the RSP include a Company core contribution for certain eligible employees who do
not receive their primary retirement beneﬁt from the deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans, with the core
contribution based on a percentage of pay that is dependent on years of service. For the RSP, we also
make matching contributions on overall employee contributions as a percentage of the employee
contribution and include an enhanced contribution for certain eligible employees that do not participate
in the deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans. Worldwide contributions expensed to income in ﬁscal years 2023,
2022, and 2021 were $71.5, $60.6, and $53.3, respectively.
Other Postretirement Beneﬁts
We provide other postretirement beneﬁts consisting primarily of healthcare beneﬁts to certain U.S.
retirees who meet age and service requirements. The healthcare beneﬁt is a continued medical beneﬁt
until the retiree reaches age 65. Healthcare beneﬁts are contributory, with contributions adjusted
periodically. The retiree medical costs are capped at a speciﬁed dollar amount, with the retiree
contributing the remainder. The cost of these beneﬁts was not material in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and
2021. Accumulated postretirement beneﬁt obligations as of the end of ﬁscal years 2023 and 2022 were
$14.0 and $19.9, respectively, of which $3.7 and $4.9 were current obligations, respectively.
We recognize changes in other postretirement beneﬁt plan obligations in other comprehensive income
on a pretax basis. During ﬁscal years 2023 and 2022 we recognized a loss of $0.1 and $0.5, respectively,
that arose during the period, and $2.0 and $1.6 of net actuarial gain amortization, respectively.
The net actuarial gain recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss on a pretax basis was $2.4
and $4.5 as of 30 September 2023 and 2022, respectively.
18. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Litigation
We are involved in various legal proceedings, including commercial, competition, environmental,
intellectual property, regulatory, product liability, and insurance matters. We do not currently believe
there are any legal proceedings, individually or in the aggregate, that are reasonably possible to have a
material impact on our ﬁnancial condition, results of operations, or cash ﬂows.
In September 2010, the Brazilian Administrative Council for Economic Defense ("CADE") issued a
decision against our Brazilian subsidiary, Air Products Brasil Ltda., and several other Brazilian industrial
gas companies for alleged anticompetitive activities. CADE imposed a civil ﬁne of R$179.2 million
(approximately $36 at 30 September 2023) on Air Products Brasil Ltda. This ﬁne was based on a
recommendation by a unit of the Brazilian Ministry of Justice, following an investigation beginning in
2003, which alleged violation of competition laws with respect to the sale of industrial and medical
gases. The ﬁnes are based on a percentage of our total revenue in Brazil in 2003.
We have denied the allegations made by the authorities and ﬁled an appeal in October 2010 with the
Brazilian courts. On 6 May 2014, our appeal was granted and the ﬁne against Air Products Brasil Ltda.
was dismissed. CADE has appealed that ruling and the matter remains pending. We, with advice of our
outside legal counsel, have assessed the status of this matter and have concluded that, although an
adverse ﬁnal judgment after exhausting all appeals is possible, such a judgment is not probable. As a
result, no provision has been made in the consolidated ﬁnancial statements. In the event of an adverse
ﬁnal judgment, we estimate the maximum possible loss to be the full amount of the ﬁne of R$179.2
million (approximately $36 at 30 September 2023) plus interest accrued thereon until ﬁnal disposition of
the proceedings.
Additionally, in April 2023, we received a favorable ruling from a Texas state court in litigation involving
disputed energy management charges related to Winter Storm Uri, a severe winter weather storm that
impacted the U.S. Gulf Coast in February 2021. The ruling is subject to appeal and had no impact on our
consolidated ﬁnancial statements for the twelve months ended 30 September 2023.
99
Table of Contents
Environmental
In the normal course of business, we are involved in legal proceedings under the Comprehensive
Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act ("CERCLA," the federal Superfund law),
Resource Conservation and Recovery Act ("RCRA"), and similar state and foreign environmental laws
relating to the designation of certain sites for investigation or remediation. Presently, there are 27 sites
on which a ﬁnal settlement or remediation has not been achieved where we, usually along with others,
have been designated a potentially responsible party by environmental authorities or are otherwise
engaged in investigation or remediation, including cleanup activity at certain of our current and former
manufacturing sites. We continually monitor these sites for which we have environmental exposure.
Accruals for environmental loss contingencies are recorded when it is probable that a liability has been
incurred and the amount of loss can be reasonably estimated. The consolidated balance sheets at 30
September 2023 and 30 September 2022 included an accrual of $64.5 and $71.3, respectively, primarily
as part of other noncurrent liabilities. The environmental liabilities will be paid over a period of up to 26
years. We estimate the exposure for environmental loss contingencies to range from $64 to a reasonably
possible upper exposure of $78 as of 30 September 2023.
Actual costs to be incurred at identiﬁed sites in future periods may vary from the estimates, given
inherent uncertainties in evaluating environmental exposures. Using reasonably possible alternative
assumptions of the exposure level could result in an increase to the environmental accrual. Due to the
inherent uncertainties related to environmental exposures, a signiﬁcant increase to the reasonably
possible upper exposure level could occur if a new site is designated, the scope of remediation is
increased, a diﬀerent remediation alternative is identiﬁed, or a signiﬁcant increase in our proportionate
share occurs. We do not expect that any sum we may have to pay in connection with environmental
matters in excess of the amounts recorded or disclosed above would have a material adverse impact on
our ﬁnancial position or results of operations in any one year.
Pace
At 30 September 2023, $37.3 of the environmental accrual was related to the Pace facility.
In 2006, we sold our Amines business, which included operations at Pace, Florida, and recognized a
liability for retained environmental obligations associated with remediation activities at Pace. We are
required by the Florida Department of Environmental Protection ("FDEP") and the United States
Environmental Protection Agency ("USEPA") to continue our remediation eﬀorts. We recognized a before-
tax expense of $42 in ﬁscal year 2006 in results from discontinued operations and recorded an
environmental accrual of $42 in continuing operations on the consolidated balance sheets.
During the second quarter of ﬁscal year 2020, we completed an updated cost review of the
environmental remediation status at the Pace facility. The review was completed in conjunction with
requirements to maintain ﬁnancial assurance per the Consent Order issued by the FDEP discussed below.
Based on our review, we expect ongoing activities to continue for 30 years. Additionally, we will require
near-term spending to install new groundwater recovery wells and ancillary equipment, in addition to
future capital to consider the extended time horizon for remediation at the site. As a result of these
changes, we increased our environmental accrual for this site by $19 in continuing operations on the
consolidated balance sheets and recognized a before-tax expense of $19 in results from discontinued
operations in the second quarter of ﬁscal year 2020. There have been no signiﬁcant changes to the
estimated exposure range related to the Pace facility since the second quarter of ﬁscal year 2020.
We have implemented many of the remedial corrective measures at the Pace facility required under
1995 Consent Orders issued by the FDEP and the USEPA. Contaminated soils have been bioremediated,
and the treated soils have been secured in a lined on-site corrective action management unit. Several
groundwater recovery systems have been installed to contain and remove contamination from
groundwater. We completed an extensive assessment of the site to determine the eﬃcacy of existing
measures, what additional corrective measures may be needed, and whether newer remediation
technologies that were not available in the 1990s might be suitable to more quickly and eﬀectively
remediate groundwater. Based on assessment results, we completed a focused feasibility study that has
identiﬁed alternative approaches that may more eﬀectively remove contaminants. We continue to
review alternative remedial approaches with the FDEP and completed additional ﬁeld work during 2021
to support the design of an improved groundwater recovery network with the objective of targeting
areas of higher contaminant concentration and avoiding areas of high groundwater iron which has
proven to be a signiﬁcant operability issue for the project. The design of the optimized recovery system
was initiated in ﬁscal year 2023 with construction expected to begin in ﬁscal year 2025. In the ﬁrst
quarter of 2015, we entered into a new Consent Order with the FDEP requiring us to continue our
remediation eﬀorts at the Pace facility, along with the completion of a cost review every 5 years.
100
Table of Contents
Piedmont
At 30 September 2023, $4.5 of the environmental accrual was related to the Piedmont site.
On 30 June 2008, we sold our Elkton, Maryland, and Piedmont, South Carolina, production facilities and
the related North American atmospheric emulsions and global pressure sensitive adhesives businesses.
In connection with the sale, we recognized a liability for retained environmental obligations associated
with remediation activities at the Piedmont site. This site is under active remediation for contamination
caused by an insolvent prior owner.
We are required by the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control ("SCDHEC") to
address both contaminated soil and groundwater. Numerous areas of soil contamination have been
addressed, and contaminated groundwater is being recovered and treated. The SCDHEC issued its ﬁnal
approval to the site-wide feasibility study on 13 June 2017 and the Record of Decision for the site on 27
June 2018, after which we signed a Consent Agreement Amendment memorializing our obligations to
complete the cleanup of the site. Remediation has started in accordance with the design, which includes
in-situ chemical oxidation treatment, as well as soil vapor extraction to remove volatile organic
compounds from the unsaturated soils beneath the impacted areas of the plant. We estimate that source
area remediation and groundwater recovery and treatment will continue through 2029. Thereafter, we
expect this site to go into a state of monitored natural attenuation through 2047.
We recognized a before-tax expense of $24 in 2008 as a component of income from discontinued
operations and recorded an environmental liability of $24 in continuing operations on the consolidated
balance sheets. There have been no signiﬁcant changes to the estimated exposure.
Pasadena
At 30 September 2023, $10.5 of the environmental accrual was related to the Pasadena site.
During the fourth quarter of 2012, management committed to permanently shutting down our
polyurethane intermediates ("PUI") production facility in Pasadena, Texas. In shutting down and
dismantling the facility, we have undertaken certain obligations related to soil and groundwater
contaminants. We have been pumping and treating groundwater to control oﬀ-site contaminant
migration in compliance with regulatory requirements and under the approval of the Texas Commission
on Environmental Quality ("TCEQ"). We estimate that the pump and treat system will continue to operate
until 2042.
We continue to perform additional work to address other environmental obligations at the site. This
additional work includes remediating, as required, impacted soils, investigating groundwater west of the
former PUI facility, continuing post closure care for two closed RCRA surface impoundment units, and
maintaining engineering controls. Additionally, we have conducted an interim corrective action to treat
impacted soils as recommended in the TCEQ 2019 Annual Report. In 2012, we estimated the total
exposure at this site to be $13. There have been no signiﬁcant changes to the estimated exposure.
Asset Retirement Obligations
Our asset retirement obligations are primarily associated with long-term on-site supply contracts under
which we have built a facility on land owned by the customer and are obligated to remove the facility at
the end of the contract term. The retirement of assets includes the contractually required removal of a
long-lived asset from service and encompasses the sale, removal, abandonment, recycling, or disposal
of the assets as required at the end of the contract term. These obligations are primarily reﬂected within
"Other noncurrent liabilities" on the consolidated balance sheets. The timing and/or method of
settlement of these obligations are conditional on a future event that may or may not be within our
control.
Changes to the carrying amount of our asset retirement obligations were as follows:
Balance at 30 September 2021 $269.6 
Additional accruals 17.9 
Liabilities settled (7.8)
Accretion expense 11.1 
Currency translation adjustment (16.1)
Balance at 30 September 2022 $274.7 
Additional accruals 20.4 
Liabilities settled (8.8)
Accretion expense 11.4 
Currency translation adjustment (0.4)
Balance at 30 September 2023 $297.3 
101
Table of Contents
Warranties and Guarantees
We do not expect that any sum we may have to pay in connection with warranties and guarantees will
have a material adverse eﬀect on our consolidated ﬁnancial condition, liquidity, or results of operations.
Warranties
We, in the normal course of business operations, have issued product warranties related to equipment
sales. Also, contracts often contain standard terms and conditions which typically include a warranty and
indemniﬁcation to the buyer that the goods and services purchased do not infringe on third-party
intellectual property rights. The provision for estimated future costs relating to warranties is not material
to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements.
Guarantees
To date, no equity contributions or payments have been made since the inception of the guarantees
discussed below. The fair value of these guarantees is not material.
We issued performance guarantees as a condition of project ﬁnancing associated with the NEOM Green
Hydrogen Project that would require us to pay up to approximately $1.2 billion in the event of
nonperformance in our role as EPC contractor. Our exposure will decline over time before expiring in
November 2028. Refer to Note 3, Variable Interest Entities, for additional information regarding the
project.
We are party to an equity support agreement and operations guarantee related to an air separation
facility constructed in Trinidad for a venture in which we own 50%. At 30 September 2023, maximum
potential payments under joint and several guarantees were $22.0. Exposures under the guarantees will
be completely extinguished by 2024.
We also have a long-term sale of equipment contract with the JIGPC joint venture to engineer, procure,
and construct the industrial gas facilities that will supply gases to Aramco. We provided bank guarantees
to the joint venture to support our performance under the contract. As of 30 September 2023, our
maximum potential payments were $244.5.
Unconditional Purchase Obligations
We are obligated to make future payments under unconditional purchase obligations as summarized
below:
2024 $6,356 
2025 2,673 
2026 1,321 
2027 699 
2028 575 
Thereafter 4,494 
Total $16,118 
Approximately $8.8 billion of our unconditional purchase obligations relate to open purchase orders for
plant and equipment, of which approximately $5 billion relates to the NEOM Green Hydrogen Project.
Although open purchase orders are considered enforceable and legally binding, the terms generally
allow us the option to reschedule, cancel, or otherwise modify based on our business needs. We have
estimated the timing of these payments in the table above; however, timing of actual satisfaction of the
obligations may vary.
Approximately $6.4 billion of our unconditional purchase obligations relate to helium and rare gases. The
majority of these obligations occur after ﬁscal year 2028. Helium purchases include crude feedstock
supply to helium reﬁning plants in North America as well as reﬁned helium purchases from sources
around the world. As a rare byproduct of natural gas production in the energy sector, these helium
sourcing agreements are medium- to long-term and contain take-if-tendered provisions. The reﬁned
helium is distributed globally and sold as a merchant gas, primarily under medium-term requirements
contracts. While contract terms in our helium sourcing contracts are generally longer than our customer
sales contracts, helium is a rare gas used in applications with few or no substitutions because of its
unique physical and chemical properties.
Our unconditional purchase obligations also include commitments for power and natural gas supply as
well as feedstock supply for numerous HyCO (hydrogen, carbon monoxide, and syngas) facilities. Our
long-term sales contracts to customers are generally matched to the term of these obligations and
provide recovery of price increases. As a result, we do not believe these purchase obligations would
have a material eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition or results of operations.
102
Table of Contents
19. CAPIT AL STOCK
Common Stock
Authorized common stock consists of 300 million shares with a par value of $1 per share. As of 30
September 2023, 249 million shares were issued, with 222 million issued and outstanding.
On 15 September 2011, the Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to $1.0 billion of our
outstanding common stock. This program does not have a stated expiration date. If we repurchase
shares pursuant to this authorization, we may do so under Rules 10b5-1 and 10b-18 under the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, through repurchase agreements established with one or more
brokers. We did not purchase any of our outstanding shares during ﬁscal year 2023. At 30 September
2023, $485.3 in share repurchase authorization remained available.
A summary of the changes in common shares issued and outstanding in ﬁscal year 2023 is presented
below:
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 2021
Number of common shares, beginning of year 221,838,696 221,396,755 221,017,459 
Issuance of treasury shares for stock option and award
plans 361,149  441,941  379,296 
Number of common shares, end of year 222,199,845 221,838,696 221,396,755 
Preferred Stock
Authorized preferred stock consisted of 25 million shares with a par value of $1 per share. There were no
preferred shares issued or outstanding as of 30 September 2023 and 2022.
20. SHARE-BASED COMPENSA TION
Our outstanding share-based compensation programs include deferred stock units and stock options.
During the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2023, we granted market-based and time-based deferred
stock units. We have not issued stock option awards since ﬁscal year 2015. Under all programs, the
terms of the awards are ﬁxed at the grant date. We issue shares from treasury stock upon the payout of
deferred stock units and the exercise of stock options. As of 30 September 2023, there were 1.3 million
shares available for future grant under our Long-Term Incentive Plan ("LTIP"), which is shareholder
approved.
Share-based compensation cost recognized on the consolidated income statements is summarized
below:
2023 2022 2021
Before-tax share-based compensation cost $60.7  $49.5  $44.5 
Income tax beneﬁt (14.6) (12.1) (11.0)
After-tax share-based compensation cost $46.1  $37.4  $33.5 
Before-tax share-based compensation cost is primarily included in "Selling and administrative expense"
on our consolidated income statements. The amount of share-based compensation cost capitalized in
ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021 was not material.
Deferred Stock Units
We have granted deferred stock units to executives, selected employees, and outside directors. These
deferred stock units entitle the recipient to one share of common stock upon vesting, which is
conditioned, for employee recipients, on continued employment during the deferral period and may be
conditioned on achieving certain performance targets. We grant deferred stock unit awards with a two-
to ﬁve-year deferral period that are subject to payout upon death, disability, or retirement. Deferred
stock units issued to outside directors are paid after service on the Board of Directors ends at the time
elected by the director (not to exceed ten years after service ends). We generally expense the grant-
date fair value of these awards on a straight-line basis over the vesting period; however, expense
recognition is accelerated for retirement eligible individuals who meet the requirements for vesting upon
retirement. We have elected to account for forfeitures as they occur, rather than to estimate them.
Forfeitures have not been signiﬁcant historically.
103
Table of Contents
Market-based deferred stock units vest as long as the employee continues to be employed by the
Company and upon the achievement of the performance target. The performance target, which is
approved by the Compensation Committee, is our share price appreciation and dividends paid, or "total
shareholder return," in relation to the S&P 500 Index (for ﬁscal year 2022 and 2023 awards) or a deﬁned
peer group (for awards granted prior to ﬁscal year 2022) over a three-year performance period
beginning 1 October of the ﬁscal year of grant. We granted 85,612, 74,364, and 77,251 market-based
deferred stock units in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively.
The fair value of market-based deferred stock units was estimated using a Monte Carlo simulation model
as these equity awards are tied to a market condition. The model utilizes multiple input variables that
determine the probability of satisfying the market condition stipulated in the grant and calculates the
fair value of the awards. We generally expense the grant-date fair value of these awards on a straight-
line basis over the vesting period. The estimated grant-date fair value of market-based deferred stock
units was $502.03, $427.23, and $235.48 per unit in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. The
calculation of the fair value of market-based deferred stock units used the following assumptions:
2023 2022 2021
Expected volatility 32.5 % 30.5 % 29.9 %
Risk-free interest rate 4.0 % 0.8 % 0.2 %
Expected dividend yield 2.4 % 2.1 % 2.1 %
In addition, in ﬁscal year 2023, we granted 119,954 time-based deferred stock units at a weighted
average grant-date fair value of $308.91. In ﬁscal years 2022 and 2021, we granted 120,996 and
110,555 time-based deferred stock units at a weighted average grant-date fair value of $278.67 and
$282.48, respectively.
A summary of deferred stock unit activity in ﬁscal year 2023 is presented below:
Shares (000)Weighted Average
Grant-
Date Fair Value
Deferred stock units outstanding at 30 September 2022 730  $222.13 
Granted 206  389.34 
Paid out (159) 164.08 
Forfeited (87) 248.26 
Adjusted 10  315.33 
Deferred stock units outstanding at 30 September 2023 700  $282.60 
Cash payments made for deferred stock units totaled $3.6, $5.5, and $5.2 in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022,
and 2021, respectively. As of 30 September 2023, there was $75.3 of unrecognized compensation cost
related to deferred stock units. This cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted average period of
1.6 years. The total fair value of deferred stock units paid out during ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021,
including shares vested in prior periods, was $45.3, $92.9, and $88.0, respectively.
Stock Options
We have granted awards of options to purchase common stock to executives and selected employees.
The exercise price of stock options equals the market price of our stock on the date of the grant. As of 30
September 2023, there was no unrecognized compensation cost as all stock option awards were fully
vested.
A summary of stock option activity in ﬁscal year 2023 is presented below:
Shares (000)Weighted Average
Exercise Price
Stock options outstanding and exercisable at 30 September 2022 564  $106.13 
Exercised (270) 90.57 
Stock options outstanding and exercisable at 30
September 2023 294  $120.42 
The weighted average remaining contractual term of stock options outstanding and exercisable at 30
September 2023 was 0.7 years. The aggregate intrinsic value of these stock options was $47.9, which
represents the amount by which our closing stock price of $283.40 per share as of 30 September 2023
exceeds the exercise price multiplied by the number of in-the-money options outstanding or exercisable.
The intrinsic value of stock options exercised during ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021 was $53.5, $20.2,
and $29.0, respectively.
104
Table of Contents
Compensation cost is generally recognized over the stated vesting period consistent with the terms of
the arrangement, which is either on a straight-line or graded-vesting basis. Expense recognition is
accelerated for retirement-eligible individuals who would meet the requirements for vesting of awards
upon their retirement.
Cash received from option exercises during ﬁscal year 2023 was $24.0. The total tax beneﬁt realized
from stock option exercises in ﬁscal year 2023 was $12.5, of which $11.7 was the excess tax beneﬁt.
21. ACCUMULA TED OTHER COMPREHENSIVE L OSS
The table below summarizes changes in accumulated other comprehensive loss ("AOCL"), net of tax,
attributable to Air Products:
Derivatives
qualifying
as hedgesForeign
currency
translation
adjustmentsPension and
postretirement
beneﬁts Total
Balance at 30 September 2020 ($54.5)($1,142.8) ($942.8)($2,140.1)
Other comprehensive income before
reclassiﬁcations 3.3  267.3  274.3  544.9 
Amounts reclassiﬁed from AOCL 43.5  —  74.6  118.1 
Net current period other comprehensive income $46.8  $267.3  $348.9  $663.0 
Amount attributable to noncontrolling interests 20.6  18.3  (0.1) 38.8 
Balance at 30 September 2021 ($28.3)($893.8) ($593.8)($1,515.9)
Other comprehensive loss before reclassiﬁcations (120.3) (1,230.5) (112.2)(1,463.0)
Amounts reclassiﬁed from AOCL 91.4  7.3  64.8  163.5 
Net current period other comprehensive loss ($28.9)($1,223.2) ($47.4)($1,299.5)
Amount attributable to noncontrolling interest 14.7  (44.6) 0.6  (29.3)
Balance at 30 September 2022 ($71.9)($2,072.4) ($641.8)($2,786.1)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before
reclassiﬁcations 369.2  151.1  (8.9) 511.4 
Amounts reclassiﬁed from AOCL (43.9) (0.3) 53.8  9.6 
Net current period other comprehensive income $325.3  $150.8  $44.9  $521.0 
Amount attributable to noncontrolling interest 192.3  (8.3) 0.3  184.3 
Balance at 30 September 2023 $61.1 ($1,913.3) ($597.2)($2,449.4)
The table below summarizes the reclassiﬁcations out of AOCL and the aﬀected line item on the
consolidated income statements:
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 2021
(Gain) Loss on Cash Flow Hedges, net of tax
Sales ($0.5) $0.5  ($0.6)
Cost of sales 3.7  (0.4) (0.3)
Interest expense 3.5  3.6  3.5 
Other non-operating income (expense), net (50.6) 87.7  40.9 
Total (Gain) Loss on Cash Flow Hedges, net of tax ($43.9) $91.4  $43.5 
Currency Translation Adjustment
Business and asset actions ($0.3) $5.1  $— 
  Income from discontinued operations, net of tax —  2.2  — 
Currency Translation Adjustment ($0.3) $7.3  $— 
Pension and Postretirement Beneﬁts, net of tax $53.8  $64.8  $74.6 
The components of net periodic beneﬁt cost r eclassiﬁed out of A OCL include items such as prior service cost
amortization, actuarial loss amortization, settlements, and curtailments and ar e included in “ Other non- operating
income (e xpense), net” on the consolidated income statements. R efer to Note 17, Retirement Beneﬁts , for
additional infor mation.(A)
(A)
105
Table of Contents
22. EARNINGS PER SHARE
The table below details the computation of basic and diluted earnings per share ("EPS"):
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 2021
Numerator
Net income from continuing operations $2,292.8  $2,243.5  $2,028.8 
Net income from discontinued operations 7.4  12.6  70.3 
Net Income attributable to Air Products $2,300.2  $2,256.1  $2,099.1 
Denominator (in millions)
Weighted average common shares — Basic 222.3  222.0  221.6 
Eﬀect of dilutive securities
Employee stock option and other award plans 0.4  0.5  0.9 
Weighted average common shares — Diluted 222.7  222.5  222.5 
Per Share Data (U.S. Dollars per share)
Basic EPS from continuing operations $10.31  $10.11  $9.16 
Basic EPS from discontinued operations 0.03  0.06  0.32 
Basic EPS attributable to Air Products $10.35  $10.16  $9.47 
Diluted EPS from continuing operations $10.30  $10.08  $9.12 
Diluted EPS from discontinued operations 0.03  0.06  0.32 
Diluted EPS attributable to Air Products $10.33  $10.14  $9.43 
EPS is calculated independently for each component and may not sum to total EPS due to r ounding.
Diluted EPS attributable to Air Products reﬂects the potential dilution that could occur if stock options or
other share-based awards were exercised or converted into common stock. The dilutive eﬀect is
computed using the treasury stock method, which assumes all share-based awards are exercised, and
the hypothetical proceeds from exercise are used by the Company to purchase common stock at the
average market price during the period. To the extent they would have been dilutive, the incremental
shares, or the diﬀerence between shares assumed to be issued versus purchased, are included in the
denominator of the diluted EPS calculation. Antidilutive outstanding share-based awards were not
material in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022 and 2021.(A)
(A)
106
Table of Contents
23. INCOME T AXES
The table below summarizes income from U.S. and foreign operations before taxes:
2023 2022 2021
United States income $1,050.5  $947.9  $924.6 
Foreign income 1,227.6  1,325.3  1,288.7 
Equity aﬃliates' income 604.3  481.5  294.1 
Income from continuing operations before
taxes $2,882.4  $2,754.7  $2,507.4 
The table below details the components of our income tax provision:
2023 2022 2021
Current Tax Provision
Federal $167.6  $149.1  $85.6 
State 41.0  30.1  28.4 
Foreign 367.3  289.3  254.8 
Total current tax provision 575.9  468.5  368.8 
Deferred Tax (Beneﬁt) Provision
Federal (12.5) 15.6  54.7 
State (5.8) (1.9) (0.1)
Foreign (6.4) 18.6  39.4 
Total Deferred Tax (Beneﬁt) Provision (24.7) 32.3  94.0 
Total Income Tax Provision $551.2  $500.8  $462.8 
Cash Paid for Taxes (Net of Cash Refunds)
Income tax payments, net of refunds, were $645.2, $369.2, and $383.8 in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and
2021, respectively. Fiscal year 2023, 2022, and 2021 reﬂect income tax refunds associated with
discontinued operations of $0.6, $59.6, and $6.7, respectively.
U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act
On 22 December 2017, the United States enacted the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the “Tax Act” or "Tax
Reform"), which signiﬁcantly changed existing U.S. tax laws, including a reduction in the federal
corporate income tax rate to 21%, a deemed repatriation tax on unremitted foreign earnings, as well as
other changes. As of 30 September 2023, our outstanding liability for the deemed repatriation tax was
$131.1, of which $109.4 is presented within noncurrent liabilities on our consolidated balance sheets. We
are paying this obligation in installments over three remaining years.
Inﬂation Reduction Act and CHIPS and Science Act of 2022
In August 2022, the U.S. Inﬂation Reduction Act of 2022 and the CHIPS and Science Act of 2022 were
signed into law. These acts include, among other provisions, a corporate alternative minimum tax of
15%, an excise tax on the repurchase of corporate stock, various climate and energy provisions, and
incentives for investment in semiconductor manufacturing. We expect to realize beneﬁts for carbon
sequestration and clean hydrogen production once our new projects in these areas come on-stream in
the U.S.
107
Table of Contents
Eﬀective Tax Rate
The eﬀective tax rate equals the income tax provision divided by income from continuing operations
before taxes. A reconciliation of the diﬀerences between the United States federal statutory tax rate and
the eﬀective tax rate is provided below:
(Percent of income before taxes) 2023 2022 2021
U.S. federal statutory tax rate 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 %
State taxes, net of federal beneﬁt 1.0  0.8  0.9 
Income from equity aﬃliates (3.8) (3.4) (2.5)
Foreign tax diﬀerentials 0.7  0.7  0.5 
Tax on foreign repatriated earnings 0.5  0.7  0.7 
Share-based compensation (0.3) (0.7) (0.7)
Business and asset actions 0.7  0.1  — 
Other (0.7) (1.0) (1.4)
Eﬀective Tax Rate 19.1 % 18.2 % 18.5 %
Equity aﬃliates’ income, which is primarily presented net of income taxes on our consolidated income
statements, favorably impacts our eﬀective tax rate. This impact increased over the years presented
primarily due to our phased investment in the JIGPC joint venture. See Note 9, Equity Aﬃliates, for
additional information.
Foreign tax diﬀerentials represent the diﬀerences between foreign earnings subject to foreign tax rates
that are diﬀerent than the U.S. federal statutory rate and include tax holidays and incentives. Our
income tax holidays relate to operations in jurisdictions that provide reduced income tax rates for certain
qualifying activities and are conditioned upon us satisfying certain requirements.
Tax on foreign repatriated earnings includes costs related to U.S. taxation of foreign operations, foreign
taxation on the current and future repatriation of foreign earnings, and a U.S. beneﬁt for related foreign
tax credits.
Share-based compensation reﬂects the impact from recognition of $10.2, $18.3, and $17.0 of excess tax
beneﬁts in our provision for income taxes during ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively.
During ﬁscal year 2023, we recorded a charge to net income for business and asset actions of $244.6
($204.9 attributable to Air Products after tax). Refer to Note 4, Business and Asset Actions, for additional
information. The charge included certain losses for which we could not recognize an income tax beneﬁt
and were subject to a valuation allowance of $36.0. Partially oﬀsetting the valuation allowance cost was
a $15.9 income tax beneﬁt from a tax election related to a non-U.S. subsidiary.
In ﬁscal year 2021, Other includes net tax beneﬁts of $21.5, including interest, resulting from the release
of U.S. unrecognized tax beneﬁts upon expiration of the statute of limitations on uncertain tax positions
taken in prior years.
108
Table of Contents
Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities
The signiﬁcant components of deferred tax assets and liabilities are as follows:
30 September 2023 2022
Gross Deferred Tax Assets
Retirement beneﬁts and compensation accruals $75.2  $77.2 
Tax loss carryforwards 141.8  126.3 
Tax credits and other tax carryforwards 46.2  39.2 
Reserves and accruals 65.2  55.4 
Other 81.3  68.3 
Valuation allowance (153.3) (100.1)
Deferred Tax Assets 256.4  266.3 
Gross Deferred Tax Liabilities
Plant and equipment 1,192.0  1,187.6 
Currency gains 20.6  22.5 
Unremitted earnings of foreign entities 72.0  72.9 
Partnership and other investments 18.6  16.1 
Intangible assets 48.5  69.8 
Other 11.1  9.1 
Deferred Tax Liabilities 1,362.8  1,378.0 
Net Deferred Income Tax Liability $1,106.4  $1,111.7 
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are included within the consolidated balance sheets as follows:
2023 2022
Deferred Tax Assets
Other noncurrent assets $159.6  $135.7 
Deferred Tax Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 1,266.0  1,247.4 
Net Deferred Income Tax Liability $1,106.4  $1,111.7 
Deferred tax liabilities related to "Intangible assets" decreased primarily due to the impact of capitalizing
research and development expenditures for U.S tax purposes. Deferred tax liabilities related to "Plant
and equipment" increased due to the impact of accelerated tax depreciation deductions in excess of
book depreciation, primarily in the United States. The increase was partially oﬀset with book charges in
excess of tax related to our business and asset actions that included certain costs for which we could not
recognize an income tax beneﬁt and were subject to a valuation allowance.
Deferred tax assets for "Tax loss carryforwards" increased primarily due to losses in certain Chinese
subsidiaries. A portion of these losses were subject to a valuation allowance for which we could not
recognize an income tax beneﬁt. The deferred tax components for "Reserves and accruals" and "Other"
were impacted by changes in tax deferred deductions and the timing of revenue recognition for local tax
and accounting purposes.
As of 30 September 2023, we had the following deferred tax assets for certain tax credits:
Jurisdiction Gross Tax Asset Expiration Period
U.S. State $2.0  2024 - 2036
U.S. Federal 20.9  2030 - 2033
Credits in Foreign Jurisdictions 17.7 2030 - 2041; Indeﬁnite
Of the $17.7 credits in foreign jurisdictions, $16.0 have indeﬁnite carryforward periods.
109
Table of Contents
As of 30 September 2023, we had the following loss carryforwards:
JurisdictionGross Loss
Carryforward Expiration Period
U.S. State Net Operating Loss $237.1  2024 - 2040
U.S. State Capital Loss 35.2  2025 - 2027
U.S. Federal Capital Loss 86.3  2025 - 2027
Foreign Net Operating Loss 325.9 2024 - 2038; Indeﬁnite
Foreign Capital Loss 197.8  Indeﬁnite
Of the $325.9 of foreign net operating loss carryforwards, $128.9 have indeﬁnite carryforward periods.
The valuation allowance was $153.3 and $100.1 as of 30 September 2023 and 2022, respectively. As of
30 September 2023, the balance primarily related to $33.6 of foreign credits and loss carryforwards,
$18.7 of U.S. federal foreign income tax credits, $49.4 related to foreign capital losses, and $34.7 related
to other charges from our Business and Asset Actions. If events warrant the reversal of the valuation
allowance, it would result in a reduction of tax expense. We believe it is more likely than not that future
earnings and reversal of deferred tax liabilities will be suﬃcient to utilize our deferred tax assets, net of
existing valuation allowance, as of 30 September 2023.
Our U.S. federal and U.S. state capital losses primarily related to a loss realized upon the divestiture of
our Russian subsidiary in ﬁscal year 2022. We believe it is more likely than not that we will recognize
suﬃcient U.S. capital gain income in the future to utilize our capital losses before expiration.
We record income taxes on the undistributed earnings of our foreign subsidiaries and corporate joint
ventures unless those earnings are indeﬁnitely reinvested. Such earnings may be subject to foreign
withholding and other taxes. The cumulative undistributed earnings that are considered to be
indeﬁnitely reinvested in foreign subsidiaries and corporate joint ventures are included in retained
earnings on the consolidated balance sheets and amounted to $8.0 billion as of 30 September 2023. An
estimated $749.0 in additional foreign withholding and other income taxes would be due if these
earnings were remitted as dividends.
Unrecognized Tax Beneﬁts
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending amount of the unrecognized tax beneﬁts, which excludes
interest and penalties, is as follows:
2023 2022 2021
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts balance at beginning of
year $103.5  $140.3  $237.0 
Additions for tax positions of the current year 10.9  7.4  14.5 
Additions for tax positions of prior years 1.2  6.6  3.5 
Reductions for tax positions of prior years (6.0) (15.4) (8.2)
Settlements (3.9) (0.6) (3.1)
Statute of limitations expiration (10.6) (25.5) (104.6)
Foreign currency translation 1.4  (9.3) 1.2 
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts balance at end of
year $96.5  $103.5  $140.3 
Of our unrecognized tax beneﬁts as of 30 September 2023, $73.8 would impact the eﬀective tax rate
from continuing operations if recognized.
In ﬁscal year 2022, reserves for unrecognized tax beneﬁts decreased $25.5 due to statute of limitation
expirations. We released reserves of $17.2 related to the sale of PMD. Upon release of the reserves, we
recorded income tax beneﬁts of $14.8 as a component of discontinued operations. The PMD reserve was
net of related deferred tax assets of $2.4. In ﬁscal year 2023 we released an additional $5.2 of reserves
related to the sale of PMD. Fiscal year 2022 also reﬂects a $15.4 reduction for tax positions of prior
years. This was primarily due to a $10.6 reduction caused by changes to income tax rates.
110
Table of Contents
In ﬁscal year 2021, reserves for unrecognized tax beneﬁts decreased $104.6 due to statute of limitation
expirations. We released reserves of $65.6 related to the sale of PMD, $8.2 associated with our former
Energy-from-Waste business (“EfW”), and $27.5 for other reserves, including those associated with a tax
election beneﬁt related to a non-U.S. subsidiary in 2017. Upon release of the reserves related to PMD
and EfW, we recorded income tax beneﬁts of $51.8 and $8.2, respectively, as a component of
discontinued operations. The PMD reserve was net of related deferred tax assets of $13.8. The release of
other reserves of $27.5 was net of related deferred tax assets of $8.4 and resulted in an income tax
beneﬁt, including interest, of $21.5.
Interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax beneﬁts are recorded as a component of income tax
expense and totaled $5.0, $1.2, and ($0.2) in ﬁscal years 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. Our 2021
expense reﬂects a beneﬁt from the reversal of accrued interest on reserves released during the period.
Our accrued balance for interest and penalties was $26.3 and $22.6 as of 30 September 2023 and 2022,
respectively.
Income Tax Examinations
We are currently under examination in a number of tax jurisdictions. It is reasonably possible that a
change in our unrecognized tax beneﬁts may occur in ﬁscal year 2024 if any of these examinations are
resolved during the next twelve months. However, quantiﬁcation of an estimated range cannot be made
as of the date of this report.
We generally remain subject to examination in the following major tax jurisdictions for the years
indicated below:
Major Tax Jurisdiction Open Tax Years
North America
United States – Federal 2018 - 2023
United States – State 2013 - 2023
Canada 2016 - 2023
Europe
France 2020 - 2023
Netherlands 2018 - 2023
Spain 2017 - 2023
United Kingdom 2020 - 2023
Middle East
Saudi Arabia 2018 - 2023
Asia
China 2011 - 2023
South Korea 2015 - 2023
Taiwan 2018 - 2023
Latin America
Chile 2019 - 2023
111
Table of Contents
24. SUPPLEMENT AL INFORMA TION
Related Party Transactions
We have related party sales to some of our equity aﬃliates and joint venture partners as well as other
income primarily from fees charged for use of Air Products' patents and technology. Sales to and other
income from related parties totaled approximately $380, $300, and $225 for the ﬁscal years ended 30
September 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. Sales agreements with related parties include terms that
are consistent with those that we believe would have been negotiated at an arm’s length with an
independent party. As of 30 September 2023 and 2022, our consolidated balance sheets included
related party trade receivables of approximately $80 and $55, respectively.
Refer to Note 16, Debt, for information concerning debt owed to related parties.
Facility Closure
During the second quarter of ﬁscal year 2021, we recorded a charge of $23.2 primarily for a noncash
write-down of assets associated with a contract termination in the Americas segment. This charge is
reﬂected as "Facility closure" on our consolidated income statements for the ﬁscal year ended 30
September 2021 and was not recorded in the results of the Americas segment.
Supplemental Balance Sheet Information
Other Receivables and Current Assets
30 September 2023 2022
Derivative instruments $73.5 $114.4 
Value added tax receivable 209.6  94.2 
Contract fulﬁllment costs 89.0  84.1 
Contract assets 124.7  69.0 
Current lease receivables 78.0  77.8 
Current ﬁnancing receivables 50.0  — 
Other 97.3  76.3 
Other receivables and current assets $722.1 $515.8 
Other Noncurrent Assets
30 September 2023 2022
Pension beneﬁts $120.0 $133.9 
Long-term deposits on plant and equipment — 200.0 
Deferred tax assets 159.6 135.7 
Prepaid tax 22.2  17.0 
Investments other than equity method 66.9  66.7 
Deferred ﬁnancing fees 58.8  — 
Derivative instruments 320.6  74.7 
Other 481.8 319.0 
Other noncurrent assets $1,229.9 $947.0 
112
Table of Contents
Payables and Accrued Liabilities
30 September 2023 2022
Trade creditors $1,212.9 $1,120.7 
Contract liabilities 413.0 439.1 
Dividends payable 388.9 359.4 
Accrued payroll and employee beneﬁts 284.4 249.1 
Accrued interest 106.4  64.7 
Current lease obligations 94.7  90.0 
Derivative instruments 98.7 228.3 
Pension and postretirement beneﬁts 9.6  11.1 
Other 281.5 209.2 
Payables and accrued liabilities $2,890.1 $2,771.6 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities
30 September 2023 2022
Asset retirement obligations $285.1 $265.0 
Pension beneﬁts 192.3 190.0 
Postretirement beneﬁts 10.3  15.0 
Derivative instruments 112.7 138.2 
Long-term accrued income taxes related to U.S. tax reform 109.4 134.6 
Contingencies related to uncertain tax positions 89.6  95.6 
Contract liabilities 136.9  67.2 
Environmental liabilities 50.2  61.8 
Other 131.5 131.7 
Other noncurrent liabilities $1,118.0 $1,099.1 
113
Table of Contents
25. BUSINES S SEGMENT AND GEOGRAPHIC INFORMA TION
During the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2023, we managed our operations, assessed performance,
and reported earnings under the following reportable segments:
•Americas;
•Asia;
•Europe;
•Middle East and India; and
•Corporate and other
Our reportable segments reﬂect the manner in which our chief operating decision maker reviews results
and allocates resources. We evaluate the performance of our segments based upon segment operating
income. Except for the Corporate and other segment, each reportable segment meets the deﬁnition of
an operating segment and does not include the aggregation of multiple operating segments. Our
Corporate and other segment includes the aggregation of three operating segments that meet the
aggregation criteria under GAAP.
Industrial Gases – Regional
The results of our regional industrial gas businesses are reﬂected in the Americas, Asia, Europe, and
Middle East and India segments. These businesses produce and sell gases to diversiﬁed customers in
dozens of industries, including those in reﬁning, chemicals, metals, electronics, manufacturing, medical,
and food. Our industrial gas portfolio includes atmospheric gases such as oxygen, nitrogen, and argon;
process gases such as hydrogen, helium, carbon dioxide, carbon monoxide, and syngas (a mixture of
hydrogen and carbon monoxide), and specialty gases. We oﬀer our industrial gas products through a
variety of supply modes as described in Note 6, Revenue Recognition.
The industrial gases business develops, builds, and operates equipment for the production or processing
of gases. Electricity is the largest cost component in the production of atmospheric gases. To produce
hydrogen, carbon monoxide, and syngas, steam methane reformers use natural gas as the primary raw
material, while gasiﬁers use liquid and solid hydrocarbons as the primary raw material. We mitigate
electricity, natural gas, and hydrocarbon price ﬂuctuations contractually through pricing formulas,
surcharges, cost pass-through provisions, and tolling arrangements.
Our regional industrial gas segments include our share of the results of several joint ventures accounted
for under the equity method. The largest of these joint ventures operate in China, India, Italy, Mexico,
Saudi Arabia, South Africa, and Thailand.
Each of the regional industrial gases segments competes against global industrial gas companies as well
as regional competitors. Competition in industrial gases is based primarily on price, reliability of supply,
and the development of industrial gas applications. We derive a competitive advantage in locations
where we have pipeline networks, which enable us to provide reliable and economic supply of products
to our larger customers.
Corporate and other
The Corporate and other segment includes sales of cryogenic and gas processing equipment for air
separation that is sold worldwide to customers in a variety of industries, including chemical and
petrochemical manufacturing, oil and gas recovery and processing, and steel and primary metals
processing. Our Corporate and other segment also includes the results of our liqueﬁed natural gas
("LNG"), turbo machinery equipment and services, and distribution sale of equipment businesses.
Competition for our sale of equipment businesses is based primarily on technological performance,
service, technical know-how, price, and performance guarantees.
Our Corporate and other segment also incurs costs to provide corporate support functions and global
management activities that beneﬁt all segments. These costs include those for product development,
research and development, and administrative support. The results of our Corporate and other segment
also include income and expense not directly associated with the regional segments, such as foreign
exchange gains and losses.
In addition to assets of the global businesses included in this segment, other assets include cash and
cash items, short-term investments, deferred tax assets, and ﬁnancial instruments.
Customers
We do not have a homogeneous customer base or end market, and no single customer accounts for
more than 10% of our consolidated sales.
114
Table of Contents
Business Segment Information
Americas Asia EuropeMiddle East
and IndiaCorporate
and other Total
2023
Sales $5,369.3 $3,216.1 $2,963.1  $162.5 $889.0 $12,600.0 
Operating income (loss) 1,439.7  906.5  663.4  16.9 (287.3)2,739.2 
Depreciation and amortization 649.3  433.5  196.2  27.5  51.8 1,358.3 
Equity aﬃliates' income 109.2  29.7  102.5  349.8  13.1  604.3 
Expenditures for long-lived
assets2,033.7  663.4  482.4 1,312.7  134.2 4,626.4 
Investments in net assets of
and advances to equity
aﬃliates476.9  285.2  504.9 3,265.2  85.6 4,617.8 
Total assets 9,927.5 7,009.6 4,649.8 5,708.4 4,707.2 32,002.5 
2022
Sales $5,368.9 $3,143.3 $3,086.1  $129.5 $970.8 $12,698.6 
Operating income (loss) 1,174.4  898.3  503.4  21.1 (184.7)2,412.5 
Depreciation and amortization 629.5  436.5  195.2  26.9  50.1 1,338.2 
Equity aﬃliates' income 98.2  22.1  78.2  293.9  3.9  496.3 
Expenditures for long-lived
assets1,353.1  779.2  312.6  271.6  210.0 2,926.5 
Investments in net assets of
and advances to equity
aﬃliates434.4  268.9  435.0 2,143.3  72.2 3,353.8 
Total assets 8,237.7 6,968.7 3,645.1 2,980.7 5,360.4 27,192.6 
2021
Sales $4,167.6 $2,920.8 $2,345.6  $99.3 $789.7 $10,323.0 
Operating income (loss) 1,065.5  838.3  529.4  28.0 (193.4)2,267.8 
Depreciation and amortization 611.9  444.4  204.5  25.3  35.2 1,321.3 
Equity aﬃliates' income 112.5  35.9  62.8  76.4  6.5  294.1 
Expenditures for long-lived
assets909.6  792.3  300.3  71.0  391.0 2,464.2 
Sales relate to external customers only. All intersegment sales are eliminated in consolidation.
Refer to the Reconciliations to Consolidated Results section below.
Reconciliations to Consolidated Results
Operating Income
The table below reconciles total operating income disclosed in the table above to consolidated operating
income as reﬂected on our consolidated income statements:
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 2021
Total $2,739.2 $2,412.5 $2,267.8 
Facility closure —  —  (23.2)
Business and asset actions (244.6) (73.7) — 
Gain on exchange with joint venture partner —  —  36.8 
Consolidated Operating Income $2,494.6 $2,338.8 $2,281.4 
Equity Aﬃliates' Income
The table below reconciles total equity aﬃliates' income disclosed in the table above to consolidated
equity aﬃliates' income as reﬂected on our consolidated income statements:
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 2021
Total $604.3 $496.3 $294.1 
Equity method investment impairment charge —  (14.8) — 
Consolidated Equity Aﬃliates' Income $604.3 $481.5 $294.1 (A)
(B)
(B)
(A)
(B)
(B)
(A)
(B)
(B)
(A)
(B)
115
Table of Contents
Geographic Information
The geographic information presented below is based on country of origin.
Sales to External Customers
Fiscal Year Ended 30 September 2023 2022 2021
United States $5,234.2 $5,230.2 $3,895.8 
China 1,988.1 1,989.8 1,828.0 
Other foreign operations 5,377.7 5,478.6 4,599.2 
Total $12,600.0 $12,698.6 $10,323.0 
Long-Lived Assets
30 September 2023 2022 2021
United States $7,431.0 $6,022.0 $5,187.8 
China 3,744.7 3,886.0 4,137.7 
Saudi Arabia 1,818.1  595.7  29.0 
Other foreign operations 4,478.3 3,656.8 3,900.1 
Total $17,472.1 $14,160.5 $13,254.6 
"Long-lived assets" represents plant and equipment, net.(A)
(A)
116
Table of Contents
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and
Financial Disclosure
Not applicable.
Item 9A . Controls and Procedures
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
We maintain a comprehensive set of disclosure controls and procedures (as deﬁned in Rules 13a-15 (e)
and 15d-15(e) under the Exchange Act). Under the supervision of the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief
Financial Oﬃcer, our management conducted an evaluation of the eﬀectiveness of our disclosure
controls and procedures as of 30 September 2023. Based on that evaluation, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer
and Chief Financial Oﬃcer concluded that, as of 30 September 2023, the disclosure controls and
procedures were eﬀective.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting (as deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act). Management has
evaluated the eﬀectiveness of our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of 30 September 2023
based on criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee
of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission ("COSO"). Based on that evaluation,
management concluded that, as of 30 September 2023, our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting was
eﬀective. Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting is provided under Part II,
Item 8, of this Form 10-K.
There was no change in our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting during the fourth quarter of ﬁscal
year 2023 that has materially aﬀected, or is reasonably likely to materially aﬀect, our internal control
over ﬁnancial reporting.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm, has audited our internal
control over ﬁnancial reporting as of 30 September 2023. The Report of the Independent Registered
Public Accounting Firm is provided under Part II, Item 8, of this Form 10-K.
Item 9B. Other Information
None of the Company’s directors or Section 16 reporting oﬃcers adopted or terminated any Rule 10b5-1
trading arrangement or non-Rule 10b5-1 trading arrangement (as such terms are deﬁned in Item 408 of
Regulation S-K) during the fourth quarter of ﬁscal year 2023.
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding F oreign Jurisdictions That Prevent Inspections
Not applicable.
117
Table of Contents
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Oﬃcers and Corporate Governance
The information required by this item relating to our directors and nominees is incorporated herein by
reference to the section captioned “The Board of Directors” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual
Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 25 January 2024. The information required by this item relating to
our executive oﬃcers is set forth in Part I, Item 1. Business of this Form 10-K.
The information required by this item relating to our Audit and Finance Committee and our Audit and
Finance Committee Financial Expert is incorporated herein by reference to the sections captioned “Board
Structure–Standing Committees of the Board” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of
Shareholders to be held on 25 January 2024.
The information required by this item relating to our procedures regarding the consideration of
candidates recommended by shareholders and a procedure for submission of such candidates is
incorporated herein by reference to the section captioned “The Board of Directors–Selection of Directors”
in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 25 January 2024.
The information required by this item relating to Section 16(a) Beneﬁcial Ownership Reporting
Compliance is incorporated herein by reference to the section captioned “Section 16(a) Beneﬁcial
Ownership Reporting” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 25
January 2024.
We have adopted a Code of Conduct that applies to all employees, including the Chief Executive Oﬃcer,
the Chief Financial Oﬃcer, and the Principal Accounting Oﬃcer. The Code of Conduct can be found at our
website at www.airproducts.com/company/governance/code-of-conduct.
Item 11. Executive Compensation
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections
captioned “Executive Compensation” and “Compensation of Directors” in the Proxy Statement for the
Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 25 January 2024.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneﬁcial Owners and Management
and Related Stockholder Matters
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections captioned
"Information About Stock Ownership" and “Equity Compensation Plan Information” in the Proxy
Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 25 January 2024.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related T ransactions, and Director
Independence
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections captioned “The
Board of Directors–Director Independence” and “Board Practices, Processes and Policies–Transactions
with Related Persons” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 25
January 2024.
Item 14. Principal Accountant F ees and Services
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the section captioned “Fees
of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of
Shareholders to be held on 25 January 2024.
118
Table of Contents
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
(a) The following documents are ﬁled as a part of this report:
(1) Financial Statements.
The following is a list of the Consolidated Financial Statements of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc.
and its subsidiaries included in Part II, Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data:
Report of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 54
Consolidated Income Statements – Fiscal Years Ended 30 September 2023, 2022, and 2021 56
Consolidated Comprehensive Income Statements – Fiscal Years Ended 30 September 2023, 2022,
and 2021 57
Consolidated Balance Sheets – 30 September 2023 and 2022 58
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows – Fiscal Years Ended 30 September 2023, 2022, and 2021 59
Consolidated Statements of Equity – Fiscal Years Ended 30 September 2023, 2022, and 2021 60
(2) Financial Statement Schedules.
Financial statement schedules are omitted as they are either not required or the information is
otherwise included in the consolidated ﬁnancial statements or notes thereto.
(3) Exhibits.
The exhibits ﬁled as a part of this report as required by Item 601 of Regulation S-K are listed in the
Index to Exhibits beginning on page 120.
Item 16. F orm 10-K Summary
None.
119
Table of Contents
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
Exhibit No.Description
(3) Articles of Incorporation and Bylaws.
3.1 Restated Certiﬁcate of Incorporation of the Company. (Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the
Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 30 June 2023.)*
3.2 Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Company. (Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’s
Current Report on Form 8-K dated 17 September 2023.)*
(4) Instruments deﬁning the rights of security holders, including indentures. Upon request
of the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company hereby undertakes to furnish
copies of the instruments with respect to its long-term debt.
4.1 Indenture, dated as of 10 January 1995, between the Company and The Bank of New
York Trust, N.A. (formerly Wachovia Bank, National Association and initially First Fidelity
Bank Company, National Association), as Trustee. (Filed as Exhibit 4(a) to the
Company’s Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled 19 January 1995, File No. 033-
57357.)*
4.2 Indenture, dated as of 30 April 2020, between the Company and The Bank of New York
Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee. (Filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report
on Form 8-K ﬁled 30 April 2020.)*
4.3 Description of Securities.
(10) Material Contracts.
10.1 Amended and Restated Long-Term Incentive Plan of the Company eﬀective 1 October
2014. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
23 September 2014.)*†
10.2 Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. 2021 Long-Term Incentive Plan. (Filed as Exhibit 4.5 to
the Company’s Registration Statement on Form S-8 (File No. 333-252722) ﬁled on 4
February 2021.)*†
10.2(a) Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the Long-Term Incentive Plan of
the Company, used for FY2021 awards. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2020.)*†
10.2(b) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the Long-Term Incentive Plan of the
Company, used for FY2021 awards. (Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Company's Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2020.)*†
10.2(c) Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the Long-Term Incentive Plan of
the Company, used for FY2022 awards. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2021.)*†
10.2(d) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the Long-Term Incentive Plan of the
Company, used for FY2022 awards. (Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Company's Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2021.)*†
10.2(e) Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the Long-Term Incentive Plan of
the Company, used for FY2023 Awards. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2022.)*†
10.2(f) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the Long-Term Incentive Plan of the
Company, used for FY2023 Awards. (Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2022.)*†
10.3 Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Retirement Savings Plan as amended and restated
eﬀective 1 January 2022. (Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Company's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2021.)*†
10.3(a) Amendment No. 1 to the Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Retirement Savings Plan as
amended and restated eﬀective 1 January 2022. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 30 June 2022.)*†
10.4 Supplementary Pension Plan of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. as Amended and
Restated eﬀective 1 August 2014. (Filed as Exhibit 10.10 to the Company’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the ﬁscal year ended 30 September 2014.)*†
120
Table of Contents
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
Exhibit No.Description
10.4(a) Amendment No. 1 dated as of 30 September 2015 to the Supplementary Pension Plan of
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. as Amended and Restated eﬀective 1 August 2014.
(Filed as Exhibit 10.10(a) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the ﬁscal
year ended 30 September 2015.)*†
10.4(b) Amendment No. 2 dated as of 30 September 2016 to the Supplementary Pension Plan of
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. as Amended and Restated eﬀective 1 August 2014.
(Filed as Exhibit 10.7(b) to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for ﬁscal year
ended 30 September 2016.)*†
10.4(c) Amendment No. 3 dated as of 26 July 2017 to the Supplementary Pension Plan of Air
Products and Chemicals, Inc. as Amended and Restated eﬀective 1 August 2017.(Filed
as Exhibit 10.7(c) to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the ﬁscal year
ended 30 September 2017.)*†
10.5 Deferred Compensation Plan as Amended and Restated eﬀective 1 January 2018. (Filed
as Exhibit 10.5 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
31 December 2017.)*†
10.6 Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Executive Separation Program as amended eﬀective as
of 1 October 2022. (Filed as Exhibit 10.6 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended 30 September 2022.)*†
10.7 Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Senior Management Severance Plan and Summary Plan
Description eﬀective 1 August 2022. (Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Company's Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 30 June 2022.)*†
10.8 Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement for an Executive Oﬃcer. (ﬁled as
Exhibit 10.2 of the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K dated 23 September 2014.)*†
10.9 Amended and Restated Employment Agreement, dated 17 May 2023, between Air
Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Seifollah Ghasemi (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K, ﬁled on 18 May 2023.)*†
10.10 Compensation Programs for Nonemployee Directors eﬀective 22 November 2022. (Filed
as Exhibit 10.10 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended 30
September 2022.)*†
10.11 Deferred Compensation Program for Directors, eﬀective 7 October 2019. (Filed as
Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for quarter ended 31
December 2019.)*†
10.12 Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of 31 March 2021 for $2,500,000,000. (Filed as
Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
31 March 2021.)*
10.12(a) Amendment to the Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of 29 September 2021. (Filed
as Exhibit 10.13(a) to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the ﬁscal year
ended 30 September 2021.)*
10.12(b) Amendment No. 2 to the Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of 31 March 2022. (Filed
as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
31 March 2022.)*
(21) Subsidiaries of the Registrant.
21.1 Subsidiaries of the Registrant.
(23) Consents of Experts and Counsel.
23.1 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
(24) Power of Attorney.
24.1 Power of Attorney.
(31) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certiﬁcations.
31.1 Certiﬁcation by the Principal Executive Oﬃcer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) or Rule 15d-
14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
121
Table of Contents
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
Exhibit No.Description
31.2 Certiﬁcation by the Principal Financial Oﬃcer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) or Rule 15d-
14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
(32) Section 1350 Certiﬁcations.
32.1 Certiﬁcation by the Principal Executive Oﬃcer and Principal Financial Oﬃcer pursuant to
18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act
of 2002.††
(97) Policy Relating to Recovery of Erroneously Awarded Compensation.
97.1 Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Compensation Recoupment Policy and Supplemental
Executive Oﬃcer Recoupment Policy, eﬀective as of 1 October 2023.
(101) Interactive Data Files.
101.INS Inline XBRL Instance Document. The XBRL Instance Document does not appear in the
Interactive Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL
document.
101.SCH Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document.
101.CAL Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document.
101.LAB Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document.
101.PRE Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document.
101.DEF Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Deﬁnition Linkbase Document.
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File, formatted in Inline XBRL (included in Exhibit 101).
*Previously ﬁled as indicated and incorporated her ein by r eference. Exhibits incorporated by r eference ar e
located in SEC F ile No . 001-04534 unless otherwise indicated.
†Indicated management contract or compensatory ar rangement.
††The certiﬁcation attached as Exhibit 32.1 that accompanies this Annual R eport on F orm 10-K, is not deemed
ﬁled with the SEC and is not to be incorporated by r eference into any ﬁling of Air P roducts and Chemicals, Inc.
under the Securities A ct of 1933, as amended, or the Securities Ex change A ct of 1934, as amended, whether
made befor e or af ter the date of this F orm 10-K, ir respective of any general incorporation language contained in
such ﬁling.
122
Table of Contents
SIGNA TURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the
registrant has duly caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly
authorized.
AIR PRODUCTS AND CHEMICALS, INC.
(Registrant)
By: /s/ Melissa N. Schaeﬀer
Melissa N. Schaeﬀer
Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer
(Principal Financial Oﬃcer)
Date:16 November 2023
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report has been signed below
by the following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature and Title Date
/s/ Seiﬁ Ghasemi 16 November 2023
(Seiﬁ Ghasemi)
Director, Chairman, President, and
Chief Executive Oﬃcer
(Principal Executive Oﬃcer)
/s/ Jeﬀrey J. Kutz 16 November 2023
(Jeﬀrey J. Kutz)
Vice President, Corporate Controller, and Principal
Accounting Oﬃcer
* 16 November 2023
(Tonit M. Calaway)
Director
* 16 November 2023
(Charles I. Cogut)
Director
* 16 November 2023
(Lisa A. Davis)
Director
* 16 November 2023
(David H. Y. Ho)
Director
123
Table of Contents
Signature and Title Date
* 16 November 2023
(Edward L. Monser)
Director
* 16 November 2023
(Matthew H. Paull)
Director
* 16 November 2023
(Wayne T. Smith)
Director
*Sean D. Major, Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary, by signing his name hereto,
does sign this document on behalf of the above noted individuals, pursuant to a power of attorney
duly executed by such individuals, which is ﬁled with the Securities and Exchange Commission
herewith.
/s/ Sean D. Major
Sean D. Major
Executive Vice President, General Counsel and
Secretary
Date:16 November 2023
124
